Missouri, session 2026, SB1188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 32.125, 99.1205, 100.260, 100.270,
100.286, 100.293, 100.297, 100.850, 135.090, 135.110, 135.313,
135.326, 135.339, 135.341, 135.352, 135.432, 135.460, 135.487,
135.490, 135.500, 135.503, 135.505, 135.508, 135.516, 135.517,
135.520, 135.523, 135.526, 135.529, 135.530, 135.535, 135.545,
135.546, 135.562, 135.647, 135.679, 135.680, 135.682, 135.690,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1188 2
135.700, 135.710, 135.750, 135.766, 135.772, 135.775, 135.778,
135.800, 135.950, 135.953, 135.957, 135.960, 135.963, 135.967,
135.968, 135.970, 135.973, 135.1125, 135.1150, 135.1180,
137.123, 143.119, 143.177, 143.436, 143.471, 148.030, 148.330,
148.350, 173.196, 190.465, 192.2015, 208.770, 320.092, 320.093,
348.302, 348.304, 348.306, 348.308, 348.310, 348.312, 348.316,
348.318, 348.505, 447.708, 620.635, 620.638, 620.641, 620.644,
620.647, 620.650, 620.653, 620.1875, 620.1878, 620.1881,
620.1884, 620.1887, 620.1890, 620.1910, 620.2010, 620.2020, and
620.2600, RSMo, and section 348.300 as enacted by senate bill
no. 7, ninety-sixth general assembly, first extraordinary
session, and section 348.300 as enacted by house bill no. 1,
ninety-fourth general assembly, first extraordinary session,
are repealed and forty-six new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 32.125, 100.260, 100.270, 100.286,
100.293, 100.297, 100.850, 135.090, 135.110, 135.326, 135.339,
135.341, 135.352, 135.432, 135.460, 135.487, 135.490, 135.530,
135.562, 135.647, 135.690, 135.750, 135.772, 135.775, 135.778,
135.800, 135.835, 135.1150, 135.1180, 137.123, 143.119,
143.177, 143.436, 143.471, 148.030, 148.330, 148.350, 190.465,
192.2015, 208.770, 320.092, 348.505, 447.708, 620.1910,
620.2010, and 620.2020, to read as follows:
32.125. 1. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
under the authority of this chapter shall become effective
unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
section 536.024.
2. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to sections 32.100
to 32.125 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;

SB 1188 3
(2) Sections 32.100 to 32.125 shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately following
the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant
to sections 32.100 to 32.125 is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to sections
32.100 to 32.125 prior to the date the program authorized
pursuant to sections 32.100 to 32.125 is sunset.
100.260. 1. There are hereby created four special
funds, to be known as the "Industrial Development and
Reserve Fund", the "Industrial Development Guarantee Fund",
the "Export Finance Fund", and the "Jobs Now Fund", into
which the following may be deposited as and when received
and designated for deposit in one of such funds:
(1) Any moneys appropriated by the general assembly
for use by the board in carrying out the powers set forth in
sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(2) Any moneys made available through the issuance of
revenue bonds under the provisions of sections 100.250 to
[100.295] 100.297;
(3) Any moneys received from grants or which are
given, donated, or contributed to the fund from any source;
(4) Any moneys received in repayment of loans or from
application fees, reserve participation fees, guarantee fees
and premium payments as provided for under sections 100.250
to 100.297;
(5) Any moneys received as interest on deposits or as
income on approved investments of the fund;
(6) Any moneys obtained from the issuance of revenue
bonds or notes by the board;

SB 1188 4
(7) Any moneys that were in the industrial development
fund authorized by this section, the economic development
reserve authorized by section 620.215, or the industrial
revenue bond guarantee fund authorized by section 620.240,
respectively, as of September 28, 1985; and
(8) Any moneys obtained from any other available
source.
2. The development and reserve fund, the guarantee
fund, the jobs now fund, and the export finance fund shall
be administered by the board as provided in sections 100.250
to 100.297. Separate accounts may be created within the
development and reserve fund and the guarantee fund for
moneys specifically appropriated, donated or otherwise
received for industrial development purposes. The board may
also create such other separate accounts within any of such
funds as deemed necessary or appropriate by the board to
carry out the duties and purposes of sections 100.250 to
100.297. All such separate accounts may be administered by
a corporate trustee on behalf of the board upon the terms
and conditions established by the board.
3. Moneys in the jobs now fund, the development and
reserve fund, the guarantee fund, and the export finance
fund shall be invested by the board in the manner prescribed
by the board and any interest earned on invested moneys
shall accrue to the benefit of the respective fund.
4. None of the funds and accounts of the board shall
be considered a state fund, and money deposited therein may
not be appropriated therefrom, nor shall any money deposited
therein be subject to the provisions of section 33.080.
5. The commissioner of administration shall annually
calculate the increased amount of revenue to the state
treasury due to the provisions of sections 135.155[,] and

SB 1188 5
135.286[, 135.546, and subsection 7 of section 620.1039,] as
enacted or modified by this act and shall allocate up to
twelve million dollars of such revenue to the jobs now fund.
100.270. The board shall have the power to:
(1) Sue and be sued in its official name;
(2) Adopt and use an official seal;
(3) Confer with agencies of the state and development
agencies, and with representatives of business, industry,
and labor for the purpose of promoting the economic
development of this state;
(4) Consider and review applications for loans to be
made from the development and reserve fund or for loans,
bonds or notes to be made by or secured by the development
and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance
fund or the infrastructure development fund or any other
available money, under sections 100.250 to 100.297, and for
grants or loans to be made by or secured by the jobs now
fund;
(5) Enter into agreements with development agencies,
borrowers, participating lenders and others to implement any
of the provisions of sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(6) Direct disbursements from the development and
reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance fund,
the infrastructure development fund, and the jobs now fund
as provided in sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(7) Administer the development and reserve fund, the
guarantee fund, the export finance fund, the infrastructure
development fund, and the jobs now fund and invest any
portion of such funds not required for immediate
disbursement in obligations of the United States, or any
agency or instrumentality of the United States, in
obligations of the state of Missouri and its political

SB 1188 6
subdivisions, in certificates of deposit and time deposits
or other obligations of banks and savings and loan
associations or in such other obligations as may be
prescribed by the board;
(8) Apply for and accept gifts, grants,
appropriations, loans or contributions to the development
and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance
fund, the infrastructure development fund, and the jobs now
fund from any source, public or private, and enter into
contracts or other transactions with any federal or state
agency, any development agency, private organization, or any
other source in furtherance of the purposes of sections
100.250 to 100.297, and do any and all things necessary in
order to avail itself of such aid and cooperation;
(9) Issue, from time to time, its negotiable revenue
bonds or notes in such principal amounts as, in its opinion,
shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving
its purposes;
(10) Establish reserves to secure bonds, notes and
loans issued or made by the board, development agencies or
participating lenders;
(11) Make, purchase, or participate in the making or
purchase, of loans, bonds, or notes to finance the costs of
projects;
(12) Procure insurance, letters of credit, or other
form of credit enhancement, to secure the payment of
principal and interest on any loans, bonds or notes or other
obligations of the board;
(13) Purchase, receive, take by grant, gift, devise,
bequest or otherwise, lease, or otherwise acquire, own,
hold, improve, employ, use and otherwise deal in and with,

SB 1188 7
real or personal property, or any interest therein, wherever
situated;
(14) Sell, convey, lease, exchange, transfer or
otherwise dispose of, all or any of its property, or any
interest therein, wherever situated;
(15) Conduct hearings and other methods of
examination, and authorize any of its members to do so, on
any matter material for its information and necessary to the
exercise of the duties of the board;
(16) Employ and fix the compensation of an executive
director and such other agents or employees as it considers
necessary;
(17) Adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules,
and regulations governing the manner in which its business
may be transacted;
(18) Assess or charge a fee for each application it
receives for funding for a project or a jobs now project and
assess or charge other fees as the board determines to be
reasonable to carry out its purposes, including, but not
limited to, fees or premiums for loans made from the
development and reserve fund and the export finance fund and
for loans, bonds or notes secured by the development and
reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance fund or
the infrastructure development fund or the jobs now fund;
(19) Make all expenditures which are incident and
necessary to carry out its purposes and powers;
(20) Take such action, enter into such agreements and
exercise all other powers and functions necessary or
appropriate to carry out the duties and purposes set forth
in sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(21) Insure, coinsure, guarantee loans and make loans
relating to qualified export transactions and adopt

SB 1188 8
criteria, by means of rules and regulations, establishing
which exporters shall be eligible for the insurance,
coinsurance, loan guarantees and loans which may be extended
by the board;
(22) Do all things necessary to ensure full
participation by the state of Missouri in any federal
program which may relate to the construction, repair,
100 replacement or further development of the infrastructure of
101 the state and its political subdivisions;
102 (23) Receive funds from the federal government for
103 deposit into the infrastructure development fund or the jobs
104 now fund and authorize disbursements therefrom. The board
105 may enter into agreements with agencies of the federal
106 government and may, on behalf of the state of Missouri, do
107 all things necessary to ensure full participation by the
108 state of Missouri in any federal program which may relate to
109 the repair, replacement or further development of the
110 infrastructure of the state and its political subdivisions;
111 (24) Set guidelines and priorities for loans, loan
112 guarantees or grants from the infrastructure development
113 fund. The board is the sole state agency authorized to set
114 such guidelines and priorities with respect to the
115 infrastructure development fund on behalf of the state or
116 any of its political subdivisions, and loans, loan
117 guarantees, or grants shall only be made upon approval of
118 the board;
119 (25) Make equity investments in or otherwise acquire
120 ownership interests in: for-profit and not-for-profit
121 federal- or state-authorized community development
122 corporations; small business investment companies, including
123 minority or specialized small business investment companies;
124 and microloan corporations and similar lending institutions,

SB 1188 9
125 when such investments are deemed to enhance the benefit of
126 the public;
127 (26) Make investments in Missouri certified capital
128 companies, as defined [by] under this subdivision [(5) of
129 subsection 2 of section 135.500], or other investment
130 companies for investment in qualified Missouri businesses,
131 as defined [by] under this subdivision [(14) of subsection 2
132 of section 135.500]. All investments made by the board for
133 the eventual investment in qualified Missouri businesses
134 shall be matched by an equivalent investment made by the
135 certified capital company or other investment firm for
136 investment into qualified Missouri businesses. All
137 investments made into Missouri qualified businesses under
138 the provisions of this subdivision shall be in the form of
139 equity or unsecured debt financing. No investment shall be
140 made by the board under the provisions of this subdivision
141 without the approval of the director of the department of
142 economic development. For the purposes of this subdivision,
143 the following terms mean:
144 (a) "Certified capital company", any partnership,
145 corporation, trust, or limited liability company, whether
146 organized on a profit or not-for-profit basis, that is
147 located, headquartered, and registered to conduct business
148 in Missouri and has as its primary business activity the
149 investment of cash in qualified Missouri businesses;
150 (b) "Qualified Missouri business", an independently
151 owned and operated business that is headquartered and
152 located in Missouri and is in need of venture capital and
153 cannot obtain conventional financing. Such business shall
154 have no more than two hundred employees, at least eighty
155 percent of whom are employed in Missouri. Such business
156 shall be involved in commerce for the purpose of

SB 1188 10
157 manufacturing, processing or assembling products, conducting
158 research and development, or providing services in
159 interstate commerce, but excluding retail, real estate, real
160 estate development, insurance, and professional services
161 provided by accountants, lawyers, or physicians. At the
162 time a certified capital company or qualified investing
163 entity makes an initial investment in a business, such
164 business shall be a small business concern that meets the
165 requirements of the United States Small Business
166 Administration's qualification size standards for its
167 venture capital program, as defined in Section 13 CFR
168 121.301(c) of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as
169 amended. Any business that is classified as a qualified
170 Missouri business at the time of the first investment in
171 such business by a Missouri certified capital company or
172 qualified investing entity shall, for a period of seven
173 years from the date of such first investment, remain
174 classified as a qualified Missouri business and may receive
175 follow-on investments from any Missouri certified capital
176 company or qualified investing entity and such follow-on
177 investments shall be qualified investments regardless of
178 whether such business meets the other qualifications of this
179 subsection at the time of such follow-on investments; and
180 (27) Make loans and grants from the jobs now fund in
181 accordance with the provisions of section 100.293.
100.286. 1. Within the discretion of the board, the
development and reserve fund, the infrastructure development
fund or the export finance fund may be pledged to secure the
payment of any bonds or notes issued by the board, or to
secure the payment of any loan made by the board or a
participating lender which loan:

SB 1188 11
(1) Is requested to finance any project or export
trade activity;
(2) Is requested by a borrower who is demonstrated to
be financially responsible;
(3) Can reasonably be expected to provide a benefit to
the economy of this state;
(4) Is otherwise secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on real or personal property or other security
satisfactory to the board; provided that loans to finance
export trade activities may be secured by export accounts
receivable or inventories of exportable goods satisfactory
to the board;
(5) Does not exceed five million dollars;
(6) Does not have a term longer than five years if
such loan is made to finance export trade activities; and
(7) Is, when used to finance export trade activities,
made to small or medium size businesses or agricultural
businesses, as may be defined by the board.
2. The board shall prescribe standards for the
evaluation of the financial condition, business history, and
qualifications of each borrower and the terms and conditions
of loans which may be secured, and may require each
application to include a financial report and evaluation by
an independent certified public accounting firm, in addition
to such examination and evaluation as may be conducted by
any participating lender.
3. Each application for a loan secured by the
development and reserve fund, the infrastructure development
fund or the export finance fund shall be reviewed in the
first instance by any participating lender to whom the
application was submitted. If satisfied that the standards
prescribed by the board are met and that the loan is

SB 1188 12
otherwise eligible to be secured by the development and
reserve fund, the infrastructure development fund or the
export finance fund, the participating lender shall certify
the same and forward the application for final approval to
the board.
4. The securing of any loans by the development and
reserve fund, the infrastructure development fund or the
export finance fund shall be conditioned upon approval of
the application by the board, and receipt of an annual
reserve participation fee, as prescribed by the board,
submitted by or on behalf of the borrower.
5. The securing of any loan by the export finance fund
for export trade activities shall be conditioned upon the
board's compliance with any applicable treaties and
international agreements, such as the general agreement on
tariffs and trade and the subsidies code, to which the
United States is then a party.
6. Any taxpayer, including any charitable organization
that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri
unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject
to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143, may,
subject to the limitations provided under subsection 8 of
this section, receive a tax credit against any tax otherwise
due under the provisions of chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.261,
chapter 147, or chapter 148, in the amount of fifty percent
of any amount contributed in money or property by the
taxpayer to the development and reserve fund, the
infrastructure development fund or the export finance fund
during the taxpayer's tax year, provided, however, the total
tax credits awarded in any calendar year beginning after
January 1, 1994, shall not be the greater of ten million

SB 1188 13
dollars or five percent of the average growth in general
revenue receipts in the preceding three fiscal years. This
limit may be exceeded only upon joint agreement by the
commissioner of administration, the director of the
department of economic development, and the director of the
department of revenue that such action is essential to
ensure retention or attraction of investment in Missouri.
If the board receives, as a contribution, real property, the
contributor at such contributor's own expense shall have two
independent appraisals conducted by appraisers certified by
the Master Appraisal Institute. Both appraisals shall be
submitted to the board, and the tax credit certified by the
board to the contributor shall be based upon the value of
the lower of the two appraisals. The board shall not
certify the tax credit until the property is deeded to the
board. Such credit shall not apply to reserve participation
fees paid by borrowers under sections 100.250 to 100.297.
The portion of earned tax credits which exceeds the
taxpayer's tax liability may be carried forward for up to
five years.
7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, any taxpayer may sell, assign, exchange, convey or
otherwise transfer tax credits allowed in subsection 6 of
this section under the terms and conditions prescribed in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection. Such taxpayer,
hereinafter the assignor for the purpose of this subsection,
may sell, assign, exchange or otherwise transfer earned tax
credits:
(1) For no less than seventy-five percent of the par
100 value of such credits; and
101 (2) In an amount not to exceed one hundred percent of
102 annual earned credits.

SB 1188 14
103 The taxpayer acquiring earned credits, hereinafter the
104 assignee for the purpose of this subsection, may use the
105 acquired credits to offset up to one hundred percent of the
106 tax liabilities otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding
107 withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.261,
108 chapter 147, or chapter 148. Unused credits in the hands of
109 the assignee may be carried forward for up to five years,
110 provided all such credits shall be claimed within ten years
111 following the tax years in which the contribution was made.
112 The assignor shall enter into a written agreement with the
113 assignee establishing the terms and conditions of the
114 agreement and shall perfect such transfer by notifying the
115 board in writing within thirty calendar days following the
116 effective day of the transfer and shall provide any
117 information as may be required by the board to administer
118 and carry out the provisions of this section.
119 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
120 the amount received by the assignor of such tax credit shall
121 be taxable as income of the assignor, and the excess of the
122 par value of such credit over the amount paid by the
123 assignee for such credit shall be taxable as income of the
124 assignee.
125 8. Provisions of subsections 1 to 7 of this section to
126 the contrary notwithstanding, no more than ten million
127 dollars in tax credits provided under this section, may be
128 authorized or approved annually. The limitation on tax
129 credit authorization and approval provided under this
130 subsection may be exceeded only upon mutual agreement,
131 evidenced by a signed and properly notarized letter, by the
132 commissioner of the office of administration, the director
133 of the department of economic development, and the director
134 of the department of revenue that such action is essential

SB 1188 15
135 to ensure retention or attraction of investment in Missouri
136 provided, however, that in no case shall more than twenty-
137 five million dollars in tax credits be authorized or
138 approved during such year. Taxpayers shall file, with the
139 board, an application for tax credits authorized under this
140 section on a form provided by the board. The provisions of
141 this subsection shall not be construed to limit or in any
142 way impair the ability of the board to authorize tax credits
143 for issuance for projects authorized or approved, by a vote
144 of the board, on or before the thirtieth day following the
145 effective date of this act, or a taxpayer's ability to
146 redeem such tax credits.
147 9. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
148 act:
149 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
150 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
151 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
152 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
153 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
154 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
155 sunset; and
156 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
157 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
158 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
159 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
160 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
161 section is sunset.
100.293. 1. This section[,] and section 100.277[, and
sections 135.950 to 135.973] shall be known and may be cited
as the "Jobs Now Act".
2. There shall be created a "Jobs Now Recommendation
Committee", comprised of representatives of the department

SB 1188 16
of economic development, the department of agriculture, the
department of natural resources, and the department of
transportation. The committee shall establish application
materials and procedures for development agencies to apply
to the board for grants or low-interest or interest-free
loans for the purpose of funding jobs now projects.
3. Applications shall be submitted simultaneously to
the committee and the board. The committee shall review the
applications and prepare and submit analyses and
recommendations to the board for a determination as to
approval or denial of grants or loans from the jobs now fund.
4. In reviewing applications, the board shall give
preference to redevelopment projects that protect natural
resources or rehabilitate existing dilapidated or inadequate
infrastructure in areas defined under section 135.530.
5. After reviewing applications and such other
information as the board may require, the board may grant
all or a part of a grant or loan request, provided the board
determines:
(1) The jobs now project:
(a) Will not happen without the grant or loan from the
board; or
(b) Will have a significant local economic impact; or
(c) Demonstrates high levels of job creation;
(2) In the case of a low-interest or interest-free
loan, the jobs now project will generate sufficient revenues
or the borrower will otherwise have sufficient revenues
available to enable the borrower to repay the loan to the
jobs now fund, along with any interest to be charged; and
(3) No loan or grant may exceed two million dollars.
100.297. 1. The board may authorize a tax credit, as
described in this section, to the owner of any revenue bonds

SB 1188 17
or notes issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of
sections 100.250 to 100.297, for infrastructure facilities
as defined in subdivision (9) of section 100.255, if, prior
to the issuance of such bonds or notes, the board determines
that:
(1) The availability of such tax credit is a material
inducement to the undertaking of the project in the state of
Missouri and to the sale of the bonds or notes;
(2) The loan with respect to the project is adequately
secured by a first deed of trust or mortgage or comparable
lien, or other security satisfactory to the board.
2. Upon making the determinations specified in
subsection 1 of this section, the board may declare that
each owner of an issue of revenue bonds or notes shall be
entitled, in lieu of any other deduction with respect to
such bonds or notes, to a tax credit against any tax
otherwise due by such owner pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.261, chapter 147, or chapter 148, in the
amount of one hundred percent of the unpaid principal of and
unpaid interest on such bonds or notes held by such owner in
the [taxable] tax year of such owner following the calendar
year of the default of the loan by the borrower with respect
to the project. The occurrence of a default shall be
governed by documents authorizing the issuance of the
bonds. The tax credit allowed pursuant to this section
shall be available to the original owners of the bonds or
notes or any subsequent owner or owners thereof. Once an
owner is entitled to a claim, any such tax credits shall be
transferable as provided in subsection 7 of section
100.286. Notwithstanding any provision of Missouri law to
the contrary, any portion of the tax credit to which any

SB 1188 18
owner of a revenue bond or note is entitled pursuant to this
section which exceeds the total income tax liability of such
owner of a revenue bond or note shall be carried forward and
allowed as a credit against any future taxes imposed on such
owner within the next ten years pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by
sections 143.191 to 143.261, chapter 147, or chapter 148.
The eligibility of the owner of any revenue bond or note
issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 100.250 to
100.297 for the tax credit provided by this section shall be
expressly stated on the face of each such bond or note. The
tax credit allowed pursuant to this section shall also be
available to any financial institution or guarantor which
executes any credit facility as security for bonds issued
pursuant to this section to the same extent as if such
financial institution or guarantor was an owner of the bonds
or notes, provided however, in such case the tax credits
provided by this section shall be available immediately
following any default of the loan by the borrower with
respect to the project. In addition to reimbursing the
financial institution or guarantor for claims relating to
unpaid principal and interest, such claim may include
payment of any unpaid fees imposed by such financial
institution or guarantor for use of the credit facility.
3. The aggregate principal amount of revenue bonds or
notes outstanding at any time with respect to which the tax
credit provided in this section shall be available shall not
exceed fifty million dollars.
4. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:

SB 1188 19
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
100.850. 1. The approved company shall remit to the
board a job development assessment fee, not to exceed five
percent of the gross wages of each eligible employee whose
job was created as a result of the economic development
project, or not to exceed ten percent if the economic
development project is located within a distressed community
as defined in section 135.530, for the purpose of retiring
bonds which fund the economic development project.
2. Any approved company remitting an assessment as
provided in subsection 1 of this section shall make its
payroll books and records available to the board at such
reasonable times as the board shall request and shall file
with the board documentation respecting the assessment as
the board may require.
3. Any assessment remitted pursuant to subsection 1 of
this section shall cease on the date the bonds are retired.
4. Any approved company which has paid an assessment
for debt reduction shall be allowed a tax credit equal to
the amount of the assessment. The tax credit may be claimed

SB 1188 20
against taxes otherwise imposed by chapters 143 and 148,
except withholding taxes imposed under the provisions of
sections 143.191 to 143.265, which were incurred during the
tax period in which the assessment was made.
5. In no event shall the aggregate amount of tax
credits authorized by subsection 4 of this section exceed
twenty-five million dollars annually. Of such amount, nine
hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be reserved for an
approved project for a world headquarters of a business
whose primary function is tax return preparation that is
located in any home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
which amount reserved shall end in the year of the final
maturity of the certificates issued for such approved
project.
6. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to the
approved company to the extent that the amount of credits
allowed in subsection 4 of this section exceeds the amount
of the approved company's income tax.
7. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to sections
100.700 to 100.850 shall automatically sunset August 28,
2032, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) Sections 100.700 to 100.850 shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately following
the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant
to sections 100.700 to 100.850 is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to sections

SB 1188 21
100.700 to 100.850 prior to the date the program authorized
pursuant to this section is sunset.
135.090. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Homestead", the dwelling in Missouri owned by the
surviving spouse and not exceeding five acres of land
surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the
dwelling as a home. As used in this section, "homestead"
shall not include any dwelling which is occupied by more
than two families;
(2) "Public safety officer", any firefighter, police
officer, capitol police officer, parole officer, probation
officer, correctional employee, water patrol officer, park
ranger, conservation officer, commercial motor vehicle
enforcement officer, emergency medical responder, as defined
in section 190.100, emergency medical technician, first
responder, or highway patrolman employed by the state of
Missouri or a political subdivision thereof who is killed in
the line of duty, unless the death was the result of the
officer's own misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs;
(3) "Surviving spouse", a spouse, who has not
remarried, of a public safety officer.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2008, a surviving spouse shall be allowed a credit against
the tax otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, in
an amount equal to the total amount of the property taxes on
the surviving spouse's homestead paid during the tax year
for which the credit is claimed. A surviving spouse may
claim the credit authorized under this section for each tax
year beginning the year of death of the public safety
officer spouse until the tax year in which the surviving

SB 1188 22
spouse remarries. No credit shall be allowed for the tax
year in which the surviving spouse remarries. If the amount
allowable as a credit exceeds the income tax reduced by
other credits, then the excess shall be considered an
overpayment of the income tax. The department shall
prescribe the method for submitting applications for
claiming the tax credit authorized under this section.
After issuance of a tax credit certificate by the department
of public safety, such tax credit shall be redeemed by
filing a copy of the tax credit certificate with the
taxpayer's income tax return for the tax year for which such
credit was issued.
3. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department of public safety
under this section shall not exceed the total cap amount,
which shall be an amount equal to the highest annual amount
of tax credits issued in any one previous fiscal year, from
fiscal year 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as determined and
calculated by the department of revenue.
(2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
4. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
public safety shall administer the tax credit provided under
this section.
5. The department of [revenue] public safety shall
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.
[4.] 6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective

SB 1188 23
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2007, shall be invalid and void.
[5.] 7. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The program authorized under this section shall
expire on December 31, 2027, unless reauthorized by the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized under this section is sunset;
and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to limit or in any way impair the department's
ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the
date the program authorized under this section expires or a
taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.
135.110. 1. Any taxpayer who shall establish a new
business facility shall be allowed a credit, each year for
ten years, in an amount determined pursuant to subsection 2
or 3 of this section, whichever is applicable, against the
tax imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or an insurance
company which shall establish a new business facility by
satisfying the requirements in subdivision (9) of section
135.100 shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise

SB 1188 24
imposed by chapter 148, and in the case of an insurance
company exempt from the thirty percent employee requirement
of section 135.230, against any obligation imposed pursuant
to section 375.916, except that no taxpayer shall be
entitled to multiple ten-year periods for subsequent
expansions at the same facility, except as otherwise
provided in this section. For the purpose of this section,
the term "facility" shall mean, and be limited to, the
facility or facilities which are located on the same site in
which the new business facility is located, and in which the
business conducted at such facility or facilities is
directly related to the business conducted at the new
business facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subsection, a taxpayer may be entitled to an additional ten-
year period, and an additional six-year period after the
expiration of such additional ten-year period, if a new
business facility is expanded in the eighth, ninth or tenth
year of the current ten-year period or in subsequent years
following the expiration of the ten-year period, if the
number of new business facility employees attributed to such
expansion is at least twenty-five and the amount of new
business facility investment attributed to such expansion is
at least one million dollars. Credits may not be carried
forward but shall be claimed for the [taxable] tax year
during which commencement of commercial operations occurs at
such new business facility, and for each of the nine
succeeding [taxable] tax years. A letter of intent, as
provided for in section 135.258, must be filed with the
department of economic development no later than fifteen
days prior to the commencement of commercial operations at
the new business facility. The initial application for
claiming tax credits must be made in the taxpayer's tax

SB 1188 25
period immediately following the tax period in which
commencement of commercial operations began at the new
business facility. This provision shall have effect on all
initial applications filed on or after August 28, 1992. No
credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section unless the
number of new business facility employees engaged or
maintained in employment at the new business facility for
the [taxable] tax year for which the credit is claimed
equals or exceeds two; except that the number of new
business facility employees engaged or maintained in
employment by a revenue-producing enterprise other than a
revenue-producing enterprise defined in paragraphs (a) to
(g) and (i) to (l) of subdivision (12) of section 135.100
which establishes an office as defined in subdivision (9) of
section 135.100 shall equal or exceed twenty-five.
2. For tax periods beginning after August 28, 1991, in
the case of a taxpayer operating an existing business
facility, the credit allowed by subsection 1 of this section
shall offset the greater of:
(1) Some portion of the income tax otherwise imposed
by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by
sections 143.191 to 143.265, or in the case of an insurance
company, the tax on the direct premiums, as defined in
chapter 148, and in the case of an insurance company exempt
from the thirty percent employee requirement of section
135.230, against any obligation imposed pursuant to section
375.916 with respect to such taxpayer's new business
facility income for the [taxable] tax year for which such
credit is allowed; or
(2) Up to fifty percent or, in the case of an economic
development project located within a distressed community as
defined in section 135.530, seventy-five percent of the

SB 1188 26
business income tax otherwise imposed by chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, or in the case of an insurance company, the tax on
the direct premiums, as defined in chapter 148, and in the
case of an insurance company exempt from the thirty percent
employee requirement of section 135.230, against any
obligation imposed pursuant to section 375.916 if the
business operates no other facilities in Missouri. In the
case of an existing business facility operating more than
one facility in Missouri, the credit allowed in subsection 1
of this section shall offset up to the greater of the
portion prescribed in subdivision (1) of this subsection or
twenty-five percent or, in the case of an economic
development project located within a distressed community as
defined in section 135.530, thirty-five percent of the
business' tax, except that no taxpayer operating more than
one facility in Missouri shall be allowed to offset more
than twenty-five percent or, in the case of an economic
development project located within a distressed community as
defined in section 135.530, thirty-five percent of the
taxpayer's business income tax in any tax period under the
method prescribed in this subdivision. Such credit shall be
an amount equal to the sum of one hundred dollars or, in the
case of an economic development project located within a
distressed community as defined in section 135.530, one
hundred fifty dollars for each new business facility
100 employee plus one hundred dollars or, in the case of an
101 economic development project located within a distressed
102 community as defined in section 135.530, one hundred fifty
103 dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars, or major
104 fraction thereof (which shall be deemed to be fifty-one
105 percent or more) in new business facility investment. For

SB 1188 27
106 the purpose of this section, tax credits earned by a
107 taxpayer, who establishes a new business facility because it
108 satisfies the requirements of paragraph (c) of subdivision
109 (5) of section 135.100, shall offset the greater of the
110 portion prescribed in subdivision (1) of this subsection or
111 up to fifty percent or, in the case of an economic
112 development project located within a distressed community as
113 defined in section 135.530, seventy-five percent of the
114 business' tax provided the business operates no other
115 facilities in Missouri. In the case of a business operating
116 more than one facility in Missouri, the credit allowed in
117 subsection 1 of this section shall offset up to the greater
118 of the portion prescribed in subdivision (1) of this
119 subsection or twenty-five percent or, in the case of an
120 economic development project located within a distressed
121 community as defined in section 135.530, thirty-five percent
122 of the business' tax, except that no taxpayer operating more
123 than one facility in Missouri shall be allowed to offset
124 more than twenty-five percent or, in the case of an economic
125 development project located within a distressed community as
126 defined in section 135.530, thirty-five percent of the
127 taxpayer's business income tax in any tax period under the
128 method prescribed in this subdivision.
129 3. For tax periods beginning after August 28, 1991, in
130 the case of a taxpayer not operating an existing business
131 facility, the credit allowed by subsection 1 of this section
132 shall offset the greater of:
133 (1) Some portion of the income tax otherwise imposed
134 by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by
135 sections 143.191 to 143.265, or in the case of an insurance
136 company, the tax on the direct premiums, as defined in
137 chapter 148, and in the case of an insurance company exempt

SB 1188 28
138 from the thirty percent employee requirement of section
139 135.230, against any obligation imposed pursuant to section
140 375.916 with respect to such taxpayer's new business
141 facility income for the [taxable] tax year for which such
142 credit is allowed; or
143 (2) Up to one hundred percent of the business income
144 tax otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding
145 tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or in the case
146 of an insurance company, the tax on the direct premiums, as
147 defined in chapter 148, and in the case of an insurance
148 company exempt from the thirty percent employee requirement
149 of section 135.230, against any obligation imposed pursuant
150 to section 375.916 if the business has no other facilities
151 operating in Missouri. In the case of a taxpayer not
152 operating an existing business and operating more than one
153 facility in Missouri, the credit allowed by subsection 1 of
154 this section shall offset up to the greater of the portion
155 prescribed in subdivision (1) of this subsection or twenty-
156 five percent or, in the case of an economic development
157 project located within a distressed community as defined in
158 section 135.530, thirty-five percent of the business' tax,
159 except that no taxpayer operating more than one facility in
160 Missouri shall be allowed to offset more than twenty-five
161 percent or, in the case of an economic development project
162 located within a distressed community as defined in section
163 135.530, thirty-five percent of the taxpayer's business
164 income tax in any tax period under the method prescribed in
165 this subdivision. Such credit shall be an amount equal to
166 the sum of seventy-five dollars or, in the case of an
167 economic development project located within a distressed
168 community as defined in section 135.530, one hundred twenty-
169 five dollars for each new business facility employee plus

SB 1188 29
170 seventy-five dollars or, in the case of an economic
171 development project located within a distressed community as
172 defined in section 135.530, one hundred twenty-five dollars
173 for each one hundred thousand dollars, or major fraction
174 thereof (which shall be deemed to be fifty-one percent or
175 more) in new business facility investment.
176 4. The number of new business facility employees
177 during any [taxable] tax year shall be determined by
178 dividing by twelve the sum of the number of individuals
179 employed on the last business day of each month of such
180 [taxable] tax year. If the new business facility is in
181 operation for less than the entire [taxable] tax year, the
182 number of new business facility employees shall be
183 determined by dividing the sum of the number of individuals
184 employed on the last business day of each full calendar
185 month during the portion of such [taxable] tax year during
186 which the new business facility was in operation by the
187 number of full calendar months during such period. For the
188 purpose of computing the credit allowed by this section in
189 the case of a facility which qualifies as a new business
190 facility because it qualifies as a separate facility
191 pursuant to subsection 6 of this section, and, in the case
192 of a new business facility which satisfies the requirements
193 of paragraph (c) of subdivision (5) of section 135.100, or
194 subdivision (11) of section 135.100, the number of new
195 business facility employees at such facility shall be
196 reduced by the average number of individuals employed,
197 computed as provided in this subsection, at the facility
198 during the [taxable] tax year immediately preceding the
199 [taxable] tax year in which such expansion, acquisition, or
200 replacement occurred and shall further be reduced by the
201 number of individuals employed by the taxpayer or related

SB 1188 30
202 taxpayer that was subsequently transferred to the new
203 business facility from another Missouri facility and for
204 which credits authorized in this section are not being
205 earned, whether such credits are earned because of an
206 expansion, acquisition, relocation or the establishment of a
207 new facility.
208 5. For the purpose of computing the credit allowed by
209 this section in the case of a facility which qualifies as a
210 new business facility because it qualifies as a separate
211 facility pursuant to subsection 6 of this section, and, in
212 the case of a new business facility which satisfies the
213 requirements of paragraph (c) of subdivision (5) of section
214 135.100 or subdivision (11) of section 135.100, the amount
215 of the taxpayer's new business facility investment in such
216 facility shall be reduced by the average amount, computed as
217 provided in subdivision (8) of section 135.100 for new
218 business facility investment, of the investment of the
219 taxpayer, or related taxpayer immediately preceding such
220 expansion or replacement or at the time of acquisition.
221 Furthermore, the amount of the taxpayer's new business
222 facility investment shall also be reduced by the amount of
223 investment employed by the taxpayer or related taxpayer
224 which was subsequently transferred to the new business
225 facility from another Missouri facility and for which
226 credits authorized in this section are not being earned,
227 whether such credits are earned because of an expansion,
228 acquisition, relocation or the establishment of a new
229 facility.
230 6. If a facility, which does not constitute a new
231 business facility, is expanded by the taxpayer, the
232 expansion shall be considered a separate facility eligible
233 for the credit allowed by this section if:

SB 1188 31
234 (1) The taxpayer's new business facility investment in
235 the expansion during the tax period in which the credits
236 allowed in this section are claimed exceeds one hundred
237 thousand dollars, or, if less, one hundred percent of the
238 investment in the original facility prior to expansion and
239 if the number of new business facility employees engaged or
240 maintained in employment at the expansion facility for the
241 [taxable] tax year for which credit is claimed equals or
242 exceeds two, except that the number of new business facility
243 employees engaged or maintained in employment at the
244 expansion facility for the [taxable] tax year for which the
245 credit is claimed equals or exceeds twenty-five if an office
246 as defined in subdivision (9) of section 135.100 is
247 established by a revenue-producing enterprise other than a
248 revenue-producing enterprise defined in paragraphs (a) to
249 (g) and (i) to (l) of subdivision (12) of section 135.100
250 and the total number of employees at the facility after the
251 expansion is at least two greater than the total number of
252 employees before the expansion, except that the total number
253 of employees at the facility after the expansion is at least
254 greater than the number of employees before the expansion by
255 twenty-five, if an office as defined in subdivision (9) of
256 section 135.100 is established by a revenue-producing
257 enterprise other than a revenue-producing enterprise defined
258 in paragraphs (a) to (g) and (i) to (l) of subdivision (12)
259 of section 135.100; and
260 (2) The expansion otherwise constitutes a new business
261 facility. The taxpayer's investment in the expansion and in
262 the original facility prior to expansion shall be determined
263 in the manner provided in subdivision (8) of section 135.100.
264 7. No credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section
265 to a public utility, as such term is defined in section

SB 1188 32
266 386.020. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection
267 to the contrary, motor carriers, barge lines or railroads
268 engaged in transporting property for hire, or any
269 interexchange telecommunications company or local exchange
270 telecommunications company that establishes a new business
271 facility shall be eligible to qualify for credits allowed in
272 this section.
273 8. For the purposes of the credit described in this
274 section, in the case of a corporation described in section
275 143.471 or partnership, in computing Missouri's tax
276 liability, this credit shall be allowed to the following:
277 (1) The shareholders of the corporation described in
278 section 143.471;
279 (2) The partners of the partnership.
280 This credit shall be apportioned to the entities described
281 in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection in proportion
282 to their share of ownership on the last day of the
283 taxpayer's tax period.
284 9. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
285 contrary, any employee-owned engineering firm classified as
286 SIC 8711, architectural firm as classified SIC 8712, or
287 accounting firm classified SIC 8721 establishing a new
288 business facility because it qualifies as a headquarters as
289 defined in subsection 10 of this section, shall be allowed
290 the credits described in subsection 11 of this section under
291 the same terms and conditions prescribed in sections 135.100
292 to 135.150; provided:
293 (1) Such facility maintains an average of at least
294 five hundred new business facility employees as defined in
295 subdivision (6) of section 135.100 during the taxpayer's tax
296 period in which such credits are being claimed; and

SB 1188 33
297 (2) Such facility maintains an average of at least
298 twenty million dollars in new business facility investment
299 as defined in subdivision (8) of section 135.100 during the
300 taxpayer's tax period in which such credits are being
301 claimed.
302 10. For the purpose of the credits allowed in
303 subsection 9 of this section:
304 (1) "Employee-owned" means the business employees own
305 directly or indirectly, including through an employee stock
306 ownership plan or trust at least:
307 (a) Seventy-five percent of the total business stock,
308 if the taxpayer is a corporation described in section
309 143.441; or
310 (b) One hundred percent of the interest in the
311 business if the taxpayer is a corporation described in
312 section 143.471, a partnership, or a limited liability
313 company; and
314 (2) "Headquarters" means:
315 (a) The administrative management of at least three
316 integrated facilities operated by the taxpayer or related
317 taxpayer; and
318 (b) The taxpayer's business has been headquartered in
319 this state for more than fifty years.
320 11. The tax credits allowed in subsection 9 of this
321 section shall be the greater of:
322 (1) Four hundred dollars for each new business
323 facility employee as computed in subsection 4 of this
324 section and four percent of new business facility investment
325 as computed in subsection 5 of this section; or
326 (2) Five hundred dollars for each new business
327 facility employee as computed in subsection 4 of this
328 section, and five hundred dollars of each one hundred

SB 1188 34
329 thousand dollars of new business facility investment as
330 computed in subsection 5 of this section.
331 12. For the purpose of the credit described in
332 subsection 9 of this section, in the case of a small
333 corporation described in section 143.471, or a partnership,
334 or a limited liability company, the credits allowed in
335 subsection 9 of this section shall be apportioned in
336 proportion to the share of ownership of each shareholder,
337 partner or stockholder on the last day of the taxpayer's tax
338 period for which such credits are being claimed.
339 13. For the purpose of the credit described in
340 subsection 9 of this section, tax credits earned, to the
341 extent such credits exceed the taxpayer's Missouri tax on
342 taxable business income, shall constitute an overpayment of
343 taxes and in such case, be refunded to the taxpayer provided
344 such refunds are used by the taxpayer to purchase specified
345 facility items. For the purpose of the refund as authorized
346 in this subsection, "specified facility items" means
347 equipment, computers, computer software, copiers, tenant
348 finishing, furniture and fixtures installed and in use at
349 the new business facility during the taxpayer's [taxable]
350 tax year. The taxpayer shall perfect such refund by
351 attesting in writing to the director, subject to the
352 penalties of perjury, the requirements prescribed in this
353 subsection have been met and submitting any other
354 information the director may require.
355 14. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
356 contrary, any taxpayer may sell, assign, exchange, convey or
357 otherwise transfer tax credits allowed in subsection 9 of
358 this section under the terms and conditions prescribed in
359 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection. Such taxpayer,
360 referred to as the assignor for the purpose of this

SB 1188 35
361 subsection, may sell, assign, exchange or otherwise transfer
362 earned tax credits:
363 (1) For no less than seventy-five percent of the par
364 value of such credits; and
365 (2) In an amount not to exceed one hundred percent of
366 such earned credits.
367 The taxpayer acquiring the earned credits referred to as the
368 assignee for the purpose of this subsection may use the
369 acquired credits to offset up to one hundred percent of the
370 tax liabilities otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding
371 withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.261, or
372 chapter 148, or in the case of an insurance company exempt
373 from the thirty percent employee requirement of section
374 135.230, against any obligation imposed pursuant to section
375 375.916. Unused credits in the hands of the assignee may be
376 carried forward for up to five tax periods, provided all
377 such credits shall be claimed within ten tax periods
378 following the tax period in which commencement of commercial
379 operations occurred at the new business facility. The
380 assignor shall enter into a written agreement with the
381 assignee establishing the terms and conditions of the
382 agreement and shall perfect such transfer by notifying the
383 director in writing within thirty calendar days following
384 the effective date of the transfer and shall provide any
385 information as may be required by the director to administer
386 and carry out the provisions of this subsection.
387 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
388 the amount received by the assignor of such tax credit shall
389 be taxable as income of the assignor, and the difference
390 between the amount paid by the assignee and the par value of
391 the credits shall be taxable as income of the assignee.

SB 1188 36
392 15. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
393 July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
394 annually to all taxpayers under this section shall not
395 exceed the total cap amount, which shall be an amount equal
396 to the highest annual amount of tax credits issued in any
397 one previous fiscal year, from fiscal year 2024 to fiscal
398 year 2026, as determined and calculated by the department.
399 (2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
400 year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
401 under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
402 be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
135.326. As used in sections 135.325 to 135.339, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Business entity", person, firm, a partner in a
firm, corporation or a shareholder in an S corporation doing
business in the state of Missouri and subject to the state
income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143, or a
corporation subject to the annual corporation franchise tax
imposed by the provisions of chapter 147, or an insurance
company paying an annual tax on its gross premium receipts
in this state, or other financial institution paying taxes
to the state of Missouri or any political subdivision of
this state under the provisions of chapter 148, or an
express company which pays an annual tax on its gross
receipts in this state pursuant to chapter 153;
(2) "Child", any individual who:
(a) Has not attained an age of at least eighteen
years; or
(b) Is eighteen years of age or older but is
physically or mentally incapable of caring for himself or
herself;
(3) "Department", the department of social services;

SB 1188 37
(4) "Disability", a mental, physical, or emotional
impairment that substantially limits one or more major life
activities, whether the impairment is congenital or acquired
by accident, injury or disease, and where the impairment is
verified by medical findings;
[(4)] (5) "Nonrecurring adoption expenses", reasonable
and necessary adoption fees, court costs, [attorney]
attorney's fees, and other expenses which are directly
related to the legal adoption of a child and which are not
incurred in violation of federal, state, or local law;
[(5)] (6) "Special needs child", a child for whom it
has been determined by the children's division, or by a
child-placing agency licensed by the state, or by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be a child:
(a) That cannot or should not be returned to the home
of his or her parents; and
(b) Who has a specific factor or condition such as
age, membership in a sibling group, medical condition or
diagnosis, or disability because of which it is reasonable
to conclude that such child cannot be easily placed with
adoptive parents;
[(6)] (7) "State tax liability", any liability
incurred by a taxpayer under the provisions of chapter 143,
chapter 147, chapter 148, and chapter 153, exclusive of the
provisions relating to the withholding of tax as provided
for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions.
135.339. 1. On and after August 28, 2026, the
department of social services shall administer the tax
credit provided under sections 135.325 to 135.339. The
department shall prescribe the method for submitting
applications for claiming the tax credit authorized under
sections 135.325 to 135.339. After issuance of a tax credit

SB 1188 38
certificate by the department of social services, such tax
credit shall be redeemed by filing a copy of the tax credit
certificate with the taxpayer's income tax return for the
tax year for which such credit was issued.
2. The director of revenue[, in consultation with the
children's division,] and the director of the department of
social services shall prescribe such rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 135.325 to
135.339. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of sections 135.325 to 135.339 shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of section 536.024.
135.341. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "CASA", an entity which receives funding from the
court-appointed special advocate fund established under
section 476.777, including an association based in this
state, affiliated with a national association, organized to
provide support to entities receiving funding from the court-
appointed special advocate fund;
(2) "Child advocacy centers", the regional child
assessment centers listed in subsection 2 of section
210.001, including an association based in this state,
affiliated with a national association, and organized to
provide support to entities listed in subsection 2 of
section 210.001;
(3) "Contribution", the amount of donation to a
qualified agency;
(4) "Crisis care center", entities contracted with
this state which provide temporary care for children whose
age ranges from birth through seventeen years of age whose
parents or guardian are experiencing an unexpected and

SB 1188 39
unstable or serious condition that requires immediate action
resulting in short-term care, usually three to five
continuous, uninterrupted days, for children who may be at
risk for child abuse, neglect, or in an emergency situation;
(5) "Department", the department of [revenue] social
services;
(6) "Director", the director of the department of
[revenue] social services;
(7) "Qualified agency", CASA, child advocacy centers,
or a crisis care center;
(8) "Tax liability", the tax due under chapter 143
other than taxes withheld under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2013, and ending on or before December 31, 2024, a tax
credit may be claimed in an amount equal to up to fifty
percent of a verified contribution to a qualified agency and
shall be named the champion for children tax credit. For
all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a tax
credit may be claimed in an amount not to exceed seventy
percent of a verified contribution to a qualified agency.
The minimum amount of any tax credit issued shall not be
less than fifty dollars and shall be applied to taxes due
under chapter 143, excluding sections 143.191 to 143.265.
For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a
taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim a tax credit under
this section in excess of fifty thousand dollars in any tax
year. A contribution verification shall be issued to the
taxpayer by the agency receiving the contribution. Such
contribution verification shall include the taxpayer's name,
Social Security number, amount of tax credit, amount of
contribution, the name and address of the agency receiving
the credit, and the date the contribution was made. The tax

SB 1188 40
credit provided under this subsection shall be initially
filed for the year in which the verified contribution is
made.
3. The cumulative amount of the tax credits [redeemed]
issued shall not exceed one million dollars for all fiscal
years ending on or before June 30, 2019; one million five
hundred thousand dollars for all fiscal years beginning on
or after July 1, 2019, and ending on or before June 30,
2025; and two million five hundred thousand dollars for all
fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. The amount
available shall be equally divided among the three qualified
agencies: CASA, child advocacy centers, or crisis care
centers, to be used towards tax credits issued. In the
event tax credits claimed under one agency do not total the
allocated amount for that agency, the unused portion for
that agency will be made available to the remaining agencies
equally. In the event the total amount of tax credits
claimed for any one agency exceeds the amount available for
that agency, the amount [redeemed] issued shall and will be
apportioned equally to all eligible taxpayers claiming the
credit under that agency.
4. Prior to December thirty-first of each year, each
qualified agency shall apply to the department of social
services in order to verify their qualified agency status
and apply for the champion for children tax credit. Upon a
determination that the agency is eligible to be a qualified
agency, the department of social services shall provide a
letter of eligibility and the tax credit certificate to such
agency. No later than February first of each year, the
department of social services shall provide a list of
qualified agencies to the department of revenue. All tax
credit applications to claim the champion for children tax

SB 1188 41
credit shall be filed between July first and April fifteenth
of each fiscal year. A taxpayer shall [apply for] redeem
the champion for children tax credit by attaching a copy of
the contribution verification provided by a qualified agency
and the tax credit certificate to such taxpayer's income tax
return.
5. Any amount of tax credit which exceeds the tax due
or which is applied for and otherwise eligible for issuance
but not issued shall not be refunded but may be carried over
to any subsequent tax year, not to exceed a total of five
years.
6. Tax credits may not be assigned, transferred or
sold.
7. In the event a full or partial credit denial, due
to the cumulative maximum amount of credits being redeemed
100 for the fiscal year, causes an income tax balance due to be
101 owed to the state by the taxpayer, the taxpayer shall not be
102 held liable for any addition to tax, penalty, or interest on
103 that income tax balance due, provided the balance is paid,
104 or approved payment arrangements have been made, within
105 sixty days from the issuance of the notice of credit denial.
106 8. The department of social services may promulgate
107 such rules or regulations as are necessary to administer the
108 provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
109 as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
110 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
111 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
112 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
113 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
114 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
115 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
116 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently

SB 1188 42
117 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
118 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
119 2013, shall be invalid and void.
120 9. Pursuant to section 23.253, of the Missouri sunset
121 act:
122 (1) The program authorized under this section shall be
123 reauthorized as of August 28, 2025, and shall expire on
124 December 31, 2031, unless reauthorized by the general
125 assembly; and
126 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
127 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
128 which the program authorized under this section is sunset;
129 and
130 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
131 construed to limit or in any way impair the department's
132 ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the
133 date the program authorized under this section expires or a
134 taxpayer's ability to redeem such credits.
135 10. Beginning on March 29, 2013, any verified
136 contribution to a qualified agency made on or after January
137 1, 2013, shall be eligible for tax credits as provided by
138 this section.
139 11. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
140 social services shall administer the tax credit provided
141 under this section.
135.352. 1. A taxpayer owning an interest in a
qualified Missouri project shall, subject to the limitations
provided under the provisions of subsection 3 of this
section, be allowed a state tax credit, whether or not
allowed a federal tax credit, to be termed the Missouri low-
income housing tax credit, if the commission issues an
eligibility statement for that project.

SB 1188 43
2. For qualified Missouri projects placed in service
after January 1, 1997, the Missouri low-income housing tax
credit available to a project shall be such amount as the
commission shall determine is necessary to ensure the
feasibility of the project, up to an amount equal to the
federal low-income housing tax credit for a qualified
Missouri project, for a federal tax period, and such amount
shall be subtracted from the amount of state tax otherwise
due for the same tax period.
3. No more than six million dollars in tax credits
shall be authorized each fiscal year for projects financed
through tax-exempt bond issuance.
4. The Missouri low-income housing tax credit shall be
taken against the taxes and in the order specified pursuant
to section 32.115. The credit authorized by this section
shall not be refundable. Any amount of credit that exceeds
the tax due for a taxpayer's taxable year may be carried
back to any of the taxpayer's three prior taxable years or
carried forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent
taxable years.
5. All or any portion of Missouri tax credits issued
in accordance with the provisions of sections 135.350 to
135.362 may be allocated to parties who are eligible
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section.
Beginning January 1, 1995, for qualified projects which
began on or after January 1, 1994, an owner of a qualified
Missouri project shall certify to the director the amount of
credit allocated to each taxpayer. The owner of the project
shall provide to the director appropriate information so
that the low-income housing tax credit can be properly
allocated.

SB 1188 44
6. In the event that recapture of Missouri low-income
housing tax credits is required pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 135.355, any statement submitted to the director as
provided in this section shall include the proportion of the
state credit required to be recaptured, the identity of each
taxpayer subject to the recapture and the amount of credit
previously allocated to such taxpayer.
7. The director of the department may promulgate rules
and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of
this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
pursuant to the authority of this section shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of section 536.024.
8. The tax credits authorized under the provisions of
sections 135.350 to 135.362 shall not be subject to
appropriations, as provided under subsection 4 of section
135.835.
135.432. 1. The department of economic development
shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary
to implement the provisions of sections 135.400 to 135.430.
2. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of this chapter shall become effective until it
has been approved by the joint committee on administrative
rules in accordance with the procedures provided in this
section, and the delegation of the legislative authority to
enact law by the adoption of such rules is dependent upon
the power of the joint committee on administrative rules to
review and suspend rules pending ratification by the senate
and the house of representatives as provided in this section.
3. Upon filing any proposed rule with the secretary of
state, the department shall concurrently submit such

SB 1188 45
proposed rule to the committee, which may hold hearings upon
any proposed rule or portion thereof at any time.
4. A final order of rulemaking shall not be filed with
the secretary of state until thirty days after such final
order of rulemaking has been received by the committee. The
committee may hold one or more hearings upon such final
order of rulemaking during the thirty-day period. If the
committee does not disapprove such order of rulemaking
within the thirty-day period, the department may file such
order of rulemaking with the secretary of state and the
order of rulemaking shall be deemed approved.
5. The committee may, by majority vote of the members,
suspend the order of rulemaking or portion thereof by action
taken prior to the filing of the final order of rulemaking
only for one or more of the following grounds:
(1) An absence of statutory authority for the proposed
rule;
(2) An emergency relating to public health, safety or
welfare;
(3) The proposed rule is in conflict with state law;
(4) A substantial change in circumstance since
enactment of the law upon which the proposed rule is based.
6. If the committee disapproves any rule or portion
thereof, the department shall not file such disapproved
portion of any rule with the secretary of state and the
secretary of state shall not publish in the Missouri
Register any final order of rulemaking containing the
disapproved portion.
7. If the committee disapproves any rule or portion
thereof, the committee shall report its findings to the
senate and the house of representatives. No rule or portion
thereof disapproved by the committee shall take effect so

SB 1188 46
long as the senate and the house of representatives ratify
the act of the joint committee by resolution adopted in each
house within thirty legislative days after such rule or
portion thereof has been disapproved by the joint committee.
8. Upon adoption of a rule as provided in this
section, any such rule or portion thereof may be suspended
or revoked by the general assembly either by bill or,
pursuant to Section 8, Article IV of the Constitution of
Missouri, by concurrent resolution upon recommendation of
the joint committee on administrative rules. The committee
shall be authorized to hold hearings and make
recommendations pursuant to the provisions of section
536.037. The secretary of state shall publish in the
Missouri Register, as soon as practicable, notice of the
suspension or revocation.
9. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to sections
135.400 to 135.432 shall automatically sunset August 28,
2032, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) Sections 135.400 to 135.432 shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately following
the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant
to sections 135.400 to 135.432 is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to sections
135.400 to 135.432 prior to the date the program authorized
pursuant to this section is sunset.

SB 1188 47
135.460. 1. This section and sections 620.1100 and
620.1103 shall be known and may be cited as the "Youth
Opportunities and Violence Prevention Act".
2. As used in this section, the term "taxpayer" shall
include corporations as defined in section 143.441 or
143.471, any charitable organization which is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income
tax imposed under chapter 143, and individuals, individual
proprietorships and partnerships.
3. A taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit against
the tax otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265,
chapter 147, chapter 148, or chapter 153 in an amount equal
to thirty percent for property contributions and seventy
percent for monetary contributions of the amount such
taxpayer contributed to the programs described in subsection
5 of this section, not to exceed two hundred thousand
dollars per [taxable] tax year, per taxpayer; except as
otherwise provided in subdivision (5) of subsection 5 of
this section. The department of economic development shall
prescribe the method for claiming the tax credits allowed in
this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
under the authority of this section shall become effective
unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 536. All rulemaking authority delegated prior to
June 27, 1997, is of no force and effect and repealed;
however, nothing in this section shall be interpreted to
repeal or affect the validity of any rule filed or adopted
prior to June 27, 1997, if such rule complied with the
provisions of chapter 536. The provisions of this section
and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers

SB 1188 48
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536,
including the ability to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule or portion of a
rule, are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
purported grant of rulemaking authority and any rule so
proposed and contained in the order of rulemaking shall be
invalid and void.
4. The tax credits allowed by this section shall be
claimed by the taxpayer to offset the taxes that become due
in the taxpayer's tax period in which the contribution was
made. Any tax credit not used in such tax period may be
carried over the next five succeeding tax periods.
5. The tax credit allowed by this section may only be
claimed for monetary or property contributions to public or
private programs authorized to participate pursuant to this
section by the department of economic development and may be
claimed for the development, establishment, implementation,
operation, and expansion of the following activities and
programs:
(1) An adopt-a-school program. Components of the
adopt-a-school program shall include donations for school
activities, seminars, and functions; school-business
employment programs; and the donation of property and
equipment of the corporation to the school;
(2) Expansion of programs to encourage school dropouts
to reenter and complete high school or to complete a
graduate equivalency degree program;
(3) Employment programs. Such programs shall
initially, but not exclusively, target unemployed youth
living in poverty and youth living in areas with a high
incidence of crime;
(4) New or existing youth clubs or associations;

SB 1188 49
(5) Employment/internship/apprenticeship programs in
business or trades for persons less than twenty years of
age, in which case the tax credit claimed pursuant to this
section shall be equal to one-half of the amount paid to the
intern or apprentice in that tax year, except that such
credit shall not exceed ten thousand dollars per person;
(6) Mentor and role model programs;
(7) Drug and alcohol abuse prevention training
programs for youth;
(8) Donation of property or equipment of the taxpayer
to schools, including schools which primarily educate
children who have been expelled from other schools, or
donation of the same to municipalities, or not-for-profit
corporations or other not-for-profit organizations which
offer programs dedicated to youth violence prevention as
authorized by the department;
(9) Not-for-profit, private or public youth activity
centers;
(10) Nonviolent conflict resolution and mediation
programs;
(11) Youth outreach and counseling programs.
6. Any program authorized in subsection 5 of this
section shall, at least annually, submit a report to the
department of economic development outlining the purpose and
objectives of such program, the number of youth served, the
specific activities provided pursuant to such program, the
duration of such program and recorded youth attendance where
applicable.
7. The department of economic development shall, at
least annually submit a report to the Missouri general
assembly listing the organizations participating, services

SB 1188 50
offered and the number of youth served as the result of the
implementation of this section.
8. The tax credit allowed by this section shall apply
to all [taxable] tax years beginning after December 31, 1995.
100 9. For the purposes of the credits described in this
101 section, in the case of a corporation described in section
102 143.471, partnership, limited liability company described in
103 section 347.015, cooperative, marketing enterprise, or
104 partnership, in computing Missouri's tax liability, such
105 credits shall be allowed to the following:
106 (1) The shareholders of the corporation described in
107 section 143.471;
108 (2) The partners of the partnership;
109 (3) The members of the limited liability company; and
110 (4) Individual members of the cooperative or marketing
111 enterprise.
112 Such credits shall be apportioned to the entities described
113 in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection in proportion
114 to their share of ownership on the last day of the
115 taxpayer's tax period.
116 10. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
117 act:
118 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
119 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
120 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
121 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
122 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
123 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
124 sunset; and
125 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
126 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any

SB 1188 51
127 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
128 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
129 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
130 section is sunset.
135.487. 1. To obtain any credit allowed pursuant to
sections 135.475 to 135.487, a taxpayer shall submit to the
department, for preliminary approval, an application for tax
credit. The director shall, upon final approval of an
application and presentation of acceptable proof of
substantial completion of construction, issue the taxpayer a
certificate of tax credit. The director shall issue all
credits allowed pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487 in
the order the applications are received. In the case of a
taxpayer other than an owner-occupant, the director shall
not delay the issuance of a tax credit pursuant to sections
135.475 to 135.487 until the sale of a residence at market
rate for owner-occupancy. A taxpayer, [taxpayer] other than
an owner-occupant who receives a certificate of tax credit
pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487, shall, within
thirty days of the date of the sale of a residence, furnish
to the director satisfactory proof that such residence was
sold at market rate for owner-occupancy. If the director
reasonably determines that a residence was not in good faith
intended for long-term owner occupancy, the director make
revoke any tax credits issued and seek recovery of any tax
credits issued pursuant to section 620.017.
2. The department may cooperate with a municipality or
a county in which a project is located to help identify the
location of the project, the type and eligibility of the
project, the estimated cost of the project and the
completion date of the project.

SB 1188 52
3. The department may promulgate such rules or
regulations or issue administrative guidelines as are
necessary to administer the provisions of sections 135.475
to 135.487. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
pursuant to the authority of this section shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536.
4. The department shall conduct annually a
comprehensive program evaluation illustrating where the tax
credits allowed pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487 are
being utilized, explaining the economic impact of such
program and making recommendations on appropriate program
modifications to ensure the program's success.
5. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to sections
135.475 to 135.487 shall automatically sunset August 28,
2032, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) Sections 135.475 to 135.487 shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately following
the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant
to sections 135.475 to 135.487 is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to sections
135.475 to 135.487 prior to the date the program authorized
pursuant to this section is sunset.
135.490. 1. In order to encourage and foster
community improvement, an eligible small business, as
defined in Section 44 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be
allowed a credit not to exceed five thousand dollars against

SB 1188 53
the tax otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143, not including
sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty
percent of all eligible access expenditures exceeding the
monetary cap provided by Section 44 of the Internal Revenue
Code. For purposes of this section, "eligible access
expenditures" means amounts paid or incurred by the taxpayer
in order to comply with applicable access requirements
provided by the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, as
further defined in Section 44 of the Internal Revenue Code
and federal rulings interpreting Section 44 of the Internal
Revenue Code.
2. The department of economic development shall
prescribe the method for submitting applications for
claiming the tax credit allowed by this section. After
issuance of a tax credit certificate by the department of
economic development, such tax credit shall be [claimed]
redeemed by [the taxpayer at the time such taxpayer files a]
filing a copy of the tax credit certificate with the
taxpayer's income tax return for the tax year for which such
credit was issued. Any amount of tax credit which exceeds
the tax due shall be carried over to any subsequent
[taxable] tax year, but shall not be refunded and shall not
be transferable.
3. On and after August 28, 2026, the director of the
department of economic development [and the director of the
department of revenue] shall [jointly] administer the tax
credit authorized by this section. [Both] The director of
the department of economic development [and the director of
the department of revenue are] is authorized to promulgate
rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions
of this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
pursuant to the authority of this section shall become

SB 1188 54
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536.
4. The provisions of this section shall become
effective on January 1, 2000, and shall apply to all
[taxable] tax years beginning after December 31, 1999.
5. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department of economic
development under this section shall not exceed the total
cap amount, which shall be an amount equal to the highest
annual amount of tax credits issued in any one previous
fiscal year, from fiscal year 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as
determined and calculated by the department.
(2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.

SB 1188 55
135.530. For the purposes of sections [100.010,]
100.710, 100.850, 135.110, [135.200, 135.258, 135.313,]
135.403, 135.405, [135.503,] 135.530, [135.545,] and
215.030, [348.300, 348.302, and 620.1400 to 620.1460,]
"distressed community" means either a Missouri municipality
within a metropolitan statistical area which has a median
household income of under seventy percent of the median
household income for the metropolitan statistical area,
according to the United States Census Bureau's American
Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-year
period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate
ends in either zero or five, or a United States census block
group or contiguous group of block groups within a
metropolitan statistical area which has a population of at
least two thousand five hundred, and each block group having
a median household income of under seventy percent of the
median household income for the metropolitan area in
Missouri, according to the United States Census Bureau's
American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-
year period estimate data in which the final year of the
estimate ends in either zero or five. In addition the
definition shall include municipalities not in a
metropolitan statistical area, with a median household
income of under seventy percent of the median household
income for the nonmetropolitan areas in Missouri according
to the United States Census Bureau's American Community
Survey, based on the most recent of five-year period
estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends
in either zero or five or a census block group or contiguous
group of block groups which has a population of at least two
thousand five hundred with each block group having a median
household income of under seventy percent of the median

SB 1188 56
household income for the nonmetropolitan areas of Missouri,
according to the United States Census Bureau's American
Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-year
period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate
ends in either zero or five. In metropolitan statistical
areas, the definition shall include areas that were
designated as either a federal empowerment zone; or a
federal enhanced enterprise community; or a state enterprise
zone that was originally designated before January 1, 1986,
but shall not include expansions of such state enterprise
zones done after March 16, 1988.
135.562. 1. If any taxpayer with a federal adjusted
gross income of thirty thousand dollars or less incurs costs
for the purpose of making all or any portion of such
taxpayer's principal dwelling accessible to an individual
with a disability who permanently resides with the taxpayer,
such taxpayer shall receive a tax credit against such
taxpayer's Missouri income tax liability in an amount equal
to the lesser of one hundred percent of such costs or two
thousand five hundred dollars per taxpayer, per tax year.
2. Any taxpayer with a federal adjusted gross income
greater than thirty thousand dollars but less than sixty
thousand dollars who incurs costs for the purpose of making
all or any portion of such taxpayer's principal dwelling
accessible to an individual with a disability who
permanently resides with the taxpayer shall receive a tax
credit against such taxpayer's Missouri income tax liability
in an amount equal to the lesser of fifty percent of such
costs or two thousand five hundred dollars per taxpayer per
tax year. No taxpayer shall be eligible to receive tax
credits under this section in any tax year immediately

SB 1188 57
following a tax year in which such taxpayer received tax
credits under the provisions of this section.
3. Tax credits issued under this section may be
refundable in an amount not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars per tax year.
4. Eligible costs for which the credit may be claimed
include:
(1) Constructing entrance or exit ramps;
(2) Widening exterior or interior doorways;
(3) Widening hallways;
(4) Installing handrails or grab bars;
(5) Moving electrical outlets and switches;
(6) Installing stairway lifts;
(7) Installing or modifying fire alarms, smoke
detectors, and other alerting systems;
(8) Modifying hardware of doors; or
(9) Modifying bathrooms.
5. The tax credits allowed, including the maximum
amount that may be claimed, under this section shall be
reduced by an amount sufficient to offset any amount of such
costs a taxpayer has already deducted from such taxpayer's
federal adjusted gross income or to the extent such taxpayer
has applied any other state or federal income tax credit to
such costs.
6. [A taxpayer shall claim a] The tax credit allowed
by this section [in the same tax year as the credit is
issued, and at the time such], after issuance of a tax
credit certificate by the department of economic
development, shall be redeemed by filing a copy of the tax
credit certificate when the taxpayer files his or her
Missouri income tax return[;] for the tax year for which

SB 1188 58
such credit was issued, provided that such return is timely
filed.
7. The department of economic development may, in
consultation with the department of social services,
promulgate such rules or regulations as are necessary to
administer the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
8. The provisions of this section shall apply to all
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2008.
9. The provisions of this section shall expire
December 31, 2025, unless reauthorized by the general
assembly. This section shall terminate on September first
of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year
in which the program authorized under this section is
sunset. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to limit or in any way impair the [department's]
department of revenue's ability to redeem tax credits
authorized on or before the date the program authorized
under this section expires or a taxpayer's ability to redeem
such tax credits.
10. In no event shall the aggregate amount of all tax
credits allowed under this section exceed one hundred

SB 1188 59
thousand dollars in any given fiscal year. The tax credits
issued pursuant to this section shall be on a first-come,
first-served filing basis.
11. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
economic development shall administer the tax credit
provided under this section.
135.647. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of social services;
(2) "Local food pantry", any food pantry that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Distributing emergency food supplies to Missouri
low-income people who would otherwise not have access to
food supplies in the area in which the taxpayer claiming the
tax credit under this section resides;
[(2)] (3) "Local homeless shelter", any homeless
shelter that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Providing temporary living arrangements, in the
area in which the taxpayer claiming the tax credit under
this section resides, for individuals and families who
otherwise lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence and lack the resources or support networks to
obtain other permanent housing;
[(3)] (4) "Local soup kitchen", any soup kitchen that
is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Providing prepared meals through an established
congregate feeding operation to needy, low-income persons

SB 1188 60
including, but not limited to, homeless persons in the area
in which the taxpayer claiming the tax credit under this
section resides;
[(4)] (5) "Taxpayer", an individual, a firm, a partner
in a firm, corporation, or a shareholder in an S corporation
doing business in this state and subject to the state income
tax imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265.
2. (1) Beginning on March 29, 2013, any donation of
cash or food made to a local food pantry on or after January
1, 2013, unless such food is donated after the food's
expiration date, shall be eligible for tax credits as
provided by this section.
(2) Beginning on August 28, 2018, any donation of cash
or food made to a local soup kitchen or local homeless
shelter on or after January 1, 2018, unless such food is
donated after the food's expiration date, shall be eligible
for a tax credit as provided under this section.
(3) Any taxpayer who makes a donation that is eligible
for a tax credit under this section shall be allowed a
credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the value of
the donations made to the extent such amounts that have been
subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or federal
taxable income are added back in the determination of
Missouri adjusted gross income or Missouri taxable income
before the credit can be [claimed] redeemed. Each taxpayer
claiming a tax credit under this section shall file an
affidavit with the [income tax return] application to the
department of social services verifying the amount of their
contributions. The department shall prescribe the method

SB 1188 61
for submitting applications for claiming the tax credit
allowed by this section. After issuance of a tax credit
certificate by the department, such tax credit shall be
redeemed by filing a copy of the tax credit certificate with
the taxpayer's income tax return for the tax year for which
such credit was issued. The amount of the tax credit
claimed shall not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state
tax liability for the tax year that the credit is claimed
and shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per
taxpayer claiming the credit. Any amount of credit that the
taxpayer is prohibited by this section from claiming in a
tax year shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward
to any of the taxpayer's three subsequent tax years. No tax
credit granted under this section shall be transferred,
sold, or assigned. No taxpayer shall be eligible to receive
a credit pursuant to this section if such taxpayer employs
persons who are not authorized to work in the United States
under federal law. No taxpayer shall be able to claim more
than one credit under this section for a single donation.
3. The cumulative amount of tax credits under this
section which may be allocated to all taxpayers contributing
to a local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local
homeless shelter in any one fiscal year shall not exceed one
million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. The [director
of revenue] department shall establish a procedure by which
the cumulative amount of tax credits issued is apportioned
among all taxpayers [claiming] filing an application for the
credit [by April fifteenth of the] in that fiscal year [in
which the tax credit is claimed]. To the maximum extent
possible, the [director of revenue] department shall
establish the procedure described in this subsection in such
a manner as to ensure that taxpayers can claim all the tax

SB 1188 62
credits possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits
available for the fiscal year.
4. Any local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local
homeless shelter may accept or reject any donation of food
made under this section for any reason. For purposes of
this section, any donations of food accepted by a local food
pantry, local soup kitchen, or local homeless shelter shall
be valued at fair market value, or at wholesale value if the
taxpayer making the donation of food is a retail grocery
100 store, food broker, wholesaler, or restaurant.
101 5. The department of [revenue] social services shall
102 promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
103 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
104 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
105 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
106 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
107 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
108 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
109 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
110 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
111 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
112 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
113 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
114 2007, shall be invalid and void.
115 6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
116 (1) The program authorized under this section shall be
117 reauthorized as of August 28, 2018, and shall expire on
118 December 31, 2026, unless reauthorized by the general
119 assembly; and
120 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
121 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in

SB 1188 63
122 which the program authorized under this section is sunset;
123 and
124 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
125 construed to limit or in any way impair a taxpayer's ability
126 to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the date the
127 program authorized under this section expires.
128 7. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
129 social services shall administer the tax credit provided
130 under this section.
135.690. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Community-based faculty preceptor", a physician
or physician assistant who is licensed in Missouri and
provides preceptorships to Missouri medical students or
physician assistant students without direct compensation for
the work of precepting;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of health
and senior services;
(3) "Division", the division of professional
registration of the department of commerce and insurance;
(4) "Federally Qualified Health Center (FQHC)", a
reimbursement designation from the Bureau of Primary Health
Care and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of
the United States Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) "Medical student", an individual enrolled in a
Missouri medical college approved and accredited as
reputable by the American Medical Association or the Liaison
Committee on Medical Education or enrolled in a Missouri
osteopathic college approved and accredited as reputable by
the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation;
(6) "Medical student core preceptorship" or "physician
assistant student core preceptorship", a preceptorship for a

SB 1188 64
medical student or physician assistant student that provides
a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of community-based
instruction in family medicine, internal medicine,
pediatrics, psychiatry, or obstetrics and gynecology under
the guidance of a community-based faculty preceptor. A
community-based faculty preceptor may add together the
amounts of preceptorship instruction time separately
provided to multiple students in determining whether he or
she has reached the minimum hours required under this
subdivision, but the total preceptorship instruction time
provided shall equal at least one hundred twenty hours in
order for such preceptor to be eligible for the tax credit
authorized under this section;
(7) "Physician assistant student", an individual
participating in a Missouri physician assistant program
accredited by the Accreditation Review Commission on
Education for the Physician Assistant or its successor
organization;
(8) "Taxpayer", any individual, firm, partner in a
firm, corporation, or shareholder in an S corporation doing
business in this state and subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
2. (1) Beginning January 1, 2023, any community-based
faculty preceptor who serves as the community-based faculty
preceptor for a medical student core preceptorship or a
physician assistant student core preceptorship shall be
allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed under sections
143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to one thousand
dollars for each preceptorship, up to a maximum of three
thousand dollars per tax year, if he or she completes up to

SB 1188 65
three preceptorship rotations during the tax year and did
not receive any direct compensation for the preceptorships.
(2) To receive the credit allowed by this section, a
community-based faculty preceptor shall claim such credit on
his or her return for the tax year in which he or she
completes the preceptorship rotations and shall submit
supporting documentation as prescribed by the division and
the department.
(3) In no event shall the total amount of a tax credit
authorized under this section exceed a taxpayer's income tax
liability for the tax year for which such credit is
claimed. No tax credit authorized under this section shall
be allowed a taxpayer against his or her tax liability for
any prior or succeeding tax year.
(4) No more than two hundred preceptorship tax credits
shall be authorized under this section for any one calendar
year. The tax credits shall be awarded on a first-come,
first-served basis. The division and the department shall
jointly promulgate rules for determining the manner in which
taxpayers who have obtained certification under this section
are able to claim the tax credit. The cumulative amount of
tax credits awarded under this section shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars per year.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (4)
of this subsection, the department is authorized to exceed
the two hundred thousand dollars per year tax credit program
cap in any amount not to exceed the amount of funds
remaining in the medical preceptor fund, as established
under subsection 3 of this section, as of the end of the
most recent tax year, after any required transfers to the
general revenue fund have taken place in accordance with the
provisions of subsection 3 of this section.

SB 1188 66
3. (1) Funding for the tax credit program authorized
under this section shall be generated by the division from a
license fee increase of seven dollars per license for
physicians and surgeons and from a license fee increase of
three dollars per license for physician assistants. The
license fee increases shall take effect beginning January 1,
2023, based on the underlying license fee rates prevailing
on that date. The underlying license fee rates shall be
determined under section 334.090 and all other applicable
provisions of chapter 334.
(2) (a) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Medical Preceptor Fund", which shall consist of moneys
100 collected under this subsection. The state treasurer shall
101 be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
102 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
103 disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
104 appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used solely by
105 the department and the division for the administration of
106 the tax credit program authorized under this section.
107 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
108 contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
109 biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
110 revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
111 the medical preceptor fund in the same manner as other funds
112 are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
113 investments shall be credited to the fund.
114 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or
115 any other provision of law to the contrary, all revenue from
116 the license fee increases described under subdivision (1) of
117 this subsection shall be deposited in the medical preceptor
118 fund. After the end of every tax year, an amount equal to
119 the total dollar amount of all tax credits claimed under

SB 1188 67
120 this section shall be transferred from the medical preceptor
121 fund to the state's general revenue fund established under
122 section 33.543. Any excess moneys in the medical preceptor
123 fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred
124 to the general revenue fund.
125 4. (1) The department shall administer the tax credit
126 program authorized under this section. Each taxpayer
127 claiming a tax credit under this section shall file an
128 application with the department verifying the number of
129 hours of instruction and the amount of the tax credit
130 claimed. The hours claimed on the application shall be
131 verified by the college or university department head or the
132 program director on the application. The certification by
133 the department affirming the taxpayer's eligibility for the
134 tax credit provided to the taxpayer shall be filed with the
135 taxpayer's income tax return.
136 (2) No amount of any tax credit allowed under this
137 section shall be refundable. No tax credit allowed under
138 this section shall be transferred, sold, or assigned. No
139 taxpayer shall be eligible to receive the tax credit
140 authorized under this section if such taxpayer employs
141 persons who are not authorized to work in the United States
142 under federal law.
143 5. The department of commerce and insurance and the
144 department of health and senior services shall jointly
145 promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
146 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
147 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
148 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
149 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
150 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
151 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and

SB 1188 68
152 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
153 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
154 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
155 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
156 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
157 2022, shall be invalid and void.
158 6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
159 act:
160 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
161 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
162 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
163 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
164 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
165 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
166 sunset; and
167 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
168 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
169 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
170 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
171 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
172 section is sunset.
135.750. 1. This section shall be known and may be
referred to as the "Show MO Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Above-the-line individual", any individual hired
or credited on screen for a qualified motion media
production project as any type of producer, principal cast
that is at a Screen Actors Guild Schedule F and above
payment rate, screenwriter, and the director;
(2) "Qualified motion media production project", any
film or series production, including videos, commercials,
video games, webisodes, music videos, content-based mobile

SB 1188 69
applications, virtual reality, augmented reality, multi-
media, and new media, as well as standalone visual effects
and postproduction for such motion media production project,
as approved by the department of economic development and
the office of the Missouri film commission, that features a
statement and logo designated by the department of economic
development in the credits of the completed production
indicating that the project was filmed in Missouri and that
is under thirty minutes in length with expected qualifying
expenses in excess of fifty thousand dollars or is over
thirty minutes in length with expected qualifying expenses
in excess of one hundred thousand dollars. Regardless of
the production costs, qualified motion media project shall
not include any:
(a) News or current events programming;
(b) Talk show;
(c) Production produced primarily for industrial,
corporate, or institutional purposes, and for internal use;
(d) Sports event or sports program;
(e) Gala presentation or awards show;
(f) Infomercial or any production that directly
solicits funds;
(g) Political ad;
(h) Production that is considered obscene, as defined
in section 573.010;
(3) "Qualifying expenses", the sum of the total amount
spent in this state for the following by a production
company in connection with a qualified motion media
production project:
(a) Goods and services leased or purchased by the
production company. For goods with a purchase price of
twenty-five thousand dollars or more, the amount included in

SB 1188 70
qualifying expenses shall be the purchase price less the
fair market value of the goods at the time the production is
completed;
(b) Compensation and wages paid by the production
company on which the production company remitted withholding
payments to the department of revenue under chapter 143.
For purposes of this section, compensation and wages paid to
all above-the-line individuals shall be limited to twenty-
five percent of the overall qualifying expenses;
(4) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by
sections 143.191 to 143.265, or otherwise due under chapter
148;
(5) "Taxpayer", any individual, partnership, or
corporation as described in section 143.441, 143.471, or
section 148.370 that is subject to the tax imposed in
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265, or the tax imposed in chapter 148 or any
charitable organization which is exempt from federal income
tax and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if
any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2023, a taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit
equal to twenty percent of qualifying expenses.
(2) An additional five percent may be earned for
qualifying expenses if at least fifty percent of the
qualified motion media production project is filmed in
Missouri.
(3) An additional five percent may be earned for
qualifying expenses if at least fifteen percent of the

SB 1188 71
qualified motion media production project that is filmed in
Missouri takes place in a rural or blighted area in Missouri.
(4) An additional five percent may be earned for
qualifying expenses if at least three departments of the
qualified motion media production hire a Missouri resident
ready to advance to the next level in a specialized craft
position or learn a new skillset.
(5) An additional five percent may be earned for
qualifying expenses if the department of economic
development determines that the script of the qualified
motion media production project positively markets a city or
region of the state, the entire state, or a tourist
attraction located in the state, and the qualified motion
media production provides no less than five high resolution
photographs containing cast with the rights cleared for
promotional use by the Missouri film commission, accompanied
by a list with the title of production, location, names, and
titles of the individuals shown in the photography and
photographer credit.
(6) The total dollar amount of tax credits authorized
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
increased by ten percent for qualified film production
projects located in a county of the second, third, or fourth
class.
(7) Activities qualifying a taxpayer for the tax
100 credit pursuant to this subsection shall be approved by the
101 office of the Missouri film commission and the department of
102 economic development.
103 4. A qualified motion media production project shall
104 not be eligible for tax credits pursuant to this section
105 unless such project employs at least the following number of

SB 1188 72
106 Missouri registered apprentices or veterans residing in
107 Missouri with transferable skills:
108 (1) If the qualifying expenses are less than five
109 million dollars, two;
110 (2) If the qualifying expenses are at least five
111 million dollars but less than ten million dollars, three;
112 (3) If the qualifying expenses are at least ten
113 million dollars but less than fifteen million dollars, six;
114 or
115 (4) If the qualifying expenses are at least fifteen
116 million dollars, eight.
117 5. Taxpayers shall apply for the motion media
118 production tax credit by submitting an application to the
119 department of economic development, on a form provided by
120 the department. As part of the application, the expected
121 qualifying expenses of the qualified motion media production
122 project shall be documented. In addition, the application
123 shall include an economic impact statement, showing the
124 economic impact from the activities of the qualified motion
125 media production project. Such economic impact statement
126 shall indicate the impact on the region of the state in
127 which the qualified motion media production or production-
128 related activities are located and on the state as a whole.
129 Final applications shall be accompanied by a report by a
130 certified public accountant licensed by the state of
131 Missouri, prepared at the expense of the applicant,
132 attesting that the amounts in the final application are
133 qualifying expenses.
134 6. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
135 2023, the total amount of tax credits authorized by this
136 section for film production shall not exceed a total of
137 eight million dollars per year, and the total amount of all

SB 1188 73
138 tax credits authorized by this section for series production
139 shall not exceed a total of eight million dollars per year.
140 Taxpayers may carry forward unused credits for up to five
141 tax periods, provided all such credits shall be claimed
142 within ten tax periods following the tax period in which the
143 qualified motion media production or production-related
144 activities for which the credits are certified by the
145 department occurred.
146 7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
147 contrary, any taxpayer may sell, assign, exchange, convey or
148 otherwise transfer tax credits allowed in subsection 3 of
149 this section. The taxpayer acquiring the tax credits may
150 use the acquired credits to offset the tax liabilities
151 otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
152 imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or chapter 148.
153 Unused acquired credits may be carried forward for up to
154 five tax periods, provided all such credits shall be claimed
155 within ten tax periods following the tax period in which the
156 qualified motion media production or production-related
157 activities for which the credits are certified by the
158 department occurred.
159 8. The tax credit authorized by this section shall be
160 considered a business recruitment tax credit, as defined in
161 section 135.800, and shall be subject to the provisions of
162 sections 135.800 to 135.830.
163 9. The department of economic development may adopt
164 such rules, statements of policy, procedures, forms, and
165 guidelines as may be necessary to implement the provisions
166 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
167 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
168 the authority delegated in this section shall become
169 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of

SB 1188 74
170 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
171 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
172 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
173 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
174 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
175 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
176 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
177 2023, shall be invalid and void.
178 10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
179 (1) The provisions of the program authorized under
180 this section shall automatically sunset on December 31,
181 2029, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
182 and
183 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
184 authorized under this section shall automatically sunset on
185 December thirty-first, twelve years after the effective date
186 of the reauthorization of this section; and
187 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of
188 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
189 which the program authorized under this section is sunset;
190 and
191 (4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
192 construed to limit or in any way impair the department's
193 ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the
194 date the program authorized pursuant to this section
195 expires, or a taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.
196 11. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
197 10 of this section to the contrary, the provisions of this
198 section shall automatically terminate and expire one year
199 after the department of economic development determines that
200 all other state and local governments in the United States
201 of America have terminated or let lapse their tax credit or

SB 1188 75
202 other governmental incentive program for the film production
203 industry, regardless of whether such credits or programs are
204 now in effect or first commence after August 28, 2023. The
205 department of economic development shall notify the revisor
206 of statutes upon the department's determination that the tax
207 credit authorized by this section shall terminate pursuant
208 to this subsection.
209 (2) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
210 construed to limit or in any way impair the ability of any
211 taxpayer that has met the requirements in this section prior
212 to the termination of this section to participate in the
213 program authorized under this section. The provisions of
214 this section shall not be construed to limit or in any way
215 impair the department of revenue's ability to redeem tax
216 credits qualified for on or before the date the program
217 authorized pursuant to this section expires.
218 12. The tax credits authorized under this section
219 shall not be subject to appropriations, as provided under
220 subsection 4 of section 135.835.
135.772. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of [revenue]
agriculture;
(2) "Distributor", a person, firm, or corporation
doing business in this state that:
(a) Produces, refines, blends, compounds, or
manufactures motor fuel;
(b) Imports motor fuel into the state; or
(c) Is engaged in distribution of motor fuel;
(3) "Higher ethanol blend", a fuel capable of being
dispensed directly into motor vehicle fuel tanks for

SB 1188 76
consumption that is comprised of at least fifteen percent
but not more than eighty-five percent ethanol;
(4) "Retail dealer", a person, firm, or corporation
doing business in this state that owns or operates a retail
service station in this state;
(5) "Retail service station", a location in this state
from which higher ethanol blend is sold to the general
public and is dispensed directly into motor vehicle fuel
tanks for consumption.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2023, a retail dealer that sells higher ethanol blend at
such retail dealer's retail service station or a distributor
that sells higher ethanol blend directly to the final user
located in this state shall be allowed a tax credit to be
taken against the retail dealer's or distributor's state
income tax liability. The amount of the credit shall equal
five cents per gallon of higher ethanol blend sold by the
retail dealer and dispensed through metered pumps at the
retail dealer's retail service station or by a distributor
directly to the final user located in this state during the
tax year for which the tax credit is claimed. For any
retail dealer or distributor with a tax year beginning prior
to January 1, 2023, but ending during the 2023 calendar
year, such retail dealer or distributor shall be allowed a
tax credit for the amount of higher ethanol blend sold
during the portion of such tax year that occurs during the
2023 calendar year. Tax credits authorized pursuant to this
section shall not be transferred, sold, or assigned. If the
amount of the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's state tax
liability, the difference shall not be refundable but may be
carried forward to any of the five subsequent tax years.
The total amount of tax credits issued pursuant to this

SB 1188 77
section for any given fiscal year shall not exceed five
million dollars.
3. In the event the total amount of tax credits
claimed under this section exceeds the amount of available
tax credits, the tax credits shall be apportioned among all
eligible retail dealers and distributors claiming a tax
credit by April fifteenth, or as directed by section
143.851, of the fiscal year in which the tax credit is
claimed.
4. The department shall prescribe the method for
submitting applications for claiming the tax credit allowed
by this section [shall be claimed by such taxpayer at the
time such taxpayer files a return and]. After issuance of a
tax credit certificate by the department, such tax credit
shall be redeemed by filing a copy of the tax credit
certificate with the taxpayer's income tax return for the
tax year for which such credit was issued. Such tax credit
shall be applied against the income tax liability imposed by
chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax imposed by
sections 143.191 to 143.265, after reduction for all other
credits allowed thereon. The department may require any
documentation it deems necessary to implement the provisions
of this section.
5. The department of agriculture shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to

SB 1188 78
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
January 2, 2023, shall be invalid and void.
6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of this section shall automatically
sunset on December 31, 2028, unless reauthorized by an act
of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
authorized under this section shall automatically sunset
twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
7. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
agriculture shall administer the tax credit provided under
this section.
135.775. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Biodiesel blend", a blend of diesel fuel and
biodiesel fuel of at least five percent and not more than
twenty percent for on-road and off-road diesel-fueled
vehicle use;
(2) "Biodiesel fuel", a renewable, biodegradable, mono
alkyl ester combustible liquid fuel that is derived from
agricultural and other plant oils or animal fats and that
meets the most recent version of the ASTM International
D6751 Standard Specification for Biodiesel Fuel Blend
Stock. A fuel shall be deemed to be biodiesel fuel if the
fuel consists of a pure B100 or B99 ratio. Biodiesel
produced from palm oil is not biodiesel fuel for the

SB 1188 79
purposes of this section unless the palm oil is contained
within waste oil and grease collected within the United
States;
(3) "B99", a blend of ninety-nine percent biodiesel
fuel that meets the most recent version of the ASTM
International D6751 Standard Specification for Biodiesel
Fuel Blend Stock with a minimum of one-tenth of one percent
and maximum of one percent diesel fuel that meets the most
recent version of the ASTM International D975 Standard
Specification for Diesel Fuel;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of [revenue]
agriculture;
(5) "Distributor", a person, firm, or corporation
doing business in this state that:
(a) Produces, refines, blends, compounds, or
manufactures motor fuel;
(b) Imports motor fuel into the state; or
(c) Is engaged in distribution of motor fuel;
(6) "Retail dealer", a person, firm, or corporation
doing business in this state that owns or operates a retail
service station in this state;
(7) "Retail service station", a location in this state
from which biodiesel blend is sold to the general public and
is dispensed directly into motor vehicle fuel tanks for
consumption at retail.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2023, a retail dealer that sells a biodiesel blend at a
retail service station or a distributor that sells a
biodiesel blend directly to the final user located in this
state shall be allowed a tax credit to be taken against the
retail dealer or distributor's state income tax liability.
For any retail dealer or distributor with a tax year

SB 1188 80
beginning prior to January 1, 2023, but ending during the
2023 calendar year, such retail dealer or distributor shall
be allowed a tax credit for the amount of biodiesel blend
sold during the portion of such tax year that occurs during
the 2023 calendar year. The amount of the credit shall be
equal to:
(1) Two cents per gallon of biodiesel blend of at
least five percent but not more than ten percent sold by the
retail dealer at a retail service station or by a
distributor directly to the final user located in this state
during the tax year for which the tax credit is claimed; and
(2) Five cents per gallon of biodiesel blend in excess
of ten percent but not more than twenty percent sold by the
retail dealer at a retail service station or by a
distributor directly to the final user located in this state
during the tax year for which the tax credit is claimed.
3. Tax credits authorized under this section shall not
be transferred, sold, or assigned. If the amount of the tax
credit exceeds the taxpayer's state tax liability, the
difference shall be refundable. The total amount of tax
credits issued under this section for any given fiscal year
shall not exceed sixteen million dollars.
4. In the event the total amount of tax credits
claimed under this section exceeds the amount of available
tax credits, the tax credits shall be apportioned among all
eligible retail dealers and distributors claiming a tax
credit by April fifteenth, or as directed by section
143.851, of the fiscal year in which the tax credit is
claimed.
5. The department shall prescribe the method for
submitting applications for claiming the tax credit allowed
by this section [shall be claimed by such taxpayer at the

SB 1188 81
time such taxpayer files a return] and such tax credit shall
be applied against the income tax liability imposed by
chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax imposed by
sections 143.191 to 143.265, after reduction for all other
credits allowed thereon. The department may require any
documentation it deems necessary to administer the
provisions of this section. The tax credit allowed by this
section, after issuance by the department, shall be redeemed
on the taxpayer's income tax return for the tax year for
which such credit was issued.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057 to
the contrary, the department may work with the division of
weights and measures within the department of agriculture to
validate that the biodiesel blend a retail dealer or
distributor claims for the tax credit authorized under this
section contains a sufficient percentage of biodiesel fuel.
7. The department of agriculture shall promulgate
rules to implement and administer the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created pursuant to the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
100 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
101 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
102 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
103 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
104 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
105 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
106 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
107 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after January 2,
108 2023, shall be invalid and void.
109 8. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

SB 1188 82
110 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under
111 this section shall automatically sunset on December 31,
112 2028, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
113 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
114 authorized under this section shall automatically sunset
115 twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
116 of this section; and
117 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of
118 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
119 which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
120 The termination of the program as described in this
121 subsection shall not be construed to preclude any qualified
122 taxpayer who claims any benefit under any program that is
123 sunset under this subsection from claiming such benefit for
124 all allowable activities related to such claim that were
125 completed before the program was sunset or to eliminate any
126 responsibility of the department to verify the continued
127 eligibility of qualified individuals receiving tax credits
128 and to enforce other requirements of law that applied before
129 the program was sunset.
130 9. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
131 agriculture shall administer the tax credit provided under
132 this section.
135.778. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Biodiesel fuel", a renewable, biodegradable, mono
alkyl ester combustible liquid fuel that is derived from
agricultural and other plant oils or animal fats and that
meets the most recent version of the ASTM International
D6751 Standard Specification for Biodiesel Fuel Blend
Stock. A fuel shall be deemed to be biodiesel fuel if the
fuel consists of a pure B100 or B99 ratio. Biodiesel

SB 1188 83
produced from palm oil is not biodiesel fuel for the
purposes of this section unless the palm oil is contained
within waste oil and grease collected within the United
States;
(2) "B99", a blend of ninety-nine percent biodiesel
fuel that meets the most recent version of the ASTM
International D6751 Standard Specification for Biodiesel
Fuel Blend Stock with a minimum of one-tenth of one percent
and maximum of one percent diesel fuel that meets the most
recent version of the ASTM International D975 Standard
Specification for Diesel Fuel;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of [revenue]
agriculture;
(4) "Missouri biodiesel producer", a person, firm, or
corporation doing business in this state that produces
biodiesel fuel in this state, is registered with the United
States Environmental Protection Agency according to the
requirements of 40 CFR Part 79, and has begun construction
on such facility or has been selling biodiesel fuel produced
at such facility on or before January 2, 2023.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2023, a Missouri biodiesel producer shall be allowed a tax
credit to be taken against the producer's state income tax
liability. For any Missouri biodiesel producer with a tax
year beginning prior to January 1, 2023, but ending during
the 2023 calendar year, such Missouri biodiesel producer
shall be allowed a tax credit for the amount of biodiesel
fuel produced during the portion of such tax year that
occurs during the 2023 calendar year. The amount of the tax
credit shall be two cents per gallon of biodiesel fuel
produced by the Missouri biodiesel producer during the tax
year for which the tax credit is claimed.

SB 1188 84
3. Tax credits authorized under this section shall not
be transferred, sold, or assigned. If the amount of the tax
credit exceeds the taxpayer's state tax liability, the
difference shall be refundable. The total amount of tax
credits issued under this section for any given fiscal year
shall not exceed five million five hundred thousand dollars,
which shall be authorized on a first-come, first-served
basis.
4. The department shall prescribe the method for
submitting applications for claiming the tax credit
authorized under this section [shall be claimed by such
taxpayer at the time such taxpayer files a return] and such
tax credit shall be applied against the income tax liability
imposed by chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax
imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, after reduction for
all other credits allowed thereon. The department may
require any documentation it deems necessary to administer
the provisions of this section. The tax credit allowed by
this section, after issuance by the department, shall be
redeemed on the taxpayer's income tax return for the tax
year for which such credit was issued.
5. The department of agriculture shall promulgate
rules to implement and administer the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created pursuant to the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently

SB 1188 85
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after January 2,
2023, shall be invalid and void.
6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under
this section shall automatically sunset on December 31,
2028, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
authorized under this section shall automatically sunset
twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
The termination of the program as described in this
subsection shall not be construed to preclude any qualified
taxpayer who claims any benefit under any program that is
sunset under this subsection from claiming such benefit for
all allowable activities related to such claim that were
completed before the program was sunset, or to eliminate any
responsibility of the department to verify the continued
eligibility of qualified individuals receiving tax credits
and to enforce other requirements of law that applied before
the program was sunset.
7. On and after August 28, 2026, the department of
agriculture shall administer the tax credit provided under
100 this section.
135.800. 1. The provisions of sections 135.800 to
135.830 shall be known and may be cited as the "Tax Credit
Accountability Act of 2004".
2. As used in sections 135.800 to 135.830, the
following terms mean:

SB 1188 86
(1) "Administering agency", the state agency or
department charged with administering a particular tax
credit program, as set forth by the program's enacting
statute; where no department or agency is set forth, the
department of revenue;
(2) "Agricultural tax credits", the agricultural
product utilization contributor tax credit created pursuant
to section 348.430, the new generation cooperative incentive
tax credit created pursuant to section 348.432, and the
family farm breeding livestock loan tax credit created under
section 348.505[, the qualified beef tax credit created
under section 135.679, and the wine and grape production tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.700];
(3) "Business recruitment tax credits", the business
facility tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.110 to
135.150 and section 135.258, the enterprise zone tax
benefits created pursuant to sections 135.200 to 135.270,
the business use incentives for large-scale development
programs created pursuant to sections 100.700 to 100.850,
[the development tax credits created pursuant to sections
32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding communities tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.535,] and the [film
production] show MO act tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.750[, the enhanced enterprise zone created
pursuant to sections 135.950 to 135.970, and the Missouri
quality jobs program created pursuant to sections 620.1875
to 620.1900];
(4) "Community development tax credits", the
neighborhood assistance tax credit created pursuant to
sections 32.100 to 32.125[,] and the family development
account tax credit created pursuant to sections 208.750 to
208.775[, the dry fire hydrant tax credit created pursuant

SB 1188 87
to section 320.093, and the transportation development tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.545];
(5) "Domestic and social tax credits", the youth
opportunities tax credit created pursuant to section 135.460
and sections 620.1100 to 620.1103, the shelter for victims
of domestic violence or rape crisis center created pursuant
to section 135.550, the senior citizen or disabled person
property tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.010 to
135.035, the adoption tax credit created pursuant to
sections 135.325 to 135.339, the champion for children tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.341, the maternity
home tax credit created pursuant to section 135.600, the
surviving spouse tax credit created pursuant to section
135.090, the residential treatment agency tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.1150, the pregnancy resource center
tax credit created pursuant to section 135.630, the food
pantry tax credit created pursuant to section 135.647, the
residential dwelling access tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.562, the developmental disability care provider
tax credit created under section 135.1180, the shared care
tax credit created pursuant to section 192.2015, [the
health, hunger, and hygiene tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.1125,] and the diaper bank tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.621;
(6) "Entrepreneurial tax credits", the capital tax
credit created pursuant to sections 135.400 to [135.429, the
certified capital company tax credit created pursuant to
sections 135.500 to 135.529, the seed capital tax credit
created pursuant to sections 348.300 to 348.318, the new
enterprise creation tax credit created pursuant to sections
620.635 to 620.653] 135.432, the research tax credit created
pursuant to section 620.1039, and the small business

SB 1188 88
incubator tax credit created pursuant to section 620.495[,
the guarantee fee tax credit created pursuant to section
135.766, and the new generation cooperative tax credit
created pursuant to sections 32.105 to 32.125];
(7) "Environmental tax credits", [the charcoal
producer tax credit created pursuant to section 135.313,]
the wood energy tax credit created pursuant to sections
135.300 to 135.311[, and the alternative fuel stations tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.710];
(8) "Financial and insurance tax credits", the bank
franchise tax credit created pursuant to section 148.030,
the bank tax credit for S corporations created pursuant to
section 143.471, the exam fee tax credit created pursuant to
section 148.400, the health insurance pool tax credit
created pursuant to section 376.975, the life and health
insurance guaranty association tax credit created pursuant
to section 376.745, the property and casualty guaranty
association tax credit created pursuant to section 375.774,
and the self-employed health insurance tax credit created
pursuant to section 143.119;
(9) "Housing tax credits", the neighborhood
preservation tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.475
to 135.487, the low-income housing tax credit created
pursuant to sections 135.350 to 135.363, and the affordable
housing tax credit created pursuant to sections 32.105 to
32.125;
(10) "Recipient", the individual or entity who both:
(a) Is the original applicant for a tax credit; and
(b) Who directly receives a tax credit or the right to
transfer a tax credit under a tax credit program, regardless
100 as to whether the tax credit has been used or redeemed; a

SB 1188 89
101 recipient shall not include the transferee of a transferable
102 tax credit;
103 (11) "Redevelopment tax credits", the historic
104 preservation tax credit created pursuant to sections 253.545
105 to 253.559, the brownfield redevelopment program tax credit
106 created pursuant to sections 447.700 to 447.718, the
107 community development corporations tax credit created
108 pursuant to sections 135.400 to [135.430] 135.432, the
109 infrastructure tax credit created pursuant to subsection 6
110 of section 100.286, the bond guarantee tax credit created
111 pursuant to section 100.297, and the disabled access tax
112 credit created pursuant to section 135.490[, the new markets
113 tax credit created pursuant to section 135.680, and the
114 distressed areas land assemblage tax credit created pursuant
115 to section 99.1205];
116 (12) "Tax credit program", any of the tax credit
117 programs included in the definitions of agricultural tax
118 credits, business recruitment tax credits, community
119 development tax credits, domestic and social tax credits,
120 entrepreneurial tax credits, environmental tax credits,
121 housing tax credits, redevelopment tax credits, and training
122 and educational tax credits;
123 (13) "Training and educational tax credits", the
124 Missouri works new jobs tax credit and Missouri works
125 retained jobs credit created pursuant to sections 620.800 to
126 620.809.
135.835. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
construed, wherever necessary, to be in addition to existing
requirements, duties, or obligations present in other
provisions of law with regard to all tax credit programs.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, in enacting any law creating a new tax credit or

SB 1188 90
increasing the cumulative cap amount of an existing tax
credit, the general assembly shall repeal, modify, or reduce
the total amount of an existing tax credit or tax credits to
ensure that the amount available to taxpayers is less than
or equal to the total amount reduced as a result of the
newly created tax credit program or the increased cumulative
cap amount on the existing tax credit program.
3. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, all tax credits issued on or after such date shall not
be carried forward beyond three years, if carry forward
provisions are applicable.
4. (1) Except as provided under subdivision (2) of
this subsection, for all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, all tax credits shall be subject to
appropriation. If no appropriation is made for a tax credit
program, such tax credit shall not be issued for that fiscal
year.
(2) The following tax credits shall be exempt from the
appropriation requirement under subdivision (1) of this
subsection:
(a) The Missouri low-income housing tax credits
created under sections 135.350 to 135.363;
(b) The show MO act tax credits created under section
135.750;
(c) The self-employed health insurance tax credit
created under section 143.119;
(d) The Missouri working family tax credit created
under section 143.177;
(e) The SALT parity tax credits created under section
143.436;
(f) The bank tax credits for S corporations created
under section 143.471; and

SB 1188 91
(g) The bank franchise tax credit created under
section 148.030.
5. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to limit or in any way impair a taxpayer's ability
to redeem tax credits or an administering agency's ability
to issue tax credits authorized prior to January 1, 2027.
135.1150. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Residential Treatment Agency Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued
under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of social
services;
(3) "Eligible donation", donations received from a
taxpayer by an agency that are used solely to provide direct
care services to children who are residents of this state.
Eligible donations may include cash, publicly traded stocks
and bonds, and real estate that will be valued and
documented according to rules promulgated by the department
of social services. For purposes of this section, "direct
care services" include but are not limited to increasing the
quality of care and service for children through improved
employee compensation and training;
(4) "Qualified residential treatment agency" or
"agency", a residential care facility that is licensed under
section 210.484, accredited by the Council on Accreditation
(COA), the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare
Organizations (JCAHO), or the Commission on Accreditation of
Rehabilitation Facilities (CARF), and is under contract with
the Missouri department of social services to provide
treatment services for children who are residents or wards
of residents of this state, and that receives eligible

SB 1188 92
donations. Any agency that operates more than one facility
or at more than one location shall be eligible for the tax
credit under this section only for any eligible donation
made to facilities or locations of the agency which are
licensed and accredited;
(5) "Taxpayer", any of the following individuals or
entities who make an eligible donation to an agency:
(a) A person, firm, partner in a firm, corporation, or
a shareholder in an S corporation doing business in the
state of Missouri and subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143;
(b) A corporation subject to the annual corporation
franchise tax imposed in chapter 147;
(c) An insurance company paying an annual tax on its
gross premium receipts in this state;
(d) Any other financial institution paying taxes to
the state of Missouri or any political subdivision of this
state under chapter 148;
(e) An individual subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143;
(f) Any charitable organization which is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income
tax imposed under chapter 143.
3. For all [taxable] tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2007, any taxpayer shall be allowed a credit
against the taxes otherwise due under chapter 143, 147, or
148, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191
to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the
amount of an eligible donation, subject to the restrictions
in this section. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall
not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state income tax

SB 1188 93
liability in the tax year for which the credit is claimed.
Any amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this
section from claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable,
but may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's four
subsequent [taxable] tax years.
4. To claim the credit authorized in this section, an
agency may submit to the department an application for the
tax credit authorized by this section on behalf of
taxpayers. The department shall verify that the agency has
submitted the following items accurately and completely:
(1) A valid application in the form and format
required by the department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible donation
received, which shall include the name and taxpayer
identification number of the individual making the eligible
donation, the amount of the eligible donation, and the date
the eligible donation was received by the agency; and
(3) Payment from the agency equal to the value of the
tax credit for which application is made.
If the agency applying for the tax credit meets all criteria
required by this subsection, the department shall issue a
certificate in the appropriate amount.
5. An agency may apply for tax credits in an aggregate
amount that does not exceed the payments made by the
department to the agency in the preceding twelve months.
6. Tax credits issued under this section may be
assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, and the
new owner of the tax credit shall have the same rights in
the credit as the taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is
assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a
notarized endorsement shall be filed with the department

SB 1188 94
specifying the name and address of the new owner of the tax
credit or the value of the credit.
7. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department under this
section shall not exceed the total cap amount, which shall
be an amount equal to the highest annual amount of tax
credits issued in any one previous fiscal year, from fiscal
year 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as determined and calculated
by the department.
100 (2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
101 year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
102 under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
103 be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
104 [7.] 8. The department shall promulgate rules to
105 implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
106 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
107 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
108 this section shall become effective only if it complies with
109 and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
110 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
111 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
112 the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
113 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
114 are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
115 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
116 August 28, 2006, shall be invalid and void.
117 9. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
118 act:
119 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
120 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
121 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;

SB 1188 95
122 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
123 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
124 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
125 sunset; and
126 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
127 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
128 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
129 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
130 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
131 section is sunset.
135.1180. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Developmental Disability Care Provider Tax
Credit Program".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued
under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of social
services;
(3) "Eligible donation", donations received by a
provider from a taxpayer that are used solely to provide
direct care services to persons with developmental
disabilities who are residents of this state. Eligible
donations may include cash, publicly traded stocks and
bonds, and real estate that will be valued and documented
according to rules promulgated by the department of social
services. For purposes of this section, "direct care
services" include, but are not limited to, increasing the
quality of care and service for persons with developmental
disabilities through improved employee compensation and
training;
(4) "Qualified developmental disability care provider"
or "provider", a care provider that provides assistance to

SB 1188 96
persons with developmental disabilities, and is accredited
by the Council on Accreditation (COA), the Joint Commission
on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations (JCAHO), or the
Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities
(CARF), or is under contract with the Missouri department of
social services or department of mental health to provide
treatment services for such persons, and that receives
eligible donations. Any provider that operates more than
one facility or at more than one location shall be eligible
for the tax credit under this section only for any eligible
donation made to facilities or locations of the provider
which are licensed or accredited;
(5) "Taxpayer", any of the following individuals or
entities who make an eligible donation to a provider:
(a) A person, firm, partner in a firm, corporation, or
a shareholder in an S corporation doing business in the
state of Missouri and subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143;
(b) A corporation subject to the annual corporation
franchise tax imposed in chapter 147;
(c) An insurance company paying an annual tax on its
gross premium receipts in this state;
(d) Any other financial institution paying taxes to
the state of Missouri or any political subdivision of this
state under chapter 148;
(e) An individual subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143;
(f) Any charitable organization which is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income
tax imposed under chapter 143.

SB 1188 97
3. For all [taxable] tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2012, any taxpayer shall be allowed a credit
against the taxes otherwise due under chapter 143, 147, or
148 excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265 in an amount equal to fifty percent of the amount of
an eligible donation, subject to the restrictions in this
section. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not
exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state income tax
liability in the tax year for which the credit is claimed.
Any amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this
section from claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable,
but may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's four
subsequent [taxable] tax years.
4. To claim the credit authorized in this section, a
provider may submit to the department an application for the
tax credit authorized by this section on behalf of
taxpayers. The department shall verify that the provider
has submitted the following items accurately and completely:
(1) A valid application in the form and format
required by the department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible donation
received, which shall include the name and taxpayer
identification number of the individual making the eligible
donation, the amount of the eligible donation, and the date
the eligible donation was received by the provider; and
(3) Payment from the provider equal to the value of
the tax credit for which application is made.
If the provider applying for the tax credit meets all
criteria required by this subsection, the department shall
issue a certificate in the appropriate amount.

SB 1188 98
5. Tax credits issued under this section may be
assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, and the
new owner of the tax credit shall have the same rights in
the credit as the taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is
assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a
notarized endorsement shall be filed with the department
specifying the name and address of the new owner of the tax
credit or the value of the credit.
6. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department under this
section shall not exceed the total cap amount, which shall
be an amount equal to the highest annual amount of tax
credits issued in any one previous fiscal year, from fiscal
year 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as determined and calculated
by the department.
100 (2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
101 year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
102 under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
103 be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
104 [6.] 7. The department shall promulgate rules to
105 implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
106 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
107 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
108 this section shall become effective only if it complies with
109 and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
110 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
111 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
112 the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
113 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
114 are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

SB 1188 99
115 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
116 August 28, 2012, shall be invalid and void.
117 8. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
118 act:
119 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
120 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
121 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
122 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
123 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
124 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
125 sunset; and
126 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
127 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
128 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
129 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
130 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
131 section is sunset.
137.123. 1. Beginning January 1, 2022, for purposes
of assessing all real property, excluding land, or tangible
personal property associated with a project that uses wind
energy directly to generate electricity, thirty-seven and
one-half percent of the original costs shall be the true
value in money of such property. Such value shall begin the
year immediately following the year of construction of the
property. The original costs shall reflect either:
(1) The actual and documented original property cost
to the taxpayer, as shall be provided by the taxpayer to the
assessor; or
(2) In the absence of actual and documented original
property cost to the taxpayer, the estimated cost of the
property by the assessor, using an authoritative cost guide.

SB 1188 100
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit a project from engaging in enhanced enterprise zone
agreements [under sections 135.950 to 135.973] or similar
tax abatement agreements with state or local officials or to
affect any existing enhanced enterprise zone agreements.
143.119. 1. A self-employed taxpayer, as such term is
used in the federal internal revenue code, who is otherwise
ineligible for the federal income tax health insurance
deduction under Section 162 of the federal internal revenue
code shall be entitled to a credit against the tax otherwise
due under this chapter, excluding withholding tax imposed by
sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to the
portion of such taxpayer's federal tax liability incurred
due to such taxpayer's inclusion of such payments in federal
adjusted gross income. To be eligible for a credit under
this section, the self-employed taxpayer shall have a
Missouri income tax liability, before any other tax credits,
of less than three thousand dollars. The tax credits
authorized under this section shall be nontransferable,
nonrefundable, and shall not be carried back or forward to
any other tax year. A self-employed taxpayer shall not
claim both a tax credit under this section and a subtraction
under section 143.113 for the same tax year.
2. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department under this
section shall not exceed the total cap amount, which shall
be an amount equal to the highest annual amount of tax
credits issued in any one previous fiscal year, from fiscal
year 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as determined and calculated
by the department.

SB 1188 101
(2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
3. The tax credits authorized under this section shall
not be subject to appropriations, as provided under
subsection 4 of section 135.835.
[2.] 4. The director of the department of revenue
shall promulgate rules and regulations to administer the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2007, shall be invalid and void.
[3.] 5. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of this section shall sunset
automatically on December 31, 2028, unless reauthorized by
an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, this section
shall sunset automatically December thirty-first six years
after the effective date of the reauthorization of this
section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in

SB 1188 102
which the program authorized under this section is sunset;
and
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to limit or in any way impair the department's
ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the
date the program authorized pursuant to this section
expires, or a taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.
143.177. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Working Family Tax Credit Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of revenue;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a resident individual with a
filing status of single, head of household, widowed, or
married filing combined who is subject to the tax imposed
under this chapter, excluding withholding tax imposed under
sections 143.191 to 143.265, and who is allowed a federal
earned income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Section 32, as
amended;
(3) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under this chapter, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
3. (1) Beginning with the 2023 calendar year, an
eligible taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit in an amount
equal to a percentage of the amount such taxpayer would
receive under the federal earned income tax credit as such
credit existed under 26 U.S.C. Section 32 as of January 1,
2021, as provided pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection. The tax credit allowed by this section shall be
claimed by such taxpayer at the time such taxpayer files a
return and shall be applied against the income tax liability
imposed by this chapter after reduction for all other

SB 1188 103
credits allowed thereon. If the amount of the credit
exceeds the tax liability, the difference shall not be
refunded to the taxpayer and shall not be carried forward to
any subsequent tax year.
(2) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (3) of
this subsection, the percentage of the federal earned income
tax credit to be allowed as a tax credit pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be ten percent,
which may be increased to twenty percent subject to the
provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection. The
maximum percentage that may be claimed as a tax credit
pursuant to this section shall be twenty percent of the
federal earned income tax credit that may be claimed by such
taxpayer. Any increase in the percentage that may be
claimed as a tax credit shall take effect on January first
of a calendar year and such percentage shall continue in
effect until the next percentage increase occurs. An
increase shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after the increase takes effect.
(3) The initial percentage to be claimed as a tax
credit and any increase in the percentage that may be
claimed pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection shall
only occur if the amount of net general revenue collected in
the previous fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net
general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years
prior to such fiscal year by at least one hundred fifty
million dollars.
(4) For all calendar years beginning on or after
January 1, 2028, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department under this
section shall not exceed the total cap amount, which shall
be an amount equal to the highest annual amount of tax

SB 1188 104
credits issued in any one previous fiscal year, from fiscal
year 2025 to fiscal year 2027, as determined and calculated
by the department.
(5) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a calendar
year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
under subdivision (4) of this subsection, tax credits shall
be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057 to
the contrary, the department shall determine whether any
taxpayer filing a report or return with the department who
did not apply for the credit authorized under this section
may qualify for the credit and, if so, determines a taxpayer
may qualify for the credit, shall notify such taxpayer of
his or her potential eligibility. In making a determination
of eligibility under this section, the department shall use
any appropriate and available data including, but not
limited to, data available from the Internal Revenue
Service, the U.S. Department of Treasury, and state income
tax returns from previous tax years.
5. The department shall prepare an annual report
containing statistical information regarding the tax credits
issued under this section for the previous tax year,
including the total amount of revenue expended, the number
of credits claimed, and the average value of the credits
issued to taxpayers whose earned income falls within various
income ranges determined by the department.
6. The director of the department may promulgate rules
and regulations to administer the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

SB 1188 105
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after January 1,
2023, shall be invalid and void.
7. Tax credits authorized under this section shall not
be subject to the requirements of sections 135.800 to
100 135.830.
101 8. The tax credits authorized under this section shall
102 not be subject to appropriations, as provided under
103 subsection 4 of section 135.835.
104 9. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
105 act:
106 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
107 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2029, unless
108 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
109 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
110 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
111 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
112 sunset; and
113 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
114 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
115 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
116 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
117 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
118 section is sunset.
143.436. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "SALT Parity Act".

SB 1188 106
2. For the purposes of this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Affected business entity", any partnership or S
corporation that elects to be subject to tax pursuant to
subsection 11 of this section;
(2) "Direct member", a member that holds an interest
directly in an affected business entity;
(3) "Indirect member", a member that itself holds an
interest, through a direct or indirect member that is a
partnership or an S corporation, in an affected business
entity;
(4) "Member":
(a) A shareholder of an S corporation;
(b) A partner in a general partnership, a limited
partnership, or a limited liability partnership; or
(c) A member of a limited liability company that is
treated as a partnership or S corporation for federal income
tax purposes;
(5) "Partnership", the same meaning as provided in 26
U.S.C. Section 7701(a)(2), but not including a publicly
traded partnership. The term partnership shall include a
limited liability company that is treated as a partnership
for federal income tax purposes;
(6) "S corporation", a corporation or limited
liability company that is treated as an S corporation for
federal income tax purposes;
(7) "Tax year", the tax year of a partnership or S
corporation for federal income tax purposes.
3. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a tax is hereby imposed on each affected business
entity that is a partnership and that is doing business in
this state. Such affected business entity shall, at the

SB 1188 107
time that the affected business entity's return is due, pay
a tax as determined in this subsection. The sum of the
separately and nonseparately computed income and deduction
items, as described in 26 U.S.C. Section 702(a), of the
affected business entity, to the extent derived from or
connected with sources within this state, as determined
pursuant to section 143.455, shall be decreased by the
percentage deduction that would be allowable to the owners
under section 143.022, and increased or decreased by any
modification made pursuant to sections 143.121 and 143.141
that relates to an item of the affected business entity's
income, gain, loss, or deduction, to the extent derived from
or connected with sources within this state, as determined
pursuant to section 143.455. The resulting amount shall be
the partnership's Missouri net income or loss, which, if
greater than zero, shall be multiplied by the highest rate
of tax used to determine a Missouri income tax liability for
an individual pursuant to section 143.011 to arrive at the
tax due. An affected business entity paying the tax
pursuant to this subsection shall include with the payment
of such taxes each report provided to a member pursuant to
subsection 7 of this section.
(2) If a Missouri net loss is calculated pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection, such net loss may be
carried forward to succeeding tax years for which the
affected business entity elects to be subject to tax
pursuant to subsection 11 of this section until fully used.
4. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a tax is hereby imposed on each affected business
entity that is an S corporation and that is doing business
in this state. Such affected business entity shall, at the
time that the affected business entity's tax return is due,

SB 1188 108
pay a tax as determined in this subsection. The sum of the
separately and nonseparately computed income and deduction
items, as described in 26 U.S.C. Section 1366, of the
affected business entity, to the extent derived from or
connected with sources within this state, as determined
pursuant to section 143.455, shall be decreased by the
percentage deduction that would be allowable to the owners
under section 143.022, and increased or decreased by any
modification made pursuant to sections 143.121 and 143.141
that relates to an item of the affected business entity's
income, gain, loss, or deduction, to the extent derived from
or connected with sources within this state, as determined
pursuant to section 143.455. The resulting amount shall be
the S corporation's Missouri net income or loss, which if
greater than zero, shall be multiplied by the highest rate
of tax used to determine a Missouri income tax liability for
an individual pursuant to section 143.011 to arrive at the
tax due. An affected business entity paying the tax
pursuant to this subsection shall include with the payment
of such taxes each report provided to a member pursuant to
subsection 7 of this section.
(2) If a Missouri net loss is calculated pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this section, such net loss may be
carried forward to succeeding tax years for which the
affected business entity elects to be subject to tax
pursuant to subsection 11 of this section until fully used.
5. (1) If an affected business entity is a direct or
indirect member of another affected business entity, the
member affected business entity shall, when calculating its
Missouri net income or loss pursuant to subsection 3 or 4 of
this section, subtract its distributive share of Missouri
net income or add its distributive share of Missouri net

SB 1188 109
loss from the affected business entity in which it is a
100 direct or indirect member.
101 (2) Any member of an affected business entity may
102 elect not to have tax imposed under this section with
103 respect to the affected business entity's separately and
104 nonseparately computed items described in subsection 3 or 4
105 of this section, as the case may be, and otherwise subject
106 to tax under this section, to the extent such items are
107 allocable to that member; however, any such opt-out election
108 made by a nonresident member shall also comply with
109 subdivision (3) of this subsection. If and to the extent
110 one or more members of the affected business entity make an
111 opt-out election, the affected business entity shall, in
112 computing the tax under this section, subtract the opt-out
113 members' allocable items described in the preceding
114 sentence. The affected business entity shall, in applying
115 the provisions of this section, take into account the effect
116 of any opt-out election on each opt-out member's share of
117 deductions, credits, and any other relevant items.
118 (3) Any opt-out election by a nonresident member shall
119 be effective only if that member has agreed to:
120 (a) File a return in accordance with the provisions of
121 section 143.181 and to make timely payment of all taxes
122 imposed on the member by this state with respect to income
123 of the affected business entity; and
124 (b) Be subject to personal jurisdiction in this state
125 for purposes of the collection of income taxes, together
126 with related interest and penalties, imposed on the member
127 by this state with respect to the income of the affected
128 business entity.
129 (4) An opt-out election shall be considered timely
130 filed for a tax year, and for all subsequent tax years, if

SB 1188 110
131 it is filed before or in conjunction with the annual return
132 for such tax year under section 143.511. If a member of an
133 affected business entity does not timely file an opt-out
134 election for a tax year, that member shall not be precluded
135 from timely filing an opt-out election for subsequent tax
136 years.
137 6. A nonresident individual who is a member shall not
138 be required to file an income tax return pursuant to this
139 chapter for a tax year if, for such tax year, the only
140 source of income derived from or connected with sources
141 within the state for such member, or the member and the
142 member's spouse if a joint federal income tax return is or
143 shall be filed, is from one or more affected business
144 entities and such affected business entity or entities file
145 and pay the tax due under this section.
146 7. Each partnership and S corporation shall report to
147 each of its members, for each tax year, such member's direct
148 pro rata share of the tax imposed pursuant to this section
149 by such partnership or S corporation if it is an affected
150 business entity and its indirect pro rata share of the tax
151 imposed on any affected business entity in which such
152 affected business entity is a direct or indirect member.
153 For each tax year in which it is subject to a tax under this
154 section, the affected business entity shall file an affected
155 business entity tax return on a date prescribed by the
156 director of revenue. The payment of any interest, additions
157 to tax, or penalties shall not be considered part of the tax
158 imposed under this section.
159 8. (1) Each member that is subject to the tax imposed
160 pursuant to section 143.011 or 143.041 shall be entitled to
161 a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 143.011
162 or 143.041. Such credit shall be in an amount equal to such

SB 1188 111
163 member's direct and indirect pro rata share of the tax paid
164 pursuant to this section by any affected business entity of
165 which such member is directly or indirectly a member.
166 (2) If the amount of the credit authorized by this
167 subsection exceeds such member's tax liability for the tax
168 imposed pursuant to section 143.011 or 143.041, the excess
169 amount shall not be refunded but may be carried forward to
170 each succeeding tax year until such credit is fully taken.
171 9. (1) Each member that is subject to the tax imposed
172 pursuant to section 143.011 as a resident or part-year
173 resident of this state shall be entitled to a credit against
174 the tax imposed pursuant to section 143.011 for such
175 member's direct and indirect pro rata share of taxes paid to
176 another state of the United States or to the District of
177 Columbia, on income of any partnership or S corporation of
178 which such person is a member that is derived therefrom,
179 provided the taxes paid to another state of the United
180 States or to the District of Columbia results from a tax
181 that the director of revenue determines is substantially
182 similar to the tax imposed pursuant to this section. Any
183 such credit shall be calculated in a manner to be prescribed
184 by the director of revenue, provided such calculation is
185 consistent with the provisions of this section, and further
186 provided that the limitations provided in subsection 2 of
187 section 143.081 shall apply to the credit authorized by this
188 subsection.
189 (2) If the amount of the credit authorized by this
190 subsection exceeds such member's tax liability for the tax
191 imposed pursuant to section 143.011, the excess amount shall
192 not be refunded and shall not be carried forward.
193 10. (1) Each corporation or fiduciary that is subject
194 to the tax imposed pursuant to section 143.061 or 143.071

SB 1188 112
195 and that is a member, or, in the case of a fiduciary subject
196 to tax under section 143.061, is the fiduciary of an estate
197 or trust that is a member, shall be entitled to a credit
198 against the tax imposed pursuant to section 143.071. Such
199 credit shall be in an amount equal to such corporation's,
200 estate's, or trust's direct and indirect pro rata share of
201 the tax paid pursuant to this section by any affected
202 business entity of which such corporation, estate, or trust
203 is directly or indirectly a member. Such credit shall be
204 applied after all other credits.
205 (2) If the amount of the credit authorized by this
206 subsection exceeds such corporation's or fiduciary's tax
207 liability for the tax imposed pursuant to section 143.061 or
208 143.071, the excess amount shall not be refunded but may be
209 carried forward to each succeeding tax year until such
210 credit is fully taken.
211 11. A partnership or an S corporation may elect to
212 become an affected business entity that is required to pay
213 the tax pursuant to this section. A separate election shall
214 be made for each tax year. Such election shall be made on
215 such form and in such manner as the director of revenue may
216 prescribe by rule. An election made pursuant to this
217 subsection shall be signed by:
218 (1) Each member of the electing entity who is a member
219 at the time the election is filed;
220 (2) Any officer, manager, or member of the electing
221 entity who is authorized to make the election and who
222 attests to having such authorization under penalty of
223 perjury; or
224 (3) The designated affected business entity
225 representative of the electing entity.

SB 1188 113
226 12. The provisions of sections 143.425 and 143.601
227 shall apply to any modifications made to an affected
228 business entity's federal return, and such affected business
229 entity shall pay any resulting underpayment of tax to the
230 extent not already paid pursuant to section 143.425.
231 13. (1) With respect to an action required or
232 permitted to be taken by an affected business entity
233 pursuant to this section, a proceeding under section 143.631
234 for reconsideration by the director of revenue, an appeal to
235 the administrative hearing commission, or a review by the
236 judiciary with respect to such action, a partnership or S
237 corporation shall designate an affected business entity
238 representative for the tax year, and such affected business
239 entity representative shall have the sole authority to act
240 on behalf of the affected business entity, and the affected
241 business entity's members shall be bound by those actions.
242 (2) The department of revenue may establish reasonable
243 qualifications and procedures for designating a person to be
244 the affected business entity representative.
245 (3) The affected business entity representative shall
246 be considered an authorized representative of the affected
247 business entity and its members under section 32.057 for the
248 purposes of compliance with this section, or participating
249 in a proceeding described in subdivision (1) of this
250 subsection.
251 14. The provisions of this section shall only apply to
252 tax years ending on or after December 31, 2022.
253 15. The tax credits authorized under subsections 8, 9,
254 and 10 of this section shall not be subject to
255 appropriations, as provided under subsection 4 of section
256 135.835.

SB 1188 114
257 16. The department of revenue may promulgate rules to
258 implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
259 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
260 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
261 this section shall become effective only if it complies with
262 and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
263 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
264 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
265 the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
266 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
267 are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
268 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
269 August 28, 2022, shall be invalid and void.
143.471. 1. An S corporation, as defined by Section
1361 (a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not be
subject to the taxes imposed by section 143.071, or other
sections imposing income tax on corporations.
2. A shareholder of an S corporation shall determine
such shareholder's S corporation modification and pro rata
share, including its character, by applying the following:
(1) Any modification described in sections 143.121 and
143.141 which relates to an item of S corporation income,
gain, loss, or deduction shall be made in accordance with
the shareholder's pro rata share, for federal income tax
purposes, of the item to which the modification relates.
Where a shareholder's pro rata share of any such item is not
required to be taken into account separately for federal
income tax purposes, the shareholder's pro rata share of
such item shall be determined in accordance with his pro
rata share, for federal income tax purposes, of S
corporation taxable income or loss generally;

SB 1188 115
(2) Each item of S corporation income, gain, loss, or
deduction shall have the same character for a shareholder
pursuant to sections 143.005 to 143.998 as it has for
federal income tax purposes. Where an item is not
characterized for federal income tax purposes, it shall have
the same character for a shareholder as if realized directly
from the source from which realized by the S corporation or
incurred in the same manner as incurred by the S corporation.
3. A nonresident shareholder of an S corporation shall
determine such shareholder's Missouri nonresident adjusted
gross income and his or her nonresident shareholder
modification by applying the provisions of this subsection.
Items shall be determined to be from sources within this
state pursuant to regulations of the director of revenue in
a manner consistent with the division of income provisions
of section 143.451, section 143.461, or section 32.200
(Multistate Tax Compact). In determining the adjusted gross
income of a nonresident shareholder of any S corporation,
there shall be included only that part derived from or
connected with sources in this state of the shareholder's
pro rata share of items of S corporation income, gain, loss
or deduction entering into shareholder's federal adjusted
gross income, as such part is determined pursuant to
regulations prescribed by the director of revenue in
accordance with the general rules in section 143.181. Any
modification described in subsections 2 and 3 of section
143.121 and in section 143.141, which relates to an item of
S corporation income, gain, loss, or deduction shall be made
in accordance with the shareholder's pro rata share, for
federal income tax purposes, of the item to which the
modification relates, but limited to the portion of such
item derived from or connected with sources in this state.

SB 1188 116
4. Notwithstanding subsection 3 of this section to the
contrary, for all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2020, the items referred to in that subsection shall be
determined to be from sources within this state pursuant to
regulations of the director of revenue in a manner
consistent with the division of income provisions of section
143.455 and section 143.461.
5. The director of revenue shall permit S corporations
to file composite returns and to make composite payments of
tax on behalf of its nonresident shareholders not otherwise
required to file a return. If the nonresident shareholder's
filing requirements result solely from one or more interests
in any other partnerships or subchapter S corporations, that
nonresident shareholder may be included in the composite
return.
6. If an S corporation pays or credits amounts to any
of its nonresident individual shareholders as dividends or
as their share of the S corporation's undistributed taxable
income for the [taxable] tax year, the S corporation shall
either timely file with the department of revenue an
agreement as provided in subsection 7 of this section or
withhold Missouri income tax as provided in subsection 8 of
this section. An S corporation that timely files an
agreement as provided in subsection 7 of this section with
respect to a nonresident shareholder for a [taxable] tax
year shall be considered to have timely filed such an
agreement for each subsequent [taxable] tax year. An S
corporation that does not timely file such an agreement for
a [taxable] tax year shall not be precluded from timely
filing such an agreement for subsequent [taxable] tax
years. An S corporation is not required to deduct and

SB 1188 117
withhold Missouri income tax for a nonresident shareholder
if:
(1) The nonresident shareholder not otherwise required
to file a return agrees to have the Missouri income tax due
paid as part of the S corporation's composite return;
(2) The nonresident shareholder not otherwise required
to file a return had Missouri assignable federal adjusted
gross income from the S corporation of less than twelve
hundred dollars;
(3) The S corporation is liquidated or terminated;
(4) Income was generated by a transaction related to
termination or liquidation; or
(5) No cash or other property was distributed in the
current and prior [taxable] tax year.
7. The agreement referred to in subdivision (1) of
subsection 6 of this section is an agreement of a
nonresident shareholder of the S corporation to:
(1) File a return in accordance with the provisions of
100 section 143.481 and to make timely payment of all taxes
101 imposed on the shareholder by this state with respect to
102 income of the S corporation; and
103 (2) Be subject to personal jurisdiction in this state
104 for purposes of the collection of income taxes, together
105 with related interest and penalties, imposed on the
106 shareholder by this state with respect to the income of the
107 S corporation.
108 The agreement will be considered timely filed for a
109 [taxable] tax year, and for all subsequent [taxable] tax
110 years, if it is filed at or before the time the annual
111 return for such [taxable] tax year is required to be filed
112 pursuant to section 143.511.

SB 1188 118
113 8. The amount of Missouri income tax to be withheld is
114 determined by multiplying the amount of dividends or
115 undistributed income allocable to Missouri that is paid or
116 credited to a nonresident shareholder during the [taxable]
117 tax year by the highest rate used to determine a Missouri
118 income tax liability for an individual, except that the
119 amount of the tax withheld may be determined based on
120 withholding tables provided by the director of revenue if
121 the shareholder submits a Missouri withholding allowance
122 certificate.
123 9. An S corporation shall be entitled to recover for a
124 shareholder on whose behalf a tax payment was made pursuant
125 to this section, if such shareholder has no tax liability.
126 10. With respect to S corporations that are banks or
127 bank holding companies, a pro rata share of the tax credit
128 for the tax payable pursuant to chapter 148 shall be allowed
129 against each S corporation shareholders' state income tax as
130 follows, provided the bank otherwise complies with section
131 148.112:
132 (1) The credit allowed by this subsection shall be
133 equal to the bank tax calculated pursuant to chapter 148
134 based on bank income in 1999 and after, on a bank that makes
135 an election pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 1362, and such
136 credit shall be allocated to the qualifying shareholder
137 according to stock ownership, determined by multiplying a
138 fraction, where the numerator is the shareholder's stock,
139 and the denominator is the total stock issued by such bank
140 or bank holding company;
141 (2) The tax credit authorized in this subsection shall
142 be permitted only to the shareholders that qualify as S
143 corporation shareholders, provided the stock at all times
144 during the taxable period qualifies as S corporation stock

SB 1188 119
145 as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 1361, and such stock is held
146 by the shareholder during the taxable period. The credit
147 created by this section on a yearly basis is available to
148 each qualifying shareholder, including shareholders filing
149 joint returns. A bank holding company is not allowed this
150 credit, except that, such credit shall flow through to such
151 bank holding company's qualified shareholders, and be
152 allocated to such shareholders under the same conditions; and
153 (3) In the event such shareholder cannot use all or
154 part of the tax credit in the taxable period of receipt,
155 such shareholder may carry forward such tax credit for a
156 period of the lesser of five years or until used, provided
157 such credits are used as soon as the taxpayer has Missouri
158 taxable income.
159 11. With respect to S corporations that are
160 associations, a pro rata share of the tax credit for the tax
161 payable under chapter 148 shall be allowed against each S
162 corporation shareholders' state income tax as follows,
163 provided the association otherwise complies with section
164 148.655:
165 (1) The credit allowed by this subsection shall be
166 equal to the savings and loan association tax calculated
167 under chapter 148 based on the computations provided in
168 section 148.630 on an association that makes an election
169 under 26 U.S.C. Section 1362, and such credit shall be
170 allocated to the qualifying shareholder according to stock
171 ownership, determined by multiplying a fraction, where the
172 numerator is the shareholder's stock, and the denominator is
173 the total stock issued by the association;
174 (2) The tax credit authorized in this subsection shall
175 be permitted only to the shareholders that qualify as S
176 corporation shareholders, provided the stock at all times

SB 1188 120
177 during the taxable period qualifies as S corporation stock
178 as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 1361, and such stock is held
179 by the shareholder during the taxable period. The credit
180 created by this section on a yearly basis is available to
181 each qualifying shareholder, including shareholders filing
182 joint returns. A savings and loan association holding
183 company is not allowed this credit, except that, such credit
184 shall flow through to such savings and loan association
185 holding company's qualified shareholders, and be allocated
186 to such shareholders under the same conditions; and
187 (3) In the event such shareholder cannot use all or
188 part of the tax credit in the taxable period of receipt,
189 such shareholder may carry forward such tax credit for a
190 period of the lesser of five years or until used, provided
191 such credits are used as soon as the taxpayer has Missouri
192 taxable income.
193 12. With respect to S corporations that are credit
194 institutions, a pro rata share of the tax credit for the tax
195 payable under chapter 148 shall be allowed against each S
196 corporation shareholders' state income tax as follows,
197 provided the credit institution otherwise complies with
198 section 148.657:
199 (1) The credit allowed by this subsection shall be
200 equal to the credit institution tax calculated under chapter
201 148 based on the computations provided in section 148.150 on
202 a credit institution that makes an election under 26 U.S.C.
203 Section 1362, and such credit shall be allocated to the
204 qualifying shareholder according to stock ownership,
205 determined by multiplying a fraction, where the numerator is
206 the shareholder's stock, and the denominator is the total
207 stock issued by such credit institution;

SB 1188 121
208 (2) The tax credit authorized in this subsection shall
209 be permitted only to the shareholders that qualify as S
210 corporation shareholders, provided the stock at all times
211 during the taxable period qualifies as S corporation stock
212 as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 1361, and such stock is held
213 by the shareholder during the taxable period. The credit
214 created by this section on a yearly basis is available to
215 each qualifying shareholder, including shareholders filing
216 joint returns. A credit institution holding company is not
217 allowed this credit, except that, such credit shall flow
218 through to such credit institution holding company's
219 qualified shareholders, and be allocated to such
220 shareholders under the same conditions; and
221 (3) In the event such shareholder cannot use all or
222 part of the tax credit in the taxable period of receipt,
223 such shareholder may carry forward such tax credit for a
224 period of the lesser of five years or until used, provided
225 such credits are used as soon as the taxpayer has Missouri
226 taxable income.
227 13. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
228 July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
229 annually to all taxpayers by the department under
230 subsections 10, 11, and 12 of this section shall not exceed
231 the total cap amount, which shall be an amount equal to the
232 highest annual amount of tax credits issued in any one
233 previous fiscal year, from fiscal year 2024 to fiscal year
234 2026, as determined and calculated by the department.
235 (2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
236 year under subsections 10, 11, and 12 of this section
237 exceeds the total cap determined under subdivision (1) of
238 this subsection, tax credits shall be allowed based on the
239 order in which they were issued.

SB 1188 122
240 14. The tax credits authorized under subsections 10,
241 11, and 12 of this section shall not be subject to
242 appropriations, as provided under subsection 4 of section
243 135.835.
244 15. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
245 act:
246 (1) The program authorized pursuant to subsections 10,
247 11, and 12 of this section shall automatically sunset August
248 28, 2032, unless reauthorized by an act of the general
249 assembly;
250 (2) Subsections 10, 11, and 12 this section shall
251 terminate on September first of the calendar year
252 immediately following the calendar year in which the program
253 authorized pursuant to subsections 10, 11, and 12 of this
254 section is sunset; and
255 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
256 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
257 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
258 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to subsections
259 10, 11, and 12 of this section prior to the date the program
260 authorized pursuant to this section is sunset.
148.030. 1. Every banking institution shall be
subject to an annual tax for the privilege of exercising its
corporate franchises within the state determined in
accordance with subsection 2 of this section.
2. The annual franchise tax imposed by subsection 1 of
this section shall be the sum of the amounts determined
under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection:
(1) For [taxable] tax years beginning after December
31, 1986, the amount determined under this subdivision shall
be determined in accordance with section 147.010;

SB 1188 123
(2) The amount determined under this subdivision shall
be seven percent of the taxpayer's net income for the income
period, from which product shall be subtracted the sum of
the amount determined under subdivision (1) of this
subsection and the credits allowable under subsection 3 of
this section. However, the amount determined under this
subdivision shall not be less than zero.
3. For purposes of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section, the allowable credits are all taxes paid to
the state of Missouri or any political subdivision thereof
during the relevant income period, including, without
limitation, state and local sales and use taxes paid to
seller's, vendors, or the state of Missouri with respect to
the taxpayer's purchases of tangible personal property and
the services enumerated in chapter 144. However, a taxpayer
shall not be entitled to credits for taxes on real estate
and tangible personal property owned by the taxpayer and
held for lease or rental to others, contributions paid
pursuant to the unemployment compensation tax law of
Missouri, taxes imposed by this law, taxes imposed under
chapter 147 for [taxable] tax years after 1985, or state and
local sales and use taxes collected by the taxpayer on its
sales of tangible personal property and the services
enumerated in chapter 144.
4. The tax credits authorized under this section shall
not be subject to appropriations, as provided under
subsection 4 of section 135.835.
148.330. 1. Every such company shall, on or before
the first day of March in each year, make a return, verified
by the affidavit of its president and secretary, or other
authorized officers, to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance stating the amount of all premiums

SB 1188 124
received on account of policies issued in this state by the
company, whether in cash or in notes, during the year ending
on the thirty-first day of December, next preceding. Upon
receipt of such returns the director of the department of
commerce and insurance shall verify the same and certify the
amount of tax due from the various companies on the basis
and at the rates provided in section 148.320, and shall
certify the same to the director of revenue together with
the amount of the quarterly installments to be made as
provided in subsection 2 of this section, on or before the
thirtieth day of April of each year.
2. Beginning January 1, 1983, the amount of the tax
due for that calendar year and each succeeding calendar year
thereafter shall be paid in four approximately equal
estimated quarterly installments, and a fifth reconciling
installment. The first four installments shall be based
upon the tax for the immediately preceding [taxable] tax
year ending on the thirty-first day of December, next
preceding. The quarterly installments shall be made on the
first day of March, the first day of June, the first day of
September and the first day of December. Immediately after
receiving certification from the director of the department
of commerce and insurance of the amount of tax due from the
various companies the director of revenue shall notify and
assess each company the amount of taxes on its premiums for
the calendar year ending on the thirty-first day of
December, next preceding. The director of revenue shall
also notify and assess each company the amount of the
estimated quarterly installments to be made for the calendar
year. If the amount of the actual tax due for any year
exceeds the total of the installments made for such year,
the balance of the tax due shall be paid on the first day of

SB 1188 125
June of the year following, together with the regular
quarterly payment due at that time. If the total amount of
the tax actually due is less than the total amount of the
installments actually paid, the amount by which the amount
paid exceeds the amount due shall be credited against the
tax for the following year and deducted from the quarterly
installment otherwise due on the first day of June. If the
March first quarterly installment made by a company is less
than the amount assessed by the director of revenue, the
difference will be due on June first, but no interest will
accrue to the state on the difference unless the amount paid
by the company is less than eighty percent of one-fourth of
the total amount of tax assessed by the director of revenue
for the immediately preceding [taxable] tax year. The state
treasurer, upon receiving the moneys paid as a tax upon such
premiums to the director of revenue, shall place the moneys
to the credit of a fund to be known as "The County Stock
Insurance Fund", which is hereby created and established.
The county stock insurance fund shall be included in the
calculation of total state revenue pursuant to Article X,
Section 18, of the Missouri Constitution.
3. If the estimated quarterly tax installments are not
so paid, the director of revenue shall certify such fact to
the director of the department of commerce and insurance who
shall thereafter suspend such delinquent company or
companies from the further transaction of business in this
state until such taxes shall be paid and such companies
shall be subject to the provisions of sections 148.410 to
148.461.
4. On or before the first day of September of each
year the commissioner of administration shall apportion all
moneys in the county stock insurance fund to the general

SB 1188 126
revenue fund of the state, to the county treasurer and to
the treasurer of the school district in which the principal
office of the company paying the same is located. All
premium tax credits described in [sections 135.500 to
135.529 and] sections 348.430 and 348.432 shall only reduce
the amounts apportioned to the general revenue fund of the
state and shall not reduce any moneys apportioned to any
county treasurer or to the treasurer of the school district
in which the principal office of the company paying the same
is located. Apportionments shall be made in the same ratio
which the rates of levy for the same year for state
purposes, for county purposes, and for all school district
purposes, bear to each other; provided that any proceeds
from such tax for prior years remaining on hand in the hands
of the county collector or county treasurer undistributed on
the effective date of sections 148.310 to 148.460 and any
proceeds of such tax for prior years collected thereafter
shall be distributed and paid in accordance with the
provisions of such sections. Whenever the word "county"
occurs herein it shall be construed to include the city of
St. Louis.
148.350. 1. Every such company or association shall,
on or before the first day of March in each year, make a
return, verified by the affidavit of its president and
secretary or other authorized officers, to the director of
the department of commerce and insurance stating the amount
of all premiums received on account of policies issued in
this state by such company, whether in cash or in notes,
during the year ending on the thirty-first day of December,
next preceding. Upon receipt of such returns, the director
of the department of commerce and insurance shall verify the
same and certify the amount of tax due from the various

SB 1188 127
companies on the basis and at the rate provided in section
148.340, and shall certify the same to the director of
revenue together with the amount of the quarterly
installments to be made as provided in subsection 2 of this
section, on or before the thirtieth day of April of each
year.
2. Beginning January 1, 1983, the amount of the tax
due for that calendar year and each succeeding calendar year
thereafter shall be paid in four approximately equal
estimated quarterly installments and a fifth reconciling
installment. The first four installments shall be based
upon the tax assessed for the immediately preceding
[taxable] tax year ending on the thirty-first day of
December, next preceding. The quarterly installment shall
be made on the first day of March, the first day of June,
the first day of September, and the first day of December.
Immediately after receiving from the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, certification of the
amount of tax due from the various companies, the director
of revenue shall notify and assess each company the amount
of taxes on its premiums for the calendar year ending on the
thirty-first day of December, next preceding. The director
of revenue shall also notify and assess each company the
amount of the estimated quarterly installments to be made
for the calendar year. If the amount of the actual tax due
for any year exceeds the total of the installments made for
such year, the balance of the tax due shall be paid on the
first day of June of the following year, together with the
regular quarterly installment due at that time. If the
total amount of the tax actually due is less than the total
amount of the installments actually paid, the amount by
which the amount paid exceeds the amount due shall be

SB 1188 128
credited against the tax for the following year and deducted
from the quarterly installment otherwise due on the first
day of June. If the March first quarterly installment made
by a company is less than the amount assessed by the
director of revenue, the difference will be due on June
first, but no interest will accrue to the state on the
difference unless the amount paid by the company is less
than eighty percent of one-fourth of the total amount of tax
assessed by the director of revenue for the immediately
preceding [taxable] tax year. If the estimated quarterly
tax installments are not so paid, the director of revenue
shall certify such fact to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance who shall thereafter suspend such
delinquent company or companies from the further transaction
of business in this state until such taxes shall be paid,
and such companies shall be subject to the provisions of
sections 148.410 to 148.461.
3. Upon receiving such money from the director of
revenue, the state treasurer shall receipt one-half thereof
into the general revenue fund of the state, and he shall
place the remainder of such tax to the credit of a fund to
be known as "The County Foreign Insurance Tax Fund", which
is hereby created and established. [All premium tax credits
described in sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall only reduce
the amount of moneys received by the general revenue fund of
this state and shall not reduce any moneys received by the
county foreign insurance tax fund.]
190.465. 1. In order to provide the best possible 911
technology and service to all areas of the state in the most
efficient and economical manner possible, it is the public
policy of this state to encourage the consolidation of
emergency communications operations.

SB 1188 129
2. Any county, city, or 911 or emergency services
board established under this chapter or section 321.243 may
contract and cooperate with any other county, city, or 911
or emergency services board established under this chapter
or section 321.243 as provided in sections 70.210 to
70.320. Any contracting counties or boards may seek
assistance and advice from the Missouri 911 service board
established in section 650.325 regarding the terms of the
joint contract and the administration and operation of the
contracting counties, cities, and boards.
3. If two or more counties, cities, 911 districts, or
existing emergency communications entities desire to
consolidate their emergency communications operations, a
joint emergency communications entity may be established by
the parties through an agreement identifying the conditions
and provisions of the consolidation and the operation of the
joint entity. This agreement may include the establishment
of a joint governing body that may be comprised of the
boards of the entities forming the agreement currently
authorized by statute or an elected or appointed joint board
authorized under section 70.260; provided that, the
representation on the joint board of each of the entities
forming the agreement shall be equal. If the entities
entering into an agreement under this subsection decide that
any 911 service center responsible for the answering of 911
calls and the dispatch of assistance shall be physically
located in a county other than a county with the lowest
average county wage from the set of counties where the
entities entering into an agreement under this subsection
are located in whole or part, such entities shall provide a
written reason for this decision to the Missouri 911 service
board and such document shall be considered a public record

SB 1188 130
under chapter 610. The county average wage comparison shall
be conducted using the information from the Missouri
department of economic development[, which calculates such
county average wages under section 135.950].
4. After August 28, 2018, no public safety answering
point operation may be established as a result of its
separation from an existing public safety answering point
operation without a study by, and the approval of, the
Missouri 911 service board.
5. No provision of this section shall be construed to
prohibit or discourage in any manner the formation of
multiagency or multijurisdictional public safety answering
point operations.
192.2015. 1. Any registered caregiver who meets the
requirements of this section shall be eligible for a shared
care tax credit in an amount not to exceed five hundred
dollars to defray the cost of caring for an elderly person.
In order to be eligible for a shared care tax credit, a
registered caregiver shall:
(1) Care for an elderly person, age sixty or older,
who:
(a) Is physically or mentally incapable of living
alone, as determined and certified by his or her physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 334, or by the department staff
when an assessment has been completed for the purpose of
qualification for other services; and
(b) Requires assistance with activities of daily
living to the extent that without care and oversight at home
would require placement in a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 198; and
(c) Under no circumstances, is able or allowed to
operate a motor vehicle; and

SB 1188 131
(d) Does not receive funding or services through
Medicaid or social services block grant funding;
(2) Live in the same residence to give protective
oversight for the elderly person meeting the requirements
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection for an
aggregate of more than six months per tax year;
(3) Not receive monetary compensation for providing
care for the elderly person meeting the requirements
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
(4) File the original completed and signed physician
certification for shared care tax credit form or the
original completed and signed department certification for
shared care tax credit form provided for in subsection 2 of
section 192.2010 along with such caregiver's Missouri
individual income tax return to the department of revenue.
2. The tax credit allowed by this section shall apply
to any year beginning after December 31, 1999.
3. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
annually to all taxpayers by the department under this
section shall not exceed the total cap amount, which shall
be an amount equal to the highest annual amount of tax
credits issued in any one previous fiscal year, from fiscal
year 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as determined and calculated
by the department.
(2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
[3.] 4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in sections 192.2000 to 192.2020 shall

SB 1188 132
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. All rulemaking authority delegated prior
to August 28, 1999, is of no force and effect and repealed.
Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to repeal or
affect the validity of any rule filed or adopted prior to
August 28, 1999, if it fully complied with all applicable
provisions of law. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 1999, shall be invalid and void.
[4.] 5. Any person who knowingly falsifies any
document required for the shared care tax credit shall be
subject to the same penalties for falsifying other tax
documents as provided in chapter 143.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section

SB 1188 133
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
208.770. 1. Moneys deposited in or withdrawn pursuant
to subsection 1 of section 208.760 from a family development
account by an account holder are exempted from taxation
pursuant to chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
by sections 143.191 to 143.265, and chapter 147, 148 or 153
provided, however, that any money withdrawn for an
unapproved use should be subject to tax as required by law.
2. Interest earned by a family development account is
exempted from taxation pursuant to chapter 143.
3. Any funds in a family development account,
including accrued interest, shall be disregarded when
determining eligibility to receive, or the amount of, any
public assistance or benefits.
4. A program contributor shall be allowed a credit
against the tax imposed by chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, and
chapter 147, 148 or 153, pursuant to sections 208.750 to
208.775. Contributions up to fifty thousand dollars per
program contributor are eligible for the tax credit which
shall not exceed fifty percent of the contribution amount.
5. The department of economic development shall verify
all tax credit claims by contributors. The administrator of
the community-based organization, with the cooperation of
the participating financial institutions, shall submit the
names of contributors and the total amount each contributor
contributes to a family development account reserve fund for
the calendar year. The director shall determine the date by
which such information shall be submitted to the department
by the local administrator. The department shall submit

SB 1188 134
verification of qualified tax credits pursuant to sections
208.750 to 208.775 to the department of revenue.
6. For all fiscal years ending on or before June 30,
2010, the total tax credits authorized pursuant to sections
208.750 to 208.775 shall not exceed four million dollars in
any fiscal year. For all fiscal years beginning on or after
July 1, 2010, the total tax credits authorized under
sections 208.750 to 208.775 shall not exceed three hundred
thousand dollars in any fiscal year.
7. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
320.092. 1. Tax credits issued pursuant to sections
135.400[,] to 135.432 and section 135.750 [and 320.093]
shall be subject to oversight provisions. Effective January
1, 2000, notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057,
the board, department or authority issuing tax credits shall
annually report to the office of administration, president
pro tem of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives regarding the tax credits issued pursuant to

SB 1188 135
sections 135.400[,] to 135.432 and section 135.750 [and
320.093] which were issued in the previous fiscal year. The
report shall contain, but not be limited to, the aggregate
number and dollar amount of tax credits issued by the board,
department or authority, the number and dollar amount of tax
credits claimed by taxpayers, and the number and dollar
amount of tax credits unclaimed by taxpayers as well as the
number of years allowed for claims to be made. This report
shall be delivered no later than November of each year.
2. The reporting requirements established pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section shall also apply to the
department of economic development and the Missouri
development finance board established pursuant to section
100.265. The department and the Missouri development
finance board shall report on the tax credit programs which
they respectively administer that are authorized under the
provisions of chapters 32, 100, 135, 178, 253, 348, 447 and
620.
348.505. 1. As used in this section, "state tax
liability"[,] means any state tax liability incurred by a
taxpayer under the provisions of chapters 143, 147, and 148,
exclusive of the provisions relating to the withholding of
tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and
related provisions.
2. Any eligible lender under the family farm livestock
loan program under section 348.500 shall be entitled to
receive a tax credit equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of interest waived by the lender under section
348.500 on a qualifying loan for the first year of the loan
only. The tax credit shall be evidenced by a tax credit
certificate issued by the agricultural and small business
development authority and may be used to satisfy the state

SB 1188 136
tax liability of the owner of such certificate that becomes
due in the tax year in which the interest on a qualified
loan is waived by the lender under section 348.500. No
lender may receive a tax credit under this section unless
such person presents a tax credit certificate to the
department of revenue for payment of such state tax
liability. The amount of the tax credits that may be issued
to all eligible lenders claiming tax credits authorized in
this section in a fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred
thousand dollars.
3. The agricultural and small business development
authority shall be responsible for the administration and
issuance of the certificate of tax credits authorized by
this section. The authority shall issue a certificate of
tax credit at the request of any lender. Each request shall
include a true copy of the loan documents, the name of the
lender who is to receive a certificate of tax credit, the
type of state tax liability against which the tax credit is
to be used, and the amount of the certificate of tax credit
to be issued to the lender based on the interest waived by
the lender under section 348.500 on the loan for the first
year.
4. The Missouri department of revenue shall accept a
certificate of tax credit in lieu of other payment in such
amount as is equal to the lesser of the amount of the tax or
the remaining unused amount of the credit as indicated on
the certificate of tax credit, and shall indicate on the
certificate of tax credit the amount of tax thereby paid and
the date of such payment.
5. The following provisions shall apply to tax credits
authorized under this section:

SB 1188 137
(1) Tax credits claimed in a [taxable] tax year may be
claimed on a quarterly basis and applied to the estimated
quarterly tax of the lender;
(2) Any amount of tax credit which exceeds the tax
due, including any estimated quarterly taxes paid by the
lender under subdivision (1) of this subsection which
results in an overpayment of taxes for a [taxable] tax year,
shall not be refunded but may be carried over to any
subsequent [taxable] tax year, not to exceed a total of
three years for which a tax credit may be taken for a
qualified family farm livestock loan;
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a lender may assign, transfer or sell tax credits
authorized under this section, with the new owner of the tax
credit receiving the same rights in the tax credit as the
lender. For any tax credits assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed, a notarized endorsement shall be filed
by the lender with the authority specifying the name and
address of the new owner of the tax credit and the value of
such tax credit; and
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section to the contrary, any commercial bank may use tax
credits created under this section as provided in section
148.064 and receive a net tax credit against taxes actually
paid in the amount of the first year's interest on loans
made under this section. If such first year tax credits
reduce taxes due as provided in section 148.064 to zero, the
remaining tax credits may be carried over as otherwise
provided in this section and utilized as provided in section
148.064 in subsequent years.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:

SB 1188 138
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
447.708. 1. For eligible projects, the director of
the department of economic development, with notice to the
directors of the departments of natural resources and
revenue, and subject to the other provisions of sections
447.700 to 447.718, may not create a new enterprise zone but
may decide that a prospective operator of a facility being
remedied and renovated pursuant to sections 447.700 to
447.718 may receive the tax credits and exemptions pursuant
to sections 135.100 to 135.150 and sections 135.200 to
135.257. The tax credits allowed pursuant to this
subsection shall be used to offset the tax imposed by
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265, or the tax otherwise imposed by chapter
147, or the tax otherwise imposed by chapter 148. For
purposes of this subsection:
(1) For receipt of the ad valorem tax abatement
pursuant to section 135.215, the eligible project must
create at least ten new jobs or retain businesses which
supply at least twenty-five existing jobs. The city, or

SB 1188 139
county if the eligible project is not located in a city,
must provide ad valorem tax abatement of at least fifty
percent for a period not less than ten years and not more
than twenty-five years;
(2) For receipt of the income tax exemption pursuant
to section 135.220 and tax credit for new or expanded
business facilities pursuant to sections 135.100 to 135.150,
and 135.225, the eligible project must create at least ten
new jobs or retain businesses which supply at least twenty-
five existing jobs, or combination thereof. For purposes of
sections 447.700 to 447.718, the tax credits described in
section 135.225 are modified as follows: the tax credit
shall be four hundred dollars per employee per year, an
additional four hundred dollars per year for each employee
exceeding the minimum employment thresholds of ten and
twenty-five jobs for new and existing businesses,
respectively, an additional four hundred dollars per year
for each person who is a person difficult to employ as
defined by section 135.240, and investment tax credits at
the same amounts and levels as provided in subdivision (4)
of subsection 1 of section 135.225;
(3) For eligibility to receive the income tax refund
pursuant to section 135.245, the eligible project must
create at least ten new jobs or retain businesses which
supply at least twenty-five existing jobs, or combination
thereof, and otherwise comply with the provisions of section
135.245 for application and use of the refund and the
eligibility requirements of this section;
(4) The eligible project operates in compliance with
applicable environmental laws and regulations, including
permitting and registration requirements, of this state as
well as the federal and local requirements;

SB 1188 140
(5) The eligible project operator shall file such
reports as may be required by the director of economic
development or the director's designee;
(6) The taxpayer may claim the state tax credits
authorized by this subsection and the state income exemption
for a period not in excess of ten consecutive tax years.
For the purpose of this section, "taxpayer" means an
individual proprietorship, partnership or corporation
described in section 143.441 or 143.471 who operates an
eligible project. The director shall determine the number
of years the taxpayer may claim the state tax credits and
the state income exemption based on the projected net state
economic benefits attributed to the eligible project;
(7) For the purpose of meeting the new job requirement
prescribed in subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) of this
subsection, it shall be required that at least ten new jobs
be created and maintained during the taxpayer's tax period
for which the credits are earned, in the case of an eligible
project that does not replace a similar facility in
Missouri. "New job" means a person who was not previously
employed by the taxpayer or related taxpayer within the
twelve-month period immediately preceding the time the
person was employed by that taxpayer to work at, or in
connection with, the eligible project on a full-time basis.
"Full-time basis" means the employee works an average of at
least thirty-five hours per week during the taxpayer's tax
period for which the tax credits are earned. For the
purposes of this section, "related taxpayer" has the same
meaning as defined in subdivision (10) of section 135.100;
(8) For the purpose of meeting the existing job
retention requirement, if the eligible project replaces a
similar facility that closed elsewhere in Missouri prior to

SB 1188 141
the end of the taxpayer's tax period in which the tax
credits are earned, it shall be required that at least
twenty-five existing jobs be retained at, and in connection
with the eligible project, on a full-time basis during the
taxpayer's tax period for which the credits are earned.
"Retained job" means a person who was previously employed by
the taxpayer or related taxpayer, at a facility similar to
the eligible project that closed elsewhere in Missouri prior
to the end of the taxpayer's tax period in which the tax
credits are earned, within the tax period immediately
preceding the time the person was employed by the taxpayer
to work at, or in connection with, the eligible project on a
full-time basis. "Full-time basis" means the employee works
an average of at least thirty-five hours per week during the
taxpayer's tax period for which the tax credits are earned;
(9) In the case where an eligible project replaces a
100 similar facility that closed elsewhere in Missouri prior to
101 the end of the taxpayer's tax period in which the tax
102 credits are earned, the owner and operator of the eligible
103 project shall provide the director with a written statement
104 explaining the reason for discontinuing operations at the
105 closed facility. The statement shall include a comparison
106 of the activities performed at the closed facility prior to
107 the date the facility ceased operating, to the activities
108 performed at the eligible project, and a detailed account
109 describing the need and rationale for relocating to the
110 eligible project. If the director finds the relocation to
111 the eligible project significantly impaired the economic
112 stability of the area in which the closed facility was
113 located, and that such move was detrimental to the overall
114 economic development efforts of the state, the director may
115 deny the taxpayer's request to claim tax benefits;

SB 1188 142
116 (10) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
117 contrary, for the purpose of this section, the number of new
118 jobs created and maintained, the number of existing jobs
119 retained, and the value of new qualified investment used at
120 the eligible project during any tax year shall be determined
121 by dividing by twelve, in the case of jobs, the sum of the
122 number of individuals employed at the eligible project, or
123 in the case of new qualified investment, the value of new
124 qualified investment used at the eligible project, on the
125 last business day of each full calendar month of the tax
126 year. If the eligible project is in operation for less than
127 the entire tax year, the number of new jobs created and
128 maintained, the number of existing jobs retained, and the
129 value of new qualified investment created at the eligible
130 project during any tax year shall be determined by dividing
131 the sum of the number of individuals employed at the
132 eligible project, or in the case of new qualified
133 investment, the value of new qualified investment used at
134 the eligible project, on the last business day of each full
135 calendar month during the portion of the tax year during
136 which the eligible project was in operation, by the number
137 of full calendar months during such period;
138 (11) For the purpose of this section, "new qualified
139 investment" means new business facility investment as
140 defined and as determined in subdivision (8) of section
141 135.100 which is used at and in connection with the eligible
142 project. New qualified investment shall not include small
143 tools, supplies and inventory. "Small tools" means tools
144 that are portable and can be hand held.
145 2. The determination of the director of economic
146 development pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall
147 not affect requirements for the prospective purchaser to

SB 1188 143
148 obtain the approval of the granting of real property tax
149 abatement by the municipal or county government where the
150 eligible project is located.
151 3. (1) The director of the department of economic
152 development, with the approval of the director of the
153 department of natural resources, may, in addition to the tax
154 credits allowed in subsection 1 of this section, grant a
155 remediation tax credit to the applicant for up to one
156 hundred percent of the costs of materials, supplies,
157 equipment, labor, professional engineering, consulting and
158 architectural fees, permitting fees and expenses,
159 demolition, asbestos abatement, and direct utility charges
160 for performing the voluntary remediation activities for the
161 preexisting hazardous substance contamination and releases,
162 including, but not limited to, the costs of performing
163 operation and maintenance of the remediation equipment at
164 the property beyond the year in which the systems and
165 equipment are built and installed at the eligible project
166 and the costs of performing the voluntary remediation
167 activities over a period not in excess of four tax years
168 following the taxpayer's tax year in which the system and
169 equipment were first put into use at the eligible project,
170 provided the remediation activities are the subject of a
171 plan submitted to, and approved by, the director of natural
172 resources pursuant to sections 260.565 to 260.575. The tax
173 credit may also include up to one hundred percent of the
174 costs of demolition that are not directly part of the
175 remediation activities, provided that the demolition is on
176 the property where the voluntary remediation activities are
177 occurring, the demolition is necessary to accomplish the
178 planned use of the facility where the remediation activities
179 are occurring, and the demolition is part of a redevelopment

SB 1188 144
180 plan approved by the municipal or county government and the
181 department of economic development. The demolition may
182 occur on an adjacent property if the project is located in a
183 municipality which has a population less than twenty
184 thousand and the above conditions are otherwise met. The
185 adjacent property shall independently qualify as abandoned
186 or underutilized. The amount of the credit available for
187 demolition not associated with remediation cannot exceed the
188 total amount of credits approved for remediation including
189 demolition required for remediation.
190 (2) The amount of remediation tax credits issued shall
191 be limited to the least amount necessary to cause the
192 project to occur, as determined by the director of the
193 department of economic development.
194 (3) The director may, with the approval of the
195 director of natural resources, extend the tax credits
196 allowed for performing voluntary remediation maintenance
197 activities, in increments of three-year periods, not to
198 exceed five consecutive three-year periods. The tax credits
199 allowed in this subsection shall be used to offset the tax
200 imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by
201 sections 143.191 to 143.265, or the tax otherwise imposed by
202 chapter 147, or the tax otherwise imposed by chapter 148.
203 The remediation tax credit may be taken in the same tax year
204 in which the tax credits are received or may be taken over a
205 period not to exceed twenty years.
206 (4) The project facility shall be projected to create
207 at least ten new jobs or at least twenty-five retained jobs,
208 or a combination thereof, as determined by the department of
209 economic development, to be eligible for tax credits
210 pursuant to this section.

SB 1188 145
211 (5) No more than seventy-five percent of earned
212 remediation tax credits may be issued when the remediation
213 costs were paid, and the remaining percentage may be issued
214 when the department of natural resources issues a letter of
215 completion letter or covenant not to sue following
216 completion of the voluntary remediation activities. It
217 shall not include any costs associated with ongoing
218 operational environmental compliance of the facility or
219 remediation costs arising out of spills, leaks, or other
220 releases arising out of the ongoing business operations of
221 the facility. In the event the department of natural
222 resources issues a letter of completion for a portion of a
223 property, an impacted media such as soil or groundwater, or
224 for a site or a portion of a site improvement, a prorated
225 amount of the remaining percentage may be released based on
226 the percentage of the total site receiving a letter of
227 completion.
228 4. In the exercise of the sound discretion of the
229 director of the department of economic development or the
230 director's designee, the tax credits and exemptions
231 described in this section may be terminated, suspended or
232 revoked if the eligible project fails to continue to meet
233 the conditions set forth in this section. In making such a
234 determination, the director shall consider the severity of
235 the condition violation, actions taken to correct the
236 violation, the frequency of any condition violations and
237 whether the actions exhibit a pattern of conduct by the
238 eligible facility owner and operator. The director shall
239 also consider changes in general economic conditions and the
240 recommendation of the director of the department of natural
241 resources, or his or her designee, concerning the severity,
242 scope, nature, frequency and extent of any violations of the

SB 1188 146
243 environmental compliance conditions. The taxpayer or person
244 claiming the tax credits or exemptions may appeal the
245 decision regarding termination, suspension or revocation of
246 any tax credit or exemption in accordance with the
247 procedures outlined in subsections 4 and 5 of section
248 135.250. The director of the department of economic
249 development shall notify the directors of the departments of
250 natural resources and revenue of the termination, suspension
251 or revocation of any tax credits as determined in this
252 section or pursuant to the provisions of section 447.716.
253 5. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
254 contrary, no taxpayer shall earn the tax credits, exemptions
255 or refund otherwise allowed in subdivisions (2), (3) and (4)
256 of subsection 1 of this section and the tax credits
257 otherwise allowed in section 135.110, or the tax credits,
258 exemptions and refund otherwise allowed in sections 135.215,
259 135.220, 135.225 and 135.245, respectively, for the same
260 facility for the same tax period.
261 6. The total amount of the tax credits allowed in
262 subsection 1 of this section may not exceed the greater of:
263 (1) That portion of the taxpayer's income attributed
264 to the eligible project; or
265 (2) One hundred percent of the total business' income
266 tax if the eligible facility does not replace a similar
267 facility that closed elsewhere in Missouri prior to the end
268 of the taxpayer's tax period in which the tax credits are
269 earned, and further provided the taxpayer does not operate
270 any other facilities besides the eligible project in
271 Missouri; fifty percent of the total business' income tax if
272 the eligible facility replaces a similar facility that
273 closed elsewhere in Missouri prior to the end of the
274 taxpayer's tax period in which the credits are earned, and

SB 1188 147
275 further provided the taxpayer does not operate any other
276 facilities besides the eligible project in Missouri; or
277 twenty-five percent of the total business income if the
278 taxpayer operates, in addition to the eligible facility, any
279 other facilities in Missouri. In no case shall a taxpayer
280 operating more than one eligible project in Missouri be
281 allowed to offset more than twenty-five percent of the
282 taxpayer's business income in any tax period. That portion
283 of the taxpayer's income attributed to the eligible project
284 as referenced in subdivision (1) of this subsection, for
285 which the credits allowed in sections 135.110 and 135.225
286 and subsection 3 of this section may apply, shall be
287 determined in the same manner as prescribed in subdivision
288 (5) of section 135.100. That portion of the taxpayer's
289 franchise tax attributed to the eligible project for which
290 the remediation tax credit may offset, shall be determined
291 in the same manner as prescribed in paragraph (a) of
292 subdivision (5) of section 135.100.
293 7. Taxpayers claiming the state tax benefits allowed
294 in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 1 of this section
295 shall be required to file all applicable tax credit
296 applications, forms and schedules prescribed by the director
297 during the taxpayer's tax period immediately after the tax
298 period in which the eligible project was first put into
299 use. Otherwise, the taxpayer's right to claim such state
300 tax benefits shall be forfeited. Unused business facility
301 and enterprise zone tax credits shall not be carried forward
302 but shall be initially claimed for the tax period during
303 which the eligible project was first capable of being used,
304 and during any applicable subsequent tax periods.
305 8. Taxpayers claiming the remediation tax credit
306 allowed in subsection 3 of this section shall be required to

SB 1188 148
307 file all applicable tax credit applications, forms and
308 schedules prescribed by the director during the taxpayer's
309 tax period immediately after the tax period in which the
310 eligible project was first put into use, or during the
311 taxpayer's tax period immediately after the tax period in
312 which the voluntary remediation activities were performed.
313 9. The recipient of remediation tax credits, for the
314 purpose of this subsection referred to as assignor, may
315 assign, sell or transfer, in whole or in part, the
316 remediation tax credit allowed in subsection 3 of this
317 section to any other person, for the purpose of this
318 subsection referred to as assignee. To perfect the
319 transfer, the assignor shall provide written notice to the
320 director of the assignor's intent to transfer the tax
321 credits to the assignee, the date the transfer is effective,
322 the assignee's name, address and the assignee's tax period
323 and the amount of tax credits to be transferred. The number
324 of tax periods during which the assignee may subsequently
325 claim the tax credits shall not exceed twenty tax periods,
326 less the number of tax periods the assignor previously
327 claimed the credits before the transfer occurred.
328 10. In the case where an operator and assignor of an
329 eligible project has been certified to claim state tax
330 benefits allowed in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 1
331 of this section, and sells or otherwise transfers title of
332 the eligible project to another taxpayer or assignee who
333 continues the same or substantially similar operations at
334 the eligible project, the director shall allow the assignee
335 to claim the credits for a period of time to be determined
336 by the director; except that, the total number of tax
337 periods the tax credits may be earned by the assignor and
338 the assignee shall not exceed ten. To perfect the transfer,

SB 1188 149
339 the assignor shall provide written notice to the director of
340 the assignor's intent to transfer the tax credits to the
341 assignee, the date the transfer is effective, the assignee's
342 name, address, and the assignee's tax period, and the amount
343 of tax credits to be transferred.
344 11. For the purpose of the state tax benefits
345 described in this section, in the case of a corporation
346 described in section 143.471 or partnership, in computing
347 Missouri's tax liability, such state benefits shall be
348 allowed to the following:
349 (1) The shareholders of the corporation described in
350 section 143.471;
351 (2) The partners of the partnership.
352 The credit provided in this subsection shall be apportioned
353 to the entities described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of
354 this subsection in proportion to their share of ownership on
355 the last day of the taxpayer's tax period.
356 12. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
357 contrary, in any county [of the first classification] that
358 has a charter form of government and that has a population
359 of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants, all demolition
360 costs incurred during the redevelopment of any former
361 automobile manufacturing plant shall be allowable costs
362 eligible for tax credits under sections 447.700 to 447.718
363 so long as the redevelopment of such former automobile
364 manufacturing plant shall be projected to create at least
365 two hundred fifty new jobs or at least three hundred
366 retained jobs, or a combination thereof, as determined by
367 the department of economic development. The amount of
368 allowable costs eligible for tax credits shall be limited to
369 the least amount necessary to cause the project to occur, as

SB 1188 150
370 determined by the director of the department of economic
371 development, provided that no tax credit shall be issued
372 under this subsection until July 1, 2017. For purposes of
373 this subsection, "former automobile manufacturing plant"
374 means a redevelopment area that qualifies as an eligible
375 project under section 447.700, that consists of at least one
376 hundred acres, and that was used primarily for the
377 manufacture of automobiles but, after 2007, ceased such
378 manufacturing.
379 13. (1) For all fiscal years beginning on or after
380 July 1, 2027, the cumulative amount of tax credits issued
381 annually to all taxpayers by the department under this
382 section shall not exceed the total cap amount which shall be
383 an amount, equal to the highest annual amount of tax credits
384 issued in any one previous fiscal year, from fiscal year
385 2024 to fiscal year 2026, as determined and calculated by
386 the department.
387 (2) If the amount of tax credits claimed in a fiscal
388 year under this section exceeds the total cap determined
389 under subdivision (1) of this subsection, tax credits shall
390 be allowed based on the order in which they were issued.
391 14. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
392 act:
393 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
394 shall automatically sunset August 28, 2032, unless
395 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
396 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
397 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
398 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
399 sunset; and
400 (3) The provisions of this section shall not be
401 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any

SB 1188 151
402 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
403 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
404 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
405 section is sunset.
620.1910. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Manufacturing Jobs Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Approval", a document submitted by the department
to the qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier
that states the benefits that may be provided under this
section;
(2) "Average wage", the new payroll divided by the
number of new jobs;
(3) "Capital investment", expenditures made by a
qualified manufacturing company to retool or reconfigure a
manufacturing facility directly related to the manufacturing
of a new product or the expansion or modification of the
manufacture of an existing product;
[(3)] (4) "County average wage", the [same meaning as
such term is defined in section 620.1878] average wages in
each county as determined by the department for the most
recently completed full calendar year. However, if the
computed county average wage is above the statewide average
wage, the statewide average wage shall be deemed the county
average wage for such county for the purpose of determining
eligibility. The department shall publish the county
average wage for each county at least annually.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision to the
contrary, for any qualified company that in conjunction with
its project is relocating employees from a Missouri county
with a higher county average wage, the company shall obtain
the endorsement of the governing body of the community from

SB 1188 152
which jobs are being relocated or the county average wage
for its project shall be the county average wage for the
county from which the employees are being relocated;
[(4)] (5) "Department", the department of economic
development;
[(5)] (6) "Facility", a building or buildings located
in Missouri at which the qualified manufacturing company
manufactures a product;
[(6)] (7) "Full-time job", a job for which a person is
compensated for an average of at least thirty-five hours per
week for a twelve-month period, and one for which the
qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier offers
health insurance and pays at least fifty percent of such
insurance premiums;
[(7)] (8) "NAICS industry classification", the most
recent edition of the North American Industry Classification
System as prepared by the Executive Office of the President,
Office of Management and Budget;
[(8)] (9) "New job", the [same meaning as such term is
defined in section 620.1878] number of full-time employees
located at the project facility that exceeds the project
facility base employment less any decrease in the number of
full-time employees at related facilities below the related
facility base employment. No job that was created prior to
the date of the notice of intent shall be deemed a new job.
An employee who spends less than fifty percent of the
employee's work time at the facility is still considered to
be located at the facility if the employee receives his or
her directions and control from that facility, is on the
facility's payroll, one hundred percent of the employee's
income from such employment is Missouri income, and the
employee is paid at or above the state average wage;

SB 1188 153
[(9)] (10) "New product", a new model or line of a
manufactured good that has not been manufactured in Missouri
by the qualified manufacturing company at any time prior to
the date of the notice of intent, or an existing brand,
model, or line of a manufactured good that is redesigned
with more than seventy-five percent new exterior body parts
and incorporates new powertrain options;
[(10)] (11) "Notice of intent", a form developed by
the department, completed by the qualified manufacturing
company or qualified supplier and submitted to the
department which states the qualified manufacturing
company's or qualified supplier's intent to create new jobs
or retain current jobs and make additional capital
investment, as applicable, and request benefits under this
section. The notice of intent shall specify the minimum
number of such new or retained jobs and the minimum amount
of such capital investment;
[(11)] (12) "Qualified manufacturing company", a
business with a NAICS code of 33611 that:
(a) Manufactures goods at a facility in Missouri;
(b) In the case of the manufacture of a new product,
commits to make a capital investment of at least seventy-
five thousand dollars per retained job within no more than
two years of the date the qualified manufacturing company
begins to retain withholding tax under this section, or in
the case of the modification or expansion of the manufacture
of an existing product, commits to make a capital investment
of at least fifty thousand dollars per retained job within
no more than two years of the date the qualified
manufacturing company begins to retain withholding tax under
this section;

SB 1188 154
(c) Manufactures a new product or has commenced making
capital improvements to the facility necessary for the
manufacturing of such new product, or modifies or expands
the manufacture of an existing product or has commenced
making capital improvements to the facility necessary for
the modification or expansion of the manufacture of such
existing product; and
(d) Continues to meet the requirements of paragraphs
100 (a) to (c) of this subdivision for the withholding period;
101 [(12)] (13) "Qualified supplier", a manufacturing
102 company that:
103 (a) Attests to the department that it derives more
104 than ten percent of the total annual sales of the company
105 from sales to a qualified manufacturing company;
106 (b) Adds five or more new jobs;
107 (c) Has an average wage, as defined [in] under section
108 135.950, for such new jobs that are equal to or exceed the
109 lower of the county average wage for Missouri as determined
110 by the department using NAICS industry classifications, but
111 not lower than sixty percent of the statewide average wage;
112 and
113 (d) Provides health insurance for all full-time jobs
114 and pays at least fifty percent of the premiums of such
115 insurance;
116 [(13)] (14) "Retained job", the number of full-time
117 jobs of persons employed by the qualified manufacturing
118 company located at the facility that existed as of the last
119 working day of the month immediately preceding the month in
120 which notice of intent is submitted;
121 [(14)] (15) "Statewide average wage", an amount equal
122 to the quotient of the sum of the total gross wages paid for
123 the corresponding four calendar quarters divided by the

SB 1188 155
124 average annual employment for such four calendar quarters,
125 which shall be computed using the Quarterly Census of
126 Employment and Wages Data for All Private Ownership
127 Businesses in Missouri, as published by the Bureau of Labor
128 Statistics of the United States Department of Labor;
129 [(15)] (16) "Withholding period", the seven- or ten-
130 year period in which a qualified manufacturing company may
131 receive benefits under this section;
132 [(16)] (17) "Withholding tax", the [same meaning as
133 such term is defined in section 620.1878] state tax imposed
134 by sections 143.191 to 143.265. For purposes of this
135 program, the withholding tax shall be computed using a
136 schedule as determined by the department based on average
137 wages.
138 3. The department shall respond within thirty days to
139 a qualified manufacturing company or a qualified supplier
140 who provides a notice of intent with either an approval or a
141 rejection of the notice of intent. Failure to respond on
142 behalf of the department shall result in the notice of
143 intent being deemed an approval for the purposes of this
144 section.
145 4. A qualified manufacturing company that manufactures
146 a new product may, upon the department's approval of a
147 notice of intent and the execution of an agreement that
148 meets the requirements of subsection 9 of this section, but
149 no earlier than January 1, 2012, retain one hundred percent
150 of the withholding tax from full-time jobs at the facility
151 for a period of ten years. A qualified manufacturing
152 company that modifies or expands the manufacture of an
153 existing product may, upon the department's approval of a
154 notice of intent and the execution of an agreement that
155 meets the requirements of subsection 9 of this section, but

SB 1188 156
156 no earlier than January 1, 2012, retain fifty percent of the
157 withholding tax from full-time jobs at the facility for a
158 period of seven years. Except as otherwise allowed under
159 subsection 7 of this section, the commencement of the
160 withholding period may be delayed by no more than twenty-
161 four months after execution of the agreement at the option
162 of the qualified manufacturing company. [Such qualified
163 manufacturing company shall be eligible for participation in
164 the Missouri quality jobs program in sections 620.1875 to
165 620.1890 for any new jobs for which it does not retain
166 withholding tax under this section, provided all
167 qualifications for such program are met.]
168 5. A qualified supplier may, upon approval of a notice
169 of intent by the department, retain all withholding tax from
170 new jobs for a period of three years from the date of
171 approval of the notice of intent or for a period of five
172 years if the supplier pays wages for the new jobs equal to
173 or greater than one hundred twenty percent of county average
174 wage. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
175 contrary, a qualified supplier that is awarded benefits
176 under this section shall not receive any tax credit or
177 exemption or be entitled to retain withholding under
178 sections 100.700 to 100.850, sections 135.100 to 135.150,
179 sections 135.200 to 135.286[, section 135.535, sections
180 135.900 to 135.906, sections 135.950 to 135.970, or section
181 620.1881] for the same jobs.
182 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
183 contrary, the maximum amount of withholding tax that may be
184 retained by any one qualified manufacturing company under
185 this section shall not exceed ten million dollars per
186 calendar year. The aggregate amount of withholding tax that
187 may be retained by all qualified manufacturing companies

SB 1188 157
188 under this section shall not exceed fifteen million dollars
189 per calendar year.
190 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
191 contrary, any qualified manufacturing company that is
192 awarded benefits under this section shall not simultaneously
193 receive tax credits or exemptions under sections 100.700 to
194 100.850, sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections 135.200 to
195 135.286[, section 135.535, or sections 135.900 to 135.906]
196 for the jobs created or retained or capital improvement
197 which qualified for benefits under this section. The
198 benefits available to the qualified manufacturing company
199 under any other state programs for which the qualified
200 manufacturing company is eligible and which utilize
201 withholding tax from the jobs at the facility shall first be
202 credited to the other state program before the applicable
203 withholding period for benefits provided under this section
204 shall begin. These other state programs include, but are
205 not limited to, the Missouri [works] one start jobs training
206 program under sections 620.800 to 620.809, the real property
207 tax increment allocation redevelopment act under sections
208 99.800 to 99.865, or the Missouri downtown and rural
209 economic stimulus act under sections 99.915 to 99.980. If
210 any qualified manufacturing company also participates in the
211 Missouri [works] one start jobs training program in sections
212 620.800 to 620.809, such qualified manufacturing company
213 shall not retain any withholding tax that has already been
214 allocated for use in the new jobs training program. Any
215 qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier that
216 is awarded benefits under this program and knowingly hires
217 individuals who are not allowed to work legally in the
218 United States shall immediately forfeit such benefits and
219 shall repay the state an amount equal to any withholding

SB 1188 158
220 taxes already retained. Subsection 5 of section 285.530
221 shall not apply to qualified manufacturing companies or
222 qualified suppliers which are awarded benefits under this
223 program.
224 8. The department may promulgate rules to implement
225 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
226 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
227 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
228 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
229 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
230 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
231 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
232 general assembly under chapter 536 to review, to delay the
233 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
234 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
235 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
236 the effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
237 9. Within six months of completion of a notice of
238 intent required under this section, the qualified
239 manufacturing company shall enter into an agreement with the
240 department that memorializes the content of the notice of
241 intent, the requirements of this section, and the
242 consequences for failing to meet such requirements, which
243 shall include the following:
244 (1) If the amount of capital investment made by the
245 qualified manufacturing company is not made within the two-
246 year period provided for such investment, the qualified
247 manufacturing company shall immediately cease retaining any
248 withholding tax with respect to jobs at the facility and it
249 shall forfeit all rights to retain withholding tax for the
250 remainder of the withholding period. In addition, the
251 qualified manufacturing company shall repay any amounts of

SB 1188 159
252 withholding tax retained plus interest of five percent per
253 annum. However, in the event that such capital investment
254 shortfall is due to economic conditions beyond the control
255 of the qualified manufacturing company, the director may, at
256 the qualified manufacturing company's request, suspend
257 rather than terminate its privilege to retain withholding
258 tax under this section for up to three years. Any such
259 suspension shall extend the withholding period by the same
260 amount of time. No more than one such suspension shall be
261 granted to a qualified manufacturing company;
262 (2) If the qualified manufacturing company
263 discontinues the manufacturing of the new product and does
264 not replace it with a subsequent or additional new product
265 manufactured at the facility at any time during the
266 withholding period, the qualified manufacturing company
267 shall immediately cease retaining any withholding tax with
268 respect to jobs at that facility and it shall forfeit all
269 rights to retain withholding tax for the remainder of the
270 withholding period.
271 10. Prior to March first each year, the department
272 shall provide a report to the general assembly including the
273 names of participating qualified manufacturing companies or
274 qualified suppliers, location of such companies or
275 suppliers, the annual amount of benefits provided, the
276 estimated net state fiscal impact including direct and
277 indirect new state taxes derived, and the number of new jobs
278 created or jobs retained.
279 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
280 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under
281 this section shall automatically sunset October 12, 2016,
282 unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and

SB 1188 160
283 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
284 authorized under this section shall automatically sunset
285 twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
286 of this section; and
287 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of
288 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
289 which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
620.2010. 1. In exchange for the consideration
provided by the new tax revenues and other economic stimuli
that will be generated by the new jobs created, a qualified
company may, for a period of five years from the date the
new jobs are created, or for a period of six years from the
date the new jobs are created if the qualified company is an
existing Missouri business, retain an amount equal to the
withholding tax as calculated under subdivision (38) of
section 620.2005 from the new jobs that would otherwise be
withheld and remitted by the qualified company under the
provisions of sections 143.191 to 143.265 if:
(1) The qualified company creates ten or more new
jobs, and the average wage of the new payroll equals or
exceeds ninety percent of the county average wage;
(2) The qualified company creates two or more new jobs
at a project facility located in a rural area, the average
wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds ninety percent of
the county average wage, and the qualified company commits
to making at least one hundred thousand dollars of new
capital investment at the project facility within two years;
or
(3) The qualified company creates two or more new jobs
at a project facility located within [a] an enhanced
enterprise zone [designated under sections 135.950 to
135.963], the average wage of the new payroll equals or

SB 1188 161
exceeds eighty percent of the county average wage, and the
qualified company commits to making at least one hundred
thousand dollars in new capital investment at the project
facility within two years of approval.
2. In addition to any benefits available under
subsection 1 of this section, the department may award a
qualified company that satisfies subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of this section additional tax credits, issued
each year for a period of five years from the date the new
jobs are created, or for a period of six years from the date
the new jobs are created if the qualified company is an
existing Missouri business, in an amount equal to or less
than six percent of new payroll; provided that in no event
may the total amount of benefits awarded to a qualified
company under this section exceed nine percent of new
payroll in any calendar year. The amount of tax credits
awarded to a qualified company under this subsection shall
not exceed the projected net fiscal benefit to the state, as
determined by the department, and shall not exceed the least
amount necessary to obtain the qualified company's
commitment to initiate the project. In determining the
amount of tax credits to award to a qualified company under
this subsection or a qualified manufacturing company under
subsection 3 of this section, the department shall consider
the following factors:
(1) The significance of the qualified company's need
for program benefits;
(2) The amount of projected net fiscal benefit to the
state of the project and the period in which the state would
realize such net fiscal benefit;
(3) The overall size and quality of the proposed
project, including the number of new jobs, new capital

SB 1188 162
investment, manufacturing capital investment, proposed
wages, growth potential of the qualified company, the
potential multiplier effect of the project, and similar
factors;
(4) The financial stability and creditworthiness of
the qualified company;
(5) The level of economic distress in the area;
(6) An evaluation of the competitiveness of
alternative locations for the project facility, as
applicable; and
(7) The percent of local incentives committed.
3. (1) The department may award tax credits to a
qualified manufacturing company that makes a manufacturing
capital investment of at least five hundred million dollars
not more than three years following the department's
approval of a notice of intent and the execution of an
agreement that meets the requirements of subsection 4 of
this section. Such tax credits shall be issued no earlier
than January 1, 2023, and may be issued each year for a
period of five years. A qualified manufacturing company may
qualify for an additional five-year period under this
subsection if it makes an additional manufacturing capital
investment of at least two hundred fifty million dollars
within five years of the department's approval of the
original notice of intent.
(2) The maximum amount of tax credits that any one
qualified manufacturing company may receive under this
subsection shall not exceed five million dollars per
calendar year. The aggregate amount of tax credits awarded
to all qualified manufacturing companies under this
subsection shall not exceed ten million dollars per calendar
year.

SB 1188 163
(3) If, at the project facility at any time during the
project period, the qualified manufacturing company
discontinues the manufacturing of the new product, or
discontinues the modification or expansion of an existing
product, and does not replace it with a subsequent or
additional new product or with a modification or expansion
of an existing product, the company shall immediately cease
receiving any benefit awarded under this subsection for the
remainder of the project period and shall forfeit all rights
to retain or receive any benefit awarded under this
100 subsection for the remainder of such period.
101 (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
102 contrary, any qualified manufacturing company that is
103 awarded benefits under this section shall not simultaneously
104 receive tax credits or exemptions under sections 100.700 to
105 100.850 for the jobs created or retained or capital
106 improvement that qualified for benefits under this section.
107 The provisions of subsection 5 of section 285.530 shall not
108 apply to a qualified manufacturing company that is awarded
109 benefits under this section.
110 4. Upon approval of a notice of intent to receive tax
111 credits under subsection 2, 3, 6, or 7 of this section, the
112 department and the qualified company shall enter into a
113 written agreement covering the applicable project period.
114 The agreement shall specify, at a minimum:
115 (1) The committed number of new jobs, new payroll, and
116 new capital investment, or the manufacturing capital
117 investment and committed percentage of retained jobs for
118 each year during the project period;
119 (2) The date or time period during which the tax
120 credits shall be issued, which may be immediately or over a

SB 1188 164
121 period not to exceed two years from the date of approval of
122 the notice of intent;
123 (3) Clawback provisions, as may be required by the
124 department;
125 (4) Financial guarantee provisions as may be required
126 by the department, provided that financial guarantee
127 provisions shall be required by the department for tax
128 credits awarded under subsection 7 of this section; and
129 (5) Any other provisions the department may require.
130 5. In lieu of the benefits available under subsections
131 1 and 2 of this section, and in exchange for the
132 consideration provided by the new tax revenues and other
133 economic stimuli that will be generated by the new jobs
134 created by the program, a qualified company may, for a
135 period of five years from the date the new jobs are created,
136 or for a period of six years from the date the new jobs are
137 created if the qualified company is an existing Missouri
138 business, retain an amount equal to the withholding tax as
139 calculated under subdivision (38) of section 620.2005 from
140 the new jobs that would otherwise be withheld and remitted
141 by the qualified company under the provisions of sections
142 143.191 to 143.265 equal to:
143 (1) Six percent of new payroll for a period of five
144 years from the date the required number of new jobs were
145 created if the qualified company creates one hundred or more
146 new jobs and the average wage of the new payroll equals or
147 exceeds one hundred twenty percent of the county average
148 wage of the county in which the project facility is located;
149 or
150 (2) Seven percent of new payroll for a period of five
151 years from the date the required number of jobs were created
152 if the qualified company creates one hundred or more new

SB 1188 165
153 jobs and the average wage of the new payroll equals or
154 exceeds one hundred forty percent of the county average wage
155 of the county in which the project facility is located.
156 The department shall issue a refundable tax credit for any
157 difference between the amount of benefit allowed under this
158 subsection and the amount of withholding tax retained by the
159 company, in the event the withholding tax is not sufficient
160 to provide the entire amount of benefit due to the qualified
161 company under this subsection.
162 6. In addition to the benefits available under
163 subsection 5 of this section, the department may award a
164 qualified company that satisfies the provisions of
165 subsection 5 of this section additional tax credits, issued
166 each year for a period of five years from the date the new
167 jobs are created, or for a period of six years from the date
168 the new jobs are created if the qualified company is an
169 existing Missouri business, in an amount equal to or less
170 than three percent of new payroll; provided that in no event
171 may the total amount of benefits awarded to a qualified
172 company under this section exceed nine percent of new
173 payroll in any calendar year. The amount of tax credits
174 awarded to a qualified company under this subsection shall
175 not exceed the projected net fiscal benefit to the state, as
176 determined by the department, and shall not exceed the least
177 amount necessary to obtain the qualified company's
178 commitment to initiate the project. In determining the
179 amount of tax credits to award to a qualified company under
180 this subsection, the department shall consider the factors
181 provided under subsection 2 of this section.
182 7. In lieu of the benefits available under subsections
183 1, 2, 5, and 6 of this section, and in exchange for the

SB 1188 166
184 consideration provided by the new tax revenues and other
185 economic stimuli that will be generated by the new jobs and
186 new capital investment created by the program, the
187 department may award a qualified company that satisfies the
188 provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
189 section tax credits, issued within one year following the
190 qualified company's acceptance of the department's proposal
191 for benefits, in an amount equal to or less than nine
192 percent of new payroll. The amount of tax credits awarded
193 to a qualified company under this subsection shall not
194 exceed the projected net fiscal benefit to the state, as
195 determined by the department, and shall not exceed the least
196 amount necessary to obtain the qualified company's
197 commitment to initiate the project. In determining the
198 amount of tax credits to award to a qualified company under
199 this subsection, the department shall consider the factors
200 provided under subsection 2 of this section and the
201 qualified company's commitment to new capital investment and
202 new job creation within the state for a period of not less
203 than ten years. For the purposes of this subsection, each
204 qualified company shall have an average wage of the new
205 payroll that equals or exceeds one hundred percent of the
206 county average wage. Notwithstanding the provisions of
207 section 620.2020 to the contrary, this subsection shall
208 expire on June 30, 2025.
209 8. No benefits shall be available under this section
210 for any qualified company that has performed significant,
211 project-specific site work at the project facility,
212 purchased machinery or equipment related to the project, or
213 has publicly announced its intention to make new capital
214 investment or manufacturing capital investment at the
215 project facility prior to receipt of a proposal for benefits

SB 1188 167
216 under this section or approval of its notice of intent,
217 whichever occurs first.
218 9. In lieu of any other benefits under this chapter,
219 the department of economic development may award a tax
220 credit to an industrial development authority for a
221 qualified military project in an amount equal to the
222 estimated withholding taxes associated with the part-time
223 and full-time civilian and military new jobs located at the
224 facility and directly impacted by the project. The amount
225 of the tax credit shall be calculated by multiplying:
226 (1) The average percentage of tax withheld, as
227 provided by the department of revenue to the department of
228 economic development;
229 (2) The average salaries of the jobs directly created
230 by the qualified military project; and
231 (3) The number of jobs directly created by the
232 qualified military project.
233 If the amount of the tax credit represents the least amount
234 necessary to accomplish the qualified military project, the
235 tax credits may be issued, but no tax credits shall be
236 issued for a term longer than fifteen years. No qualified
237 military project shall be eligible for tax credits under
238 this subsection unless the department of economic
239 development determines the qualified military project shall
240 achieve a net positive fiscal impact to the state.
620.2020. 1. The department shall respond to a
written request, by or on behalf of a qualified company or
qualified military project, for a proposed benefit award
under the provisions of this program within five business
days of receipt of such request. The department shall
respond to a written request, by or on behalf of a qualified

SB 1188 168
manufacturing company, for a proposed benefit award under
the provisions of this program within fifteen business days
of receipt of such request. Such response shall contain
either a proposal of benefits for the qualified company or
qualified military project, or a written response refusing
to provide such a proposal and stating the reasons for such
refusal. A qualified company or qualified military project
that intends to seek benefits under the program shall submit
to the department a notice of intent. The department shall
respond within thirty days to a notice of intent with an
approval or a rejection, provided that the department may
withhold approval or provide a contingent approval until it
is satisfied that proper documentation of eligibility has
been provided. The department shall certify or reject the
qualifying company's plan outlined in their notice of intent
as satisfying good faith efforts made to employ, at a
minimum, commensurate with the percentage of minority
populations in the state of Missouri, as reported in the
previous decennial census, the following: racial
minorities, contractors who are racial minorities, and
contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum racial
minorities commensurate with the percentage of minority
populations in the state of Missouri, as reported in the
previous decennial census. Failure to respond on behalf of
the department shall result in the notice of intent being
deemed approved. A qualified company receiving approval for
program benefits may receive additional benefits for
subsequent new jobs at the same facility after the full
initial project period if the applicable minimum job
requirements are met. There shall be no limit on the number
of project periods a qualified company may participate in
the program, and a qualified company may elect to file a

SB 1188 169
notice of intent to begin a new project period concurrent
with an existing project period if the applicable minimum
job requirements are achieved, the qualified company
provides the department with the required annual reporting,
and the qualified company is in compliance with this program
and any other state programs in which the qualified company
is currently or has previously participated. However, the
qualified company shall not receive any further program
benefits under the original approval for any new jobs
created after the date of the new notice of intent, and any
jobs created before the new notice of intent shall not be
included as new jobs for purposes of the benefit calculation
for the new approval. When a qualified company has filed
and received approval of a notice of intent and subsequently
files another notice of intent, the department shall apply
the definition of project facility under subdivision (24) of
section 620.2005 to the new notice of intent as well as all
previously approved notices of intent and shall determine
the application of the definitions of new job, new payroll,
project facility base employment, and project facility base
payroll accordingly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the benefits available to the qualified company
under any other state programs for which the company is
eligible and which utilize withholding tax from the new or
retained jobs of the company shall first be credited to the
other state program before the withholding retention level
applicable under this program will begin to accrue. If any
qualified company also participates in a job training
program utilizing withholding tax, the company shall retain
no withholding tax under this program, but the department
shall issue a refundable tax credit for the full amount of

SB 1188 170
benefit allowed under this program. The calendar year
annual maximum amount of tax credits which may be issued to
a qualifying company that also participates in a job
training program shall be increased by an amount equivalent
to the withholding tax retained by that company under a jobs
training program.
3. A qualified company or qualified military project
receiving benefits under this program shall provide an
annual report of the number of jobs, along with minority
jobs created or retained, and such other information as may
be required by the department to document the basis for
program benefits available no later than ninety days prior
to the end of the qualified company's or industrial
development authority's tax year immediately following the
tax year for which the benefits provided under the program
are attributed. In such annual report, if the average wage
is below the applicable percentage of the county average
wage, the qualified company or qualified military project
has not maintained the employee insurance as required, if
the department after a review determines the qualifying
company fails to satisfy other aspects of their notice of
intent, including failure to make good faith efforts to
employ, at a minimum, commensurate with the percentage of
minority populations in the state of Missouri, as reported
in the previous decennial census, the following: racial
minorities, contractors who are racial minorities, and
contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum racial
minorities commensurate with the percentage of minority
populations in the state of Missouri, as reported in the
100 previous decennial census, or if the number of jobs is below
101 the number required, the qualified company or qualified
102 military project shall not receive tax credits or retain the

SB 1188 171
103 withholding tax for the balance of the project period. If a
104 statewide state of emergency exists for more than sixteen
105 months, a qualified company or industrial development
106 authority shall be entitled to a one-time suspension of
107 program deadlines equal to the number of months such
108 statewide state of emergency existed with any partial month
109 rounded to the next whole. During such suspension, the
110 qualified company or industrial development authority shall
111 not be entitled to retain any withholding tax as calculated
112 under subdivision (38) of section 620.2005 nor shall it earn
113 any awarded tax credit or receive any tax credit under the
114 program for the suspension period. The suspension period
115 shall run consecutively and be available to a qualified
116 company or industrial development authority that, during the
117 statewide state of emergency, submitted notice of intent
118 that was approved or that was in year one or a subsequent
119 year of benefits under a program agreement with the
120 department. The suspension period that runs consecutively
121 and may be available to a qualified company or industrial
122 development authority as provided in this subsection may
123 apply retroactively. Any qualified company or industrial
124 development authority requesting a suspension pursuant to
125 this subsection shall submit notice to the department on its
126 provided form identifying the requested start and end dates
127 of the suspension, not to exceed the maximum number of
128 months available under this subsection. Such notice shall
129 be submitted to the department not later than the end of the
130 twelfth month following the termination of the state of
131 emergency. No suspension period shall start later than the
132 date on which the state of emergency was terminated. The
133 department and the qualified company or the industrial
134 development authority shall enter into a program agreement

SB 1188 172
135 or shall amend an existing program agreement, as applicable,
136 stating the deadlines following the suspension period and
137 updating the applicable wage requirements. Failure to
138 timely file the annual report required under this section
139 may result in the forfeiture of tax credits attributable to
140 the year for which the reporting was required and a
141 recapture of withholding taxes retained by the qualified
142 company or qualified military project during such year.
143 4. The department may withhold the approval of any
144 benefits under this program until it is satisfied that
145 proper documentation has been provided, and shall reduce the
146 benefits to reflect any reduction in full-time employees or
147 payroll. Upon approval by the department, the qualified
148 company may begin the retention of the withholding taxes
149 when it reaches the required number of jobs and the average
150 wage meets or exceeds the applicable percentage of county
151 average wage. Tax credits, if any, may be issued upon
152 satisfaction by the department that the qualified company
153 has exceeded the applicable percentage of county average
154 wage and the required number of jobs; provided that, tax
155 credits awarded under subsection 7 of section 620.2010 may
156 be issued following the qualified company's acceptance of
157 the department's proposal and pursuant to the requirements
158 set forth in the written agreement between the department
159 and the qualified company under subsection 4 of section
160 620.2010.
161 5. Any qualified company or qualified military project
162 approved for benefits under this program shall provide to
163 the department, upon request, any and all information and
164 records reasonably required to monitor compliance with
165 program requirements. This program shall be considered a
166 business recruitment tax credit under subdivision (3) of

SB 1188 173
167 subsection 2 of section 135.800, and any qualified company
168 or qualified military project approved for benefits under
169 this program shall be subject to the provisions of sections
170 135.800 to 135.830.
171 6. Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under this
172 program who knowingly hires individuals who are not allowed
173 to work legally in the United States shall immediately
174 forfeit such benefits and shall repay the state an amount
175 equal to any state tax credits already redeemed and any
176 withholding taxes already retained.
177 7. (1) The maximum amount of tax credits that may be
178 authorized under this program for any fiscal year shall be
179 limited as follows, less the amount of any tax credits
180 previously obligated for that fiscal year under any of the
181 tax credit programs referenced in subsection 14 of this
182 section:
183 (a) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2013, but
184 ending on or before June 30, 2014, no more than one hundred
185 six million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
186 (b) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2014, but
187 ending on or before June 30, 2015, no more than one hundred
188 eleven million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
189 (c) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
190 2015, but ending on or before June 30, 2020, no more than
191 one hundred sixteen million dollars in tax credits may be
192 authorized for each fiscal year; and
193 (d) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
194 2020, no more than one hundred six million dollars in tax
195 credits may be authorized for each fiscal year. The
196 provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to tax credits
197 issued to qualified companies under a notice of intent filed
198 prior to July 1, 2020.

SB 1188 174
199 (2) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
200 2020, in addition to the amount of tax credits that may be
201 authorized under paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this
202 subsection, an additional ten million dollars in tax credits
203 may be authorized for each fiscal year for the purpose of
204 the completion of infrastructure projects directly connected
205 with the creation or retention of jobs under the provisions
206 of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 and an additional ten
207 million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each
208 fiscal year for a qualified manufacturing company based on a
209 manufacturing capital investment as set forth in section
210 620.2010.
211 8. For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
212 2020, the maximum total amount of withholding tax that may
213 be authorized for retention for the creation of new jobs
214 under the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 by
215 qualified companies with a project facility base employment
216 of at least fifty shall not exceed seventy-five million
217 dollars for each fiscal year. The provisions of this
218 subsection shall not apply to withholding tax authorized for
219 retention for the creation of new jobs by qualified
220 companies with a project facility base employment of less
221 than fifty.
222 9. For tax credits for the creation of new jobs under
223 section 620.2010, the department shall allocate the annual
224 tax credits based on the date of the approval, reserving
225 such tax credits based on the department's best estimate of
226 new jobs and new payroll of the project, and any other
227 applicable factors in determining the amount of benefits
228 available to the qualified company or qualified military
229 project under this program; provided that, the department
230 may reserve up to twenty-one and one-half percent of the

SB 1188 175
231 maximum annual amount of tax credits that may be authorized
232 under subsection 7 of this section for award under
233 subsection 7 of section 620.2010. However, the annual
234 issuance of tax credits shall be subject to annual
235 verification of actual payroll by the department or, for
236 qualified military projects, annual verification of average
237 salary for the jobs directly created by the qualified
238 military project. Any authorization of tax credits shall
239 expire if, within two years from the date of commencement of
240 operations, or approval if applicable, the qualified company
241 has failed to meet the applicable minimum job requirements.
242 The qualified company may retain authorized amounts from the
243 withholding tax under the project once the applicable
244 minimum job requirements have been met for the duration of
245 the project period. No benefits shall be provided under
246 this program until the qualified company or qualified
247 military project meets the applicable minimum new job
248 requirements or, for benefits awarded under subsection 7 of
249 section 620.2010, until the qualified company has satisfied
250 the requirements set forth in the written agreement between
251 the department and the qualified company under subsection 4
252 of section 620.2010. In the event the qualified company or
253 qualified military project does not meet the applicable
254 minimum new job requirements, the qualified company or
255 qualified military project may submit a new notice of intent
256 or the department may provide a new approval for a new
257 project of the qualified company or qualified military
258 project at the project facility or other facilities.
259 10. Tax credits provided under this program may be
260 claimed against taxes otherwise imposed by chapters 143 and
261 148, and may not be carried forward, but shall be claimed
262 within one year of the close of the [taxable] tax year for

SB 1188 176
263 which they were issued. Tax credits provided under this
264 program may be transferred, sold, or assigned by filing a
265 notarized endorsement thereof with the department that names
266 the transferee, the amount of tax credit transferred, and
267 the value received for the credit, as well as any other
268 information reasonably requested by the department. For a
269 qualified company with flow-through tax treatment to its
270 members, partners, or shareholders, the tax credit shall be
271 allowed to members, partners, or shareholders in proportion
272 to their share of ownership on the last day of the qualified
273 company's tax period.
274 11. Prior to the issuance of tax credits or the
275 qualified company beginning to retain withholding taxes, the
276 department shall verify through the department of revenue
277 and any other applicable state department that the tax
278 credit applicant does not owe any delinquent income, sales,
279 or use tax or interest or penalties on such taxes, or any
280 delinquent fees or assessments levied by any state
281 department and through the department of commerce and
282 insurance that the applicant does not owe any delinquent
283 insurance taxes or other fees. Such delinquency shall not
284 affect the approval, except that any tax credits issued
285 shall be first applied to the delinquency and any amount
286 issued shall be reduced by the applicant's tax delinquency.
287 If the department of revenue, the department of commerce and
288 insurance, or any other state department concludes that a
289 taxpayer is delinquent after June fifteenth but before July
290 first of any year and the application of tax credits to such
291 delinquency causes a tax deficiency on behalf of the
292 taxpayer to arise, then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty
293 days to satisfy the deficiency in which interest, penalties,
294 and additions to tax shall be tolled. After applying all

SB 1188 177
295 available credits toward a tax delinquency, the
296 administering agency shall notify the appropriate department
297 and that department shall update the amount of outstanding
298 delinquent tax owed by the applicant. If any credits remain
299 after satisfying all insurance, income, sales, and use tax
300 delinquencies, the remaining credits shall be issued to the
301 applicant, subject to the restrictions of other provisions
302 of law.
303 12. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to
304 the qualified company to the extent that the amount of tax
305 credits allowed under this program exceeds the amount of the
306 qualified company's tax liability under chapter 143 or 148.
307 13. An employee of a qualified company shall receive
308 full credit for the amount of tax withheld as provided in
309 section 143.211.
310 14. [Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
311 contrary, beginning August 28, 2013, no new benefits shall
312 be authorized for any project that had not received from the
313 department a proposal or approval for such benefits prior to
314 August 28, 2013, under the development tax credit program
315 created under sections 32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding
316 communities tax credit program created under section
317 135.535, the enhanced enterprise zone tax credit program
318 created under sections 135.950 to 135.973, and the Missouri
319 quality jobs program created under sections 620.1875 to
320 620.1890. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
321 construed to limit or impair the ability of any
322 administering agency to authorize or issue benefits for any
323 project that had received an approval or a proposal from the
324 department under any of the programs referenced in this
325 subsection prior to August 28, 2013, or the ability of any
326 taxpayer to redeem any such tax credits or to retain any

SB 1188 178
327 withholding tax under an approval issued prior to that
328 date. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
329 construed to limit or in any way impair the ability of any
330 governing authority to provide any local abatement or
331 designate a new zone under the enhanced enterprise zone
332 program created by sections 135.950 to 135.963.
333 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no
334 qualified company that is awarded benefits under this
335 program shall:
336 (1) Simultaneously receive benefits under the programs
337 referenced in this subsection at the same capital
338 investment; or
339 (2) Receive benefits under the provisions of section
340 620.1910 for the same jobs.
341 15.] If any provision of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020
342 or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
343 invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
344 application of these sections which can be given effect
345 without the invalid provisions or application, and to this
346 end, the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 are
347 hereby declared severable.
348 [16.] 15. By no later than January 1, 2014, and the
349 first day of each calendar quarter thereafter, the
350 department shall present a quarterly report to the general
351 assembly detailing the benefits authorized under this
352 program during the immediately preceding calendar quarter to
353 the extent such information may be disclosed under state and
354 federal law. The report shall include, at a minimum:
355 (1) A list of all approved and disapproved applicants
356 for each tax credit;

SB 1188 179
357 (2) A list of the aggregate amount of new or retained
358 jobs that are directly attributable to the tax credits
359 authorized;
360 (3) A statement of the aggregate amount of new capital
361 investment directly attributable to the tax credits
362 authorized;
363 (4) Documentation of the estimated net state fiscal
364 benefit for each authorized project and, to the extent
365 available, the actual benefit realized upon completion of
366 such project or activity; and
367 (5) The department's response time for each request
368 for a proposed benefit award under this program.
369 [17.] 16. The department may adopt such rules,
370 statements of policy, procedures, forms, and guidelines as
371 may be necessary to carry out the provisions of sections
372 620.2000 to 620.2020. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
373 that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
374 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
375 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
376 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
377 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
378 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
379 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
380 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
381 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
382 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
383 2013, shall be invalid and void.
384 [18.] 17. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
385 act:
386 (1) The provisions of the program authorized under
387 sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 shall be reauthorized as of
388 August 28, 2018, and shall expire on August 28, 2030; and

SB 1188 180
389 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
390 authorized under this section shall automatically sunset
391 twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
392 of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020; and
393 (3) Sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 shall terminate on
394 September first of the calendar year immediately following
395 the calendar year in which the program authorized under
396 sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 is sunset.
[99.1205. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Distressed Areas Land
Assemblage Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Acquisition costs", the purchase
price for the eligible parcel, costs of
environmental assessments, closing costs, real
estate brokerage fees, reasonable demolition
costs of vacant structures, and reasonable
maintenance costs incurred to maintain an
acquired eligible parcel for a period of five
years after the acquisition of such eligible
parcel. Acquisition costs shall not include
costs for title insurance and survey, attorney's
fees, relocation costs, fines, or bills from a
municipality;
(2) "Applicant", any person, firm,
partnership, trust, limited liability company,
or corporation which has:
(a) Incurred, within an eligible project
area, acquisition costs for the acquisition of
land sufficient to satisfy the requirements
under subdivision (8) of this subsection; and
(b) Been appointed or selected, pursuant
to a redevelopment agreement by a municipal
authority, as a redeveloper or similar
designation, under an economic incentive law, to
redevelop an urban renewal area or a
redevelopment area that includes all of an
eligible project area or whose redevelopment
plan or redevelopment area, which encompasses
all of an eligible project area, has been

SB 1188 181
approved or adopted under an economic incentive
law. In addition to being designated the
redeveloper, the applicant shall have been
designated to receive economic incentives only
after the municipal authority has considered the
amount of the tax credits in adopting such
economic incentives as provided in subsection 8
of this section. The redevelopment agreement
shall provide that:
a. The funds generated through the use or
sale of the tax credits issued under this
section shall be used to redevelop the eligible
project area;
b. No more than seventy-five percent of
the urban renewal area identified in the urban
renewal plan or the redevelopment area
identified in the redevelopment plan may be
redeveloped by the applicant; and
c. The remainder of the urban renewal area
or the redevelopment area shall be redeveloped
by co-redevelopers or redevelopers to whom the
applicant has assigned its redevelopment rights
and obligations under the urban renewal plan or
the redevelopment plan;
(3) "Certificate", a tax credit
certificate issued under this section;
(4) "Condemnation proceedings", any action
taken by, or on behalf of, an applicant to
initiate an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to use the power of eminent domain
to acquire a parcel within the eligible project
area. Condemnation proceedings shall include
any and all actions taken after the submission
of a notice of intended acquisition to an owner
of a parcel within the eligible project area by
a municipal authority or any other person or
entity under section 523.250;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department
of economic development;
(6) "Economic incentive laws", any
provision of Missouri law pursuant to which
economic incentives are provided to redevelopers
of a parcel or parcels to redevelop the land,
such as tax abatement or payments in lieu of

SB 1188 182
taxes, or redevelopment plans or redevelopment
projects approved or adopted which include the
use of economic incentives to redevelop the
land. Economic incentive laws include, but are
not limited to, the land clearance for
redevelopment authority law under sections
99.300 to 99.660, the real property tax
increment allocation redevelopment act under
sections 99.800 to 99.865, the Missouri downtown
and rural economic stimulus act under sections
99.915 to 99.1060, and the downtown
revitalization preservation program under
sections 99.1080 to 99.1092;
(7) "Eligible parcel", a parcel:
(a) Which is located within an eligible
project area;
(b) Which is to be redeveloped;
(c) On which the applicant has not
commenced construction prior to November 28,
2007;
(d) Which has been acquired without the
commencement of any condemnation proceedings
100 with respect to such parcel brought by or on
101 behalf of the applicant. Any parcel acquired by
102 the applicant from a municipal authority shall
103 not constitute an eligible parcel; and
104 (e) On which all outstanding taxes, fines,
105 and bills levied by municipal governments that
106 were levied by the municipality during the time
107 period that the applicant held title to the
108 eligible parcel have been paid in full;
109 (8) "Eligible project area", an area which
110 shall have satisfied the following requirements:
111 (a) The eligible project area shall
112 consist of at least seventy-five acres and may
113 include parcels within its boundaries that do
114 not constitute an eligible parcel;
115 (b) At least eighty percent of the
116 eligible project area shall be located within a
117 Missouri qualified census tract area, as
118 designated by the United States Department of
119 Housing and Urban Development under 26 U.S.C.
120 Section 42, or within a distressed community as
121 that term is defined in section 135.530;

SB 1188 183
122 (c) The eligible parcels acquired by the
123 applicant within the eligible project area shall
124 total at least fifty acres, which may consist of
125 contiguous and noncontiguous parcels;
126 (d) The average number of parcels per acre
127 in an eligible project area shall be four or
128 more;
129 (e) Less than five percent of the acreage
130 within the boundaries of the eligible project
131 area shall consist of owner-occupied residences
132 which the applicant has identified for
133 acquisition under the urban renewal plan or the
134 redevelopment plan pursuant to which the
135 applicant was appointed or selected as the
136 redeveloper or by which the person or entity was
137 qualified as an applicant under this section on
138 the date of the approval or adoption of such
139 plan;
140 (9) "Interest costs", interest, loan fees,
141 and closing costs. Interest costs shall not
142 include attorney's fees;
143 (10) "Maintenance costs", costs of
144 boarding up and securing vacant structures,
145 costs of removing trash, and costs of cutting
146 grass and weeds;
147 (11) "Municipal authority", any city,
148 town, village, county, public body corporate and
149 politic, political subdivision, or land trust of
150 this state established and authorized to own
151 land within the state;
152 (12) "Municipality", any city, town,
153 village, or county;
154 (13) "Parcel", a single lot or tract of
155 land, and the improvements thereon, owned by, or
156 recorded as the property of, one or more persons
157 or entities;
158 (14) "Redeveloped", the process of
159 undertaking and carrying out a redevelopment
160 plan or urban renewal plan pursuant to which the
161 conditions which provided the basis for an
162 eligible project area to be included in a
163 redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan are to
164 be reduced or eliminated by redevelopment or
165 rehabilitation; and

SB 1188 184
166 (15) "Redevelopment agreement", the
167 redevelopment agreement or similar agreement
168 into which the applicant entered with a
169 municipal authority and which is the agreement
170 for the implementation of the urban renewal plan
171 or redevelopment plan pursuant to which the
172 applicant was appointed or selected as the
173 redeveloper or by which the person or entity was
174 qualified as an applicant under this section;
175 and such appointment or selection shall have
176 been approved by an ordinance of the governing
177 body of the municipality, or municipalities, or
178 in the case of any city not within a county, the
179 board of aldermen, in which the eligible project
180 area is located. The redevelopment agreement
181 shall include a time line for redevelopment of
182 the eligible project area. The redevelopment
183 agreement shall state that the named developer
184 shall be subject to the provisions of chapter
185 290.
186 3. Any applicant shall be entitled to a
187 tax credit against the taxes imposed under
188 chapters 143, 147, and 148, except for sections
189 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty
190 percent of the acquisition costs, and one
191 hundred percent of the interest costs incurred
192 for a period of five years after the acquisition
193 of an eligible parcel. No tax credits shall be
194 issued under this section until after January 1,
195 2008.
196 4. If the amount of such tax credit
197 exceeds the total tax liability for the year in
198 which the applicant is entitled to receive a tax
199 credit, the amount that exceeds the state tax
200 liability may be carried forward for credit
201 against the taxes imposed under chapters 143,
202 147, and 148 for the succeeding six years, or
203 until the full credit is used, whichever occurs
204 first. The applicant shall not be entitled to a
205 tax credit for taxes imposed under sections
206 143.191 to 143.265. Applicants entitled to
207 receive such tax credits may transfer, sell, or
208 assign the tax credits. Tax credits granted to
209 a partnership, a limited liability company taxed

SB 1188 185
210 as a partnership, or multiple owners of property
211 shall be passed through to the partners,
212 members, or owners respectively pro rata or
213 pursuant to an executed agreement among the
214 partners, members, or owners documenting an
215 alternate distribution method.
216 5. A purchaser, transferee, or assignee of
217 the tax credits authorized under this section
218 may use acquired tax credits to offset up to one
219 hundred percent of the tax liabilities otherwise
220 imposed under chapters 143, 147, and 148, except
221 for sections 143.191 to 143.265. A seller,
222 transferor, or assignor shall perfect such
223 transfer by notifying the department in writing
224 within thirty calendar days following the
225 effective date of the transfer and shall provide
226 any information as may be required by the
227 department to administer and carry out the
228 provisions of this section.
229 6. To claim tax credits authorized under
230 this section, an applicant shall submit to the
231 department an application for a certificate. An
232 applicant shall identify the boundaries of the
233 eligible project area in the application. The
234 department shall verify that the applicant has
235 submitted a valid application in the form and
236 format required by the department. The
237 department shall verify that the municipal
238 authority held the requisite hearings and gave
239 the requisite notices for such hearings in
240 accordance with the applicable economic
241 incentive act, and municipal ordinances. On an
242 annual basis, an applicant may file for the tax
243 credit for the acquisition costs, and for the
244 tax credit for the interest costs, subject to
245 the limitations of this section. If an
246 applicant applying for the tax credit meets the
247 criteria required under this section, the
248 department shall issue a certificate in the
249 appropriate amount. If an applicant receives a
250 tax credit for maintenance costs as a part of
251 the applicant's acquisition costs, the
252 department shall post on its internet website
253 the amount and type of maintenance costs and a

SB 1188 186
254 description of the redevelopment project for
255 which the applicant received a tax credit within
256 thirty days after the department issues the
257 certificate to the applicant.
258 7. The total aggregate amount of tax
259 credits authorized under this section shall not
260 exceed ninety-five million dollars. At no time
261 shall the annual amount of the tax credits
262 issued under this section exceed twenty million
263 dollars. If the tax credits that are to be
264 issued under this section exceed, in any year,
265 the twenty million dollar limitation, the
266 department shall either:
267 (1) Issue tax credits to the applicant in
268 the amount of twenty million dollars, if there
269 is only one applicant entitled to receive tax
270 credits in that year; or
271 (2) Issue the tax credits on a pro rata
272 basis to all applicants entitled to receive tax
273 credits in that year. Any amount of tax
274 credits, which an applicant is, or applicants
275 are, entitled to receive on an annual basis and
276 are not issued due to the twenty million dollar
277 limitation, shall be carried forward for the
278 benefit of the applicant or applicants to
279 subsequent years.
280 No tax credits provided under this section
281 shall be authorized after August 28, 2013. Any
282 tax credits which have been authorized on or
283 before August 28, 2013, but not issued, may be
284 issued, subject to the limitations provided
285 under this subsection, until all such authorized
286 tax credits have been issued.
287 8. Upon issuance of any tax credits
288 pursuant to this section, the department shall
289 report to the municipal authority the
290 applicant's name and address, the parcel numbers
291 of the eligible parcels for which the tax
292 credits were issued, the itemized acquisition
293 costs and interest costs for which tax credits
294 were issued, and the total value of the tax
295 credits issued. The municipal authority and the
296 state shall not consider the amount of the tax
297 credits as an applicant's cost, but shall

SB 1188 187
298 include the tax credits in any sources and uses
299 and cost benefit analysis reviewed or created
300 for the purpose of awarding other economic
301 incentives. The amount of the tax credits shall
302 not be considered an applicant's cost in the
303 evaluation of the amount of any award of any
304 other economic incentives, but shall be
305 considered in measuring the reasonableness of
306 the rate of return to the applicant with respect
307 to such award of other economic incentives. The
308 municipal authority shall provide the report to
309 any relevant commission, board, or entity
310 responsible for the evaluation and
311 recommendation or approval of other economic
312 incentives to assist in the redevelopment of the
313 eligible project area. Tax credits authorized
314 under this section shall constitute
315 redevelopment tax credits, as such term is
316 defined under section 135.800, and shall be
317 subject to all provisions applicable to
318 redevelopment tax credits provided under
319 sections 135.800 to 135.830.
320 9. The department may promulgate rules to
321 implement the provisions of this section. Any
322 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
323 defined in section 536.010, that is created
324 under the authority delegated in this section
325 shall become effective only if it complies with
326 and is subject to all of the provisions of
327 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
328 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
329 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
330 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
331 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
332 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
333 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
334 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
335 adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid
336 and void.]
[135.313. 1. Any person, firm or
corporation who engages in the business of
producing charcoal or charcoal products in the
state of Missouri shall be eligible for a tax

SB 1188 188
credit on income taxes otherwise due pursuant to
chapter 143, except sections 143.191 to 143.261,
as an incentive to implement safe and efficient
environmental controls. The tax credit shall be
equal to fifty percent of the purchase price of
the best available control technology equipment
connected with the production of charcoal in the
state of Missouri or, if the taxpayer
manufactures such equipment, fifty percent of
the manufacturing cost of the equipment, to and
including the year the equipment is put into
service. The credit may be claimed for a period
of eight years beginning with the 1998 calendar
year and is to be a tax credit against the tax
otherwise due.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the
tax due shall not be refunded but may be carried
over to any subsequent taxable year, not to
exceed seven years.
3. The charcoal producer may elect to
assign to a third party the approved tax
credit. Certification of assignment and other
appropriate forms must be filed with the
Missouri department of revenue and the
department of economic development.
4. When applying for a tax credit, the
charcoal producer specified in subsection 1 of
this section shall make application for the
credit to the division of environmental quality
of the department of natural resources. The
application shall identify the specific best
available control technology equipment and the
purchase price, or manufacturing cost of such
equipment. The director of the department of
natural resources is authorized to require
permits to construct prior to the installation
of best available control technology equipment
and other information which he or she deems
appropriate.
5. The director of the department of
natural resources in conjunction with the
department of economic development shall certify
to the department of revenue that the best
available control technology equipment meets the

SB 1188 189
requirements to obtain a tax credit as specified
in this section.]
[135.500. 1. Sections 135.500 to 135.529
shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Certified Capital Company Law".
2. As used in sections 135.500 to 135.529,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Affiliate of a certified company":
(a) Any person, directly or indirectly
owning, controlling or holding power to vote ten
percent or more of the outstanding voting
securities or other ownership interests of the
Missouri certified capital company;
(b) Any person ten percent or more of
whose outstanding voting securities or other
ownership interest are directly or indirectly
owned, controlled or held with power to vote by
the Missouri certified capital company;
(c) Any person directly or indirectly
controlling, controlled by, or under common
control with the Missouri certified capital
company;
(d) A partnership in which the Missouri
certified capital company is a general partner;
(e) Any person who is an officer, director
or agent of the Missouri certified capital
company or an immediate family member of such
officer, director or agent;
(2) "Applicable percentage", one hundred
percent;
(3) "Capital in a qualified Missouri
business", any debt, equity or hybrid security,
of any nature and description whatsoever,
including a debt instrument or security which
has the characteristics of debt but which
provides for conversion into equity or equity
participation instruments such as options or
warrants which are acquired by a Missouri
certified capital company or a qualified
investing entity as a result of a transfer of
cash to a business;

SB 1188 190
(4) "Certified capital", an investment of
cash by an investor in a Missouri certified
capital company;
(5) "Certified capital company", any
partnership, corporation, trust or limited
liability company, whether organized on a profit
or not-for-profit basis, that is located,
headquartered and registered to conduct business
in Missouri that has as its primary business
activity, the investment of cash in qualified
Missouri businesses, and which is certified by
the department as meeting the criteria of
sections 135.500 to 135.529;
(6) "Department", the Missouri department
of economic development;
(7) "Director", the director of the
department of economic development or a person
acting under the supervision of the director;
(8) "Investor", any insurance company that
contributes cash;
(9) "Liquidating distribution", payments
to investors or to the certified capital company
from earnings;
(10) "Person", any natural person or
entity, including a corporation, general or
limited partnership, trust, limited liability
company, or any charitable organization which is
exempt from federal income tax and whose
Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if
any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143;
(11) "Qualified distribution", any
distribution or payment to equity holders of a
certified capital company in connection with the
following:
(a) Reasonable costs and expenses of
forming, syndicating, managing and operating the
certified capital company;
(b) Management fees for managing and
operating the certified capital company; and
(c) Any increase in federal or state
taxes, penalties and interest, including those
related to state and federal income taxes, of
equity owners of a certified capital company

SB 1188 191
which related to the ownership, management or
operation of a certified capital company;
(12) "Qualified investing entity", any
partnership, corporation, trust, or limited
liability company, whether organized on a for-
profit or not-for-profit basis, that:
(a) Is registered to do business in this
state;
(b) Is a wholly owned subsidiary of a
certified capital company or otherwise
affiliated with and under common control with a
certified capital company; and
(c) Has been designated as a qualified
investing entity by such certified capital
company. Such designation shall be effective
upon delivery by the certified capital company
100 of written notice of the designation to the
101 department. A qualified investing entity may
102 raise debt or equity capital for investment, but
103 such capital shall not be considered certified
104 capital. Any qualified investment made by a
105 qualified investing entity after the effective
106 date of this act shall be deemed to have been
107 made by a certified capital company that
108 designated the qualified investing entity as
109 such; provided that no qualified investment may
110 be deemed to have been made by more than one
111 certified capital company;
112 (13) "Qualified investment", the
113 investment of cash by a Missouri certified
114 capital company or a qualified investing entity
115 in such a manner as to acquire capital in a
116 qualified Missouri business;
117 (14) "Qualified Missouri business", an
118 independently owned and operated business, which
119 is headquartered and located in Missouri and
120 which is in need of venture capital and cannot
121 obtain conventional financing. Such business
122 shall have no more than two hundred employees,
123 eighty percent of which are employed in
124 Missouri. Such business shall be involved in
125 commerce for the purpose of manufacturing,
126 processing or assembling products, conducting
127 research and development, or providing services

SB 1188 192
128 in interstate commerce, but excluding retail,
129 real estate, real estate development, insurance
130 and professional services provided by
131 accountants, lawyers or physicians. At the time
132 a certified capital company or qualified
133 investing entity makes an initial investment in
134 a business, such business shall be a small
135 business concern that meets the requirements of
136 the United States Small Business
137 Administration's qualification size standards
138 for its venture capital program, as defined in
139 Section 13 CFR 121.301(c) of the Small Business
140 Investment Act of 1958, as amended. Any
141 business which is classified as a qualified
142 Missouri business at the time of the first
143 investment in such business by a Missouri
144 certified capital company or qualified investing
145 entity shall, for a period of seven years from
146 the date of such first investment, remain
147 classified as a qualified Missouri business and
148 may receive follow-on investments from any
149 Missouri certified capital company or qualified
150 investing entity and such follow-on investments
151 shall be qualified investments even though such
152 business may not meet the other qualifications
153 of this subsection at the time of such follow-on
154 investments;
155 (15) "State premium tax liability", any
156 liability incurred by an insurance company
157 pursuant to the provisions of section 148.320,
158 148.340, 148.370 or 148.376, and any other
159 related provisions, which may impose a tax upon
160 the premium income of insurance companies after
161 January 1, 1997.]
[135.503. 1. Any investor that makes an
investment of certified capital shall, in the
year of investment, earn a vested credit against
state premium tax liability equal to the
applicable percentage of the investor's
investment of certified capital. An investor
shall be entitled to take up to ten percent of
the vested credit in any taxable year of the
investor. Any time after three years after

SB 1188 193
August 28, 1996, the director, with the approval
of the commissioner of administration, may
reduce the applicable percentage on a
prospective basis. Any such reduction in the
applicable percentage by the director shall not
have any effect on credits against state premium
tax liability which have been claimed or will be
claimed by any investor with respect to credits
which have been earned and vested pursuant to an
investment of certified capital prior to the
effective date of any such change.
2. An insurance company claiming a state
premium tax credit earned through an investment
in a certified capital company shall not be
required to pay any additional retaliatory tax
levied pursuant to section 375.916 as a result
of claiming such credit.
3. The credit against state premium tax
liability which is described in subsection 1 of
this section may not exceed the state premium
tax liability of the investor for any taxable
year. All such credits against state premium
tax liability may be carried forward
indefinitely until the credits are utilized.
The maximum amount of certified capital in one
or more certified capital companies for which
earned and vested tax credits will be allowed in
any year to any one investor or its affiliates
shall be limited to ten million dollars.
4. Except as provided in subsection 5 of
this section, the aggregate amount of certified
capital for which earned and vested credits
against state premium tax liability are allowed
for all persons pursuant to sections 135.500 to
135.529 shall not exceed the following amounts:
for calendar year 1996, $0.00; for calendar year
1997, an amount which would entitle all Missouri
certified capital company investors to take
aggregate credits of five million dollars; and
for any year thereafter, an additional amount to
be determined by the director but not to exceed
aggregate credits of ten million dollars for any
year with the approval of the commissioner of
administration and reported to the general

SB 1188 194
assembly as provided in subsection 2 of section
33.282, provided that the amount so determined
shall not impair the ability of an investor with
earned and vested credits which have been
allowed in previous years to take them, pursuant
to subsection 1 of this section. During any
calendar year in which the limitation described
in this subsection will limit the amount of
certified capital for which earned and vested
credits against state premium tax liability are
allowed, certified capital for which credits are
allowed will be allocated in order of priority
based upon the date of filing of information
described in subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of
section 135.516. Certified capital limited in
any calendar year by the application of the
provisions of this subsection shall be allowed
and allocated in the immediately succeeding
calendar year in the order of priority set forth
in this subsection. The department shall make
separate allocations of certified capital for
which credits are allowed under the limitations
described in this subsection and under the
limitations described in subsection 5 of this
section.
5. In addition to the maximum amount
pursuant to subsection 4 of this section, the
aggregate amount of certified capital for which
earned and vested credits against state premium
tax liability are allowed for persons pursuant
to sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall be the
following: for calendar year 1999 and for any
year thereafter, an amount to be determined by
the director which would entitle all Missouri
certified capital company investors to take
aggregate credits not to exceed four million
dollars for any year with the approval of the
commissioner of administration and reported to
the general assembly as provided in subsection 2
of section 33.282, provided that the amount so
determined shall not impair the ability of an
investor with earned and vested credits which
have been allowed in previous years or pursuant
to the provisions of subsection 4 of this

SB 1188 195
section to take them, pursuant to subsection 1
of this section. For purposes of any
100 requirement regarding the schedule of qualified
101 investments for certified capital for which
102 earned and vested credits against state premium
103 tax liability are allowed pursuant to this
104 subsection only, the definition of a "qualified
105 Missouri business" as set forth in subdivision
106 (14) of subsection 2 of section 135.500 means a
107 Missouri business that is located in a
108 distressed community as defined in section
109 135.530, and meets all of the requirements of
110 subdivision (14) of subsection 2 of section
111 135.500. During any calendar year in which the
112 limitation described in this subsection limits
113 the amount of additional certified capital for
114 which earned and vested credits against state
115 premium tax liability are allowed, additional
116 certified capital for which credits are allowed
117 shall be allocated in order of priority based
118 upon the date of filing of information described
119 in subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of section
120 135.516 with respect to such additional
121 certified capital. The department shall make
122 separate allocations of certified capital for
123 which credits are allowed under the limitations
124 described in this subsection and under the
125 limitations described in subsection 4 of this
126 section. No limitation applicable to any
127 certified capital company with respect to
128 certified capital for which credits are allowed
129 pursuant to subsection 4 of this section shall
130 limit the amount of certified capital for which
131 credits are allowed pursuant to this
132 subsection. No limitation applicable to any
133 certified capital company with respect to
134 certified capital for which credits are allowed
135 pursuant to this subsection shall limit the
136 amount of certified capital for which credits
137 are allowed pursuant to subsection 4 of this
138 section.
139 6. The department shall advise any
140 Missouri certified capital company, in writing,
141 within fifteen days after receiving the filing

SB 1188 196
142 described in subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of
143 section 135.516 whether the limitations of
144 subsection 3 of this section then in effect will
145 be applicable with respect to the investments
146 and credits described in such filing with the
147 department.]
[135.505. A Missouri certified capital
company shall have a funding period of one year
from the date of receiving certification from
the director. All investments in the Missouri
certified capital company shall be made within
such three hundred sixty-five-day funding
period.]
[135.508. The department may certify
profit or not-for-profit entities which submit
an application to be designated as a Missouri
certified capital company. The department shall
review the organizational documents for each
applicant for certification and the business
history of the applicant, determine that the
Missouri certified capital company's cash,
marketable securities and other liquid assets
are at least five hundred thousand dollars,
determine that the liquid asset base for
certified companies is at least five hundred
thousand dollars at all times during the
company's participation in the program
authorized by sections 135.500 to 135.529, and
determine that the officers and the board of
directors, partners, trustees or managers are
thoroughly acquainted with the requirements of
sections 135.500 to 135.529. No insurance
company which receives tax credits permitted
under sections 135.500 to 135.529 for an
investment in a Missouri certified capital
company shall, individually or with or through
one or more affiliates, be a managing general
partner of or control the direction of
investments of that Missouri certified capital
company. Within seventy-five days of
application, the department shall either issue
the certification and notify the department of
revenue and the director of the department of

SB 1188 197
commerce and insurance of such certification or
shall refuse the certification and communicate
in detail to the applicant the grounds for the
refusal, including the suggestions for the
removal of those grounds. The department shall
be responsible for the administration of the tax
credits authorized by sections 135.500 to
135.529. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated under the authority of sections
135.500 to 135.529 shall become effective unless
it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536. All rulemaking
authority delegated prior to June 27, 1997, is
of no force and effect and repealed; however,
nothing in this section shall be interpreted to
repeal or affect the validity of any rule filed
or adopted prior to June 27, 1997, if such rule
complied with the provisions of chapter 536.
The provisions of this section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536, including the ability to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a
rule or portion of a rule, are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the purported grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule so proposed
and contained in the order of rulemaking shall
be invalid and void.]
[135.516. 1. To continue to be certified,
a Missouri certified capital company shall make
qualified investments according to the following
schedule:
(1) Within two years after the date on
which a Missouri certified capital company is
designated as a Missouri certified capital
company at least twenty-five percent of its
certified capital shall be, or have been, placed
in qualified investments;
(2) Within three years after the date on
which a Missouri certified capital company is
designated as a Missouri certified capital
company at least forty percent of its certified

SB 1188 198
capital shall be, or have been, placed in
qualified investments;
(3) Within four years after the date on
which a Missouri certified capital company is
designated as a Missouri certified capital
company, at least fifty percent of its total
certified capital shall be, or have been, placed
in qualified investments. A Missouri certified
capital company may not make an investment in an
affiliate of the certified capital company. For
the purposes of this subsection, if a legal
entity is not an affiliate before a certified
capital company initially invests in the entity,
it will not be an affiliate if a certified
capital company provides additional investment
in such entity subsequent to its initial
investment;
(4) A certified capital company, at least
fifteen working days prior to making what it
determines to be an initial qualified investment
in a specific qualified Missouri business, shall
certify to the department that the company in
which it or a qualified investing entity
proposes to invest is a qualified Missouri
business. The certified capital company shall
state the amount of capital it or a qualified
investing entity intends to invest and the name
of the business in which it or a qualified
investing entity intends to invest. The
certified capital company shall also provide to
the department an explanation of its
determination that the business meets the
definition of a qualified Missouri business. If
the department determines that the business does
not meet the definition of a qualified Missouri
business, it shall, within the fifteen-working-
day period prior to the making of the proposed
investment, notify the certified capital company
of its determination and an explanation
thereof. If the department fails to notify the
certified capital company with respect to the
proposed investment within the fifteen-working-
day period prior to the making of the proposed
investment, the company in which the certified

SB 1188 199
capital company or a qualified investing entity
proposes to invest shall be deemed to be a
qualified Missouri business. If a certified
capital company fails to notify the department
prior to making an initial investment in a
business, the department may subsequently
determine that the business in which the
certified capital company or a qualified
investing entity invested was not a qualified
Missouri business even though the business, at
the time of the investment, met the requirements
of subdivision (15) of subsection 2 of section
135.500;
(5) All certified capital which is not
required to be placed in qualified investments
or which has been placed in qualified
investments and can be received by the company,
may be held or invested in such manner as the
Missouri certified capital company, in its
discretion, deems appropriate. The proceeds of
all certified capital which is received by a
certified capital company after it was
originally placed in qualified investments may
be placed again in qualified investments and
shall count toward any requirement in sections
135.500 to 135.529 with respect to placing
certified capital in qualified investments.
2. A certified capital company may make
qualified distributions at any time. In order
to make distributions, other than qualified
distributions, a certified capital company must
have made cumulative qualified investments,
including those made through a qualified
investing entity, in an amount cumulatively
equal to at least one hundred percent of its
certified capital. Cumulative distributions to
equity holders, other than qualified
distributions, in excess of the certified
capital company's original certified capital and
any additional capital contributions to the
certified capital company shall be subject to
100 audit by a nationally recognized certified
101 public accounting firm acceptable to the
102 department, at the expense of the certified

SB 1188 200
103 capital company. The audit shall determine
104 whether aggregate cumulative distributions to
105 all investors and equity holders, other than
106 qualified distributions, when combined with all
107 tax credits utilized by investors pursuant to
108 sections 135.500 to 135.529, have resulted in an
109 annual internal rate of return of fifteen
110 percent computed on the sum of total original
111 certified capital of the certified capital
112 company and any additional capital contributions
113 to the certified capital company. Twenty-five
114 percent of distributions made, other than
115 qualified distributions, in excess of the amount
116 required to produce a fifteen percent annual
117 internal rate of return, as determined by the
118 audit, shall be payable by the certified capital
119 company to the Missouri development finance
120 board. Distributions or payments to debt
121 holders of a certified capital company, however,
122 may be made without restriction with respect to
123 debt owed to them by a certified capital
124 company. A debt holder that is also an investor
125 or equity holder of a certified capital company
126 may receive distributions or payments with
127 respect to such debt without restriction.
128 3. No qualified investment may be made at
129 a cost to a Missouri certified capital company
130 greater than fifteen percent of the total
131 certified capital under management of the
132 Missouri certified capital company at the time
133 of investment.
134 4. Documents and other materials submitted
135 by Missouri certified capital companies or by
136 businesses for purposes of the continuance of
137 certification may be deemed "closed records"
138 pursuant to the provisions of section 620.014.
139 5. Each Missouri certified capital company
140 shall report the following to the department:
141 (1) As soon as practicable after the
142 receipt of certified capital, the name of each
143 investor from which the certified capital was
144 received, the amount of each investor's
145 investment of certified capital and tax credits
146 computed without regard to any limitations under

SB 1188 201
147 subsection 3 of section 135.503, and the date on
148 which the certified capital was received;
149 (2) On a quarterly basis, the amount of
150 the Missouri certified capital company's
151 certified capital at the end of the quarter,
152 whether or not the Missouri certified capital
153 company has invested, together with any
154 investments made by a qualified investing entity
155 that are deemed to have been made by the
156 certified capital company, more than fifteen
157 percent of the total certified capital under
158 management in any one company, and all qualified
159 investments that the Missouri certified capital
160 company has made or has been deemed to have been
161 made through a qualified investing entity;
162 (3) Each Missouri certified capital
163 company shall provide annual audited financial
164 statements to the department which include an
165 opinion of an independent certified public
166 accountant to the department within ninety days
167 of the close of the fiscal year. At the same
168 time, the certified capital company shall also
169 provide audited financial statements for any
170 qualified investing entity that has made
171 qualified investments on its behalf, unless the
172 financial results of such qualified investing
173 entity are included in the consolidated
174 financial statements of the certified capital
175 company. The audit shall address the methods of
176 operation and conduct of the business of the
177 Missouri certified capital company to determine
178 if the Missouri certified capital company is
179 complying with the statutes and program rules
180 and that the funds received by the Missouri
181 certified capital company have been invested as
182 required within the time limits provided by
183 sections 135.500 to 135.529.]
[135.517. In order for investments of a
qualifying investing entity to be counted as
qualified investments pursuant to sections
135.500 to 135.529, each such investment of a
qualifying investing entity must have received
prior approval from the department.]

SB 1188 202
[135.520. 1. The division of finance
shall conduct an annual review of each Missouri
certified capital company and any qualified
investing entities designated by it to determine
if the Missouri certified capital company is
abiding by the requirements of certifications,
to advise the Missouri certified capital company
as to the certification status of its qualified
investments and to ensure that no investment has
been made in violation of sections 135.500 to
135.529. The cost of the annual review shall be
paid by each Missouri certified capital company
according to a reasonable fee schedule adopted
by the department. The division of finance
shall report its findings to the department as
soon as practicable following completion of the
audit.
2. Any material violation of sections
135.500 to 135.529 shall be grounds for
decertification under this section. If the
department determines that a company is not in
compliance with any requirements for continuing
in certification, it shall, by written notice,
inform the officers of the company and the board
of directors, managers, trustees or general
partners that they may be decertified in one
hundred twenty days from the date of mailing of
the notice, unless they correct the deficiencies
and are again in compliance with the
requirements for certification.
3. At the end of the one hundred twenty-
day grace period, if the Missouri certified
capital company is still not in compliance, the
department may send a notice of decertification
to the company and to the directors of the
department of revenue and department of commerce
and insurance. Decertification of a Missouri
certified capital company prior to the certified
capital company meeting all requirements of
subdivisions (1) to (3) of subsection 1 of
section 135.516 shall cause the recapture of all
premium tax credits previously claimed by an
investor and the forfeiture of all future
credits to be claimed by an investor with

SB 1188 203
respect to its investment in the certified
capital company. Decertification of a Missouri
certified capital company after it has met all
requirements of subdivisions (1) to (3) of
subsection 1 of section 135.516 shall cause the
forfeiture of premium tax credits for the
taxable year of the investor in which the
decertification arose and for future taxable
years with no recapture of tax credits obtained
by an investor with respect to the investor's
tax years which ended before the decertification
occurred. Once a certified capital company has
made cumulative qualified investments, including
those made through a qualified investing entity
and deemed to have been made by the certified
capital company, in an amount equal to at least
one hundred percent of its certified capital,
all future premium tax credits to be claimed by
investors with respect to said certified capital
company pursuant to sections 135.500 to 135.529
shall be nonforfeitable. Once a certified
capital company has made cumulative qualified
investments, including those made through a
qualified investing entity and deemed to have
been made by the certified capital company, in
an amount equal to at least one hundred percent
of its certified capital and has met all other
requirements under sections 135.500 to 135.529,
it shall no longer be subject to regulation by
the department except with respect to the
payment of distributions to the Missouri
development finance board.]
[135.523. The department may revoke the
certification of a Missouri certified capital
company if any material representation to the
department in connection with the application
process proves to have been falsely made or if
the application materially violates any
requirement established by the department
pursuant to sections 135.500 to 135.529.]
[135.526. All investments for which tax
credits are claimed under the provisions of
sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall satisfy the

SB 1188 204
conditions of being registered or specifically
exempt from registration by provisions or
regulations under chapter 409.]
[135.529. 1. The tax credit established
pursuant to sections 135.500 to 135.529 may be
sold or transferred in accordance with
regulations adopted by the department. Any such
sale or transfer shall not affect the time
schedule for taking the tax credit, as provided
in sections 135.500 to 135.529. Any premium tax
credits recaptured pursuant to section 135.520
shall be the liability of the taxpayer which
actually claimed the credit. In approving the
sale or transfer of the credit pursuant to this
section, the department may require the
transferor or the transferee or both the
transferor and the transferee to execute
guarantees or post bonds with respect to any
potential credit recapture.
2. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated under the authority of sections
135.500 to 135.529 shall become effective unless
it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536. The department shall
make and promulgate emergency rules and
regulations consistent with the provisions of
sections 135.500 to 135.529 as are necessary or
useful to carry out the provisions of sections
135.500 to 135.529, pursuant to section 536.025.
3. Every final order, decision, license or
other official act of the director pursuant to
sections 135.500 to 135.529 is subject to
administrative review in accordance with chapter
621.]
[135.535. 1. A corporation, limited
liability corporation, partnership or sole
proprietorship, which moves its operations from
outside Missouri or outside a distressed
community into a distressed community, or which
commences operations in a distressed community
on or after January 1, 1999, and in either case
has more than seventy-five percent of its
employees at the facility in the distressed

SB 1188 205
community, and which has fewer than one hundred
employees for whom payroll taxes are paid, and
which is a manufacturing, biomedical, medical
devices, scientific research, animal research,
computer software design or development,
computer programming, including internet, web
hosting, and other information technology,
wireless or wired or other telecommunications or
a professional firm shall receive a forty
percent credit against income taxes owed
pursuant to chapter 143, 147 or 148, other than
taxes withheld pursuant to sections 143.191 to
143.265, for each of the three years after such
move, if approved by the department of economic
development, which shall issue a certificate of
eligibility if the department determines that
the taxpayer is eligible for such credit. The
maximum amount of credits per taxpayer set forth
in this subsection shall not exceed one hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars for each of the
three years for which the credit is claimed.
The department of economic development, by means
of rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 536, shall assign
appropriate North American Industry
Classification System numbers to the companies
which are eligible for the tax credits provided
for in this section. Such three-year credits
shall be awarded only one time to any company
which moves its operations from outside of
Missouri or outside of a distressed community
into a distressed community or to a company
which commences operations within a distressed
community. A taxpayer shall file an application
for certification of the tax credits for the
first year in which credits are claimed and for
each of the two succeeding taxable years for
which credits are claimed.
2. Employees of such facilities physically
working and earning wages for that work within a
distressed community whose employers have been
approved for tax credits pursuant to subsection
1 of this section by the department of economic
development for whom payroll taxes are paid

SB 1188 206
shall also be eligible to receive a tax credit
against individual income tax, imposed pursuant
to chapter 143, equal to one and one-half
percent of their gross salary paid at such
facility earned for each of the three years that
the facility receives the tax credit provided by
this section, so long as they were qualified
employees of such entity. The employer shall
calculate the amount of such credit and shall
report the amount to the employee and the
department of revenue.
3. A tax credit against income taxes owed
pursuant to chapter 143, 147 or 148, other than
the taxes withheld pursuant to sections 143.191
to 143.265, in lieu of the credit against income
taxes as provided in subsection 1 of this
section, may be taken by such an entity in a
distressed community in an amount of forty
percent of the amount of funds expended for
computer equipment and its maintenance, medical
laboratories and equipment, research laboratory
equipment, manufacturing equipment, fiber optic
equipment, high speed telecommunications, wiring
or software development expense up to a maximum
of seventy-five thousand dollars in tax credits
for such equipment or expense per year per
entity and for each of three years after
commencement in or moving operations into a
distressed community.
4. A corporation, partnership or sole
partnership, which has no more than one hundred
employees for whom payroll taxes are paid, which
is already located in a distressed community and
which expends funds for such equipment pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section in an amount
exceeding its average of the prior two years for
such equipment, shall be eligible to receive a
tax credit against income taxes owed pursuant to
chapters 143, 147 and 148 in an amount equal to
the lesser of seventy-five thousand dollars or
twenty-five percent of the funds expended for
such additional equipment per such entity. Tax
credits allowed pursuant to this subsection or
subsection 1 of this section may be carried back

SB 1188 207
to any of the three prior tax years and carried
forward to any of the next five tax years.
100 5. An existing corporation, partnership or
101 sole proprietorship that is located within a
102 distressed community and that relocates
103 employees from another facility outside of the
104 distressed community to its facility within the
105 distressed community, and an existing business
106 located within a distressed community that hires
107 new employees for that facility may both be
108 eligible for the tax credits allowed by
109 subsections 1 and 3 of this section. To be
110 eligible for such tax credits, such a business,
111 during one of its tax years, shall employ within
112 a distressed community at least twice as many
113 employees as were employed at the beginning of
114 that tax year. A business hiring employees
115 shall have no more than one hundred employees
116 before the addition of the new employees. This
117 subsection shall only apply to a business which
118 is a manufacturing, biomedical, medical devices,
119 scientific research, animal research, computer
120 software design or development, computer
121 programming or telecommunications business, or a
122 professional firm.
123 6. Tax credits shall be approved for
124 applicants meeting the requirements of this
125 section in the order that such applications are
126 received. Certificates of tax credits issued in
127 accordance with this section may be transferred,
128 sold or assigned by notarized endorsement which
129 names the transferee.
130 7. The tax credits allowed pursuant to
131 subsections 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 of this section
132 shall be for an amount of no more than ten
133 million dollars for each year beginning in
134 1999. The total maximum credit for all entities
135 already located in distressed communities and
136 claiming credits pursuant to subsection 4 of
137 this section shall be seven hundred and fifty
138 thousand dollars. The department of economic
139 development in approving taxpayers for the
140 credit as provided for in subsection 6 of this
141 section shall use information provided by the

SB 1188 208
142 department of revenue regarding taxes paid in
143 the previous year, or projected taxes for those
144 entities newly established in the state, as the
145 method of determining when this maximum will be
146 reached and shall maintain a record of the order
147 of approval. Any tax credit not used in the
148 period for which the credit was approved may be
149 carried over until the full credit has been
150 allowed.
151 8. A Missouri employer relocating into a
152 distressed community and having employees
153 covered by a collective bargaining agreement at
154 the facility from which it is relocating shall
155 not be eligible for the credits in subsection 1,
156 3, 4 or 5 of this section, and its employees
157 shall not be eligible for the credit in
158 subsection 2 of this section if the relocation
159 violates or terminates a collective bargaining
160 agreement covering employees at the facility,
161 unless the affected collective bargaining unit
162 concurs with the move.
163 9. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
164 the contrary, no taxpayer shall earn the tax
165 credits allowed in this section and the tax
166 credits otherwise allowed in section 135.110, or
167 the tax credits, exemptions, and refund
168 otherwise allowed in sections 135.200, 135.220,
169 135.225 and 135.245, respectively, for the same
170 business for the same tax period.]
[135.545. A taxpayer shall be allowed a
credit for taxes paid pursuant to chapter 143,
147 or 148 in an amount equal to fifty percent
of a qualified investment in transportation
development for aviation, mass transportation,
including parking facilities for users of mass
transportation, railroads, ports, including
parking facilities and limited access roads
within ports, waterborne transportation, bicycle
and pedestrian paths, or rolling stock located
in a distressed community as defined in section
135.530, and which are part of a development
plan approved by the appropriate local agency.
If the department of economic development

SB 1188 209
determines the investment has been so approved,
the department shall grant the tax credit in
order of date received. A taxpayer may carry
forward any unused tax credit for up to ten
years and may carry it back for the previous
three years until such credit has been fully
claimed. Certificates of tax credit issued in
accordance with this section may be transferred,
sold or assigned by notarized endorsement which
names the transferee. The tax credits allowed
pursuant to this section shall be for an amount
of no more than ten million dollars for each
year. This credit shall apply to returns filed
for all taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 1999. Any unused portion of the tax
credit authorized pursuant to this section shall
be available for use in the future by those
entities until fully claimed. For purposes of
this section, a "taxpayer" shall include any
charitable organization that is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143.]
[135.546. For all tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2005, no tax credits shall
be approved, awarded, or issued to any person or
entity claiming any tax credit under section
135.545; if an organization has been allocated
credits for contribution-based credits prior to
January 1, 2005, the organization may issue such
credits prior to January 1, 2007, for qualified
contributions.]
[135.679. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Qualified Beef Tax
Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Agricultural property", any real and
personal property, including but not limited to
buildings, structures, improvements, equipment,
and livestock, that is used in or is to be used
in this state by residents of this state for:

SB 1188 210
(a) The operation of a farm or ranch; and
(b) Grazing, feeding, or the care of
livestock;
(2) "Authority", the agricultural and
small business development authority established
in chapter 348;
(3) "Backgrounded", any additional weight
at the time of the first qualifying sale, before
being finished, above the established baseline
weight;
(4) "Baseline weight", the average weight
in the immediate past two years of all beef
animals sold that are thirty months of age or
younger, categorized by sex. Baseline weight
for qualified beef animals that are physically
out-of-state but whose ownership is retained by
a resident of this state shall be established by
the average transfer weight in the immediate
past two years of all beef animals that are
thirty months of age or younger and that are
transferred out-of-state but whose ownership is
retained by a resident of this state,
categorized by sex. The established baseline
weight shall be effective for a period of three
years. If the taxpayer is a qualifying beef
animal producer with fewer than two years of
production, the baseline weight shall be
established by the available average weight in
the immediate past year of all beef animals sold
that are thirty months of age or younger,
categorized by sex. If the qualifying beef
animal producer has no previous production, the
baseline weight shall be established by the
authority;
(5) "Finished", the period from
backgrounded to harvest;
(6) "Qualifying beef animal", any beef
animal that is certified by the authority, that
was born in this state after August 28, 2008,
that was raised and backgrounded or finished in
this state by the taxpayer, excluding any beef
animal more than thirty months of age as
verified by certified written birth records;

SB 1188 211
(7) "Qualifying sale", the first time a
qualifying beef animal is sold in this state
after the qualifying beef animal is
backgrounded, and a subsequent sale if the
weight of the qualifying beef animal at the time
of the subsequent sale is greater than the
weight of the qualifying beef animal at the time
of the first qualifying sale of such beef animal;
(8) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax
otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, or otherwise due under chapter 147;
(9) "Taxpayer", any individual or entity
who:
(a) Is subject to the tax imposed in
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or the tax
imposed in chapter 147;
(b) In the case of an individual, is a
resident of this state as verified by a 911
address or in the absence of a 911 system, a
physical address; and
(c) Owns or rents agricultural property
and principal place of business is located in
this state.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2009, but ending on or before
December 31, 2021, a taxpayer shall be allowed a
tax credit for the first qualifying sale and for
a subsequent qualifying sale of all qualifying
beef animals.
(2) The tax credit amount for the first
qualifying sale shall be ten cents per pound for
qualifying sale weights under six hundred pounds
and twenty-five cents per pound for qualifying
sale weights of six hundred pounds or greater,
shall be based on the backgrounded weight of all
qualifying beef animals at the time of the first
qualifying sale, and shall be calculated as
follows:
(a) If the qualifying sale weight is under
six hundred pounds, the qualifying sale weight
minus the baseline weight multiplied by ten
cents, as long as the qualifying sale weight is

SB 1188 212
equal to or greater than one hundred pounds
above the baseline weight; or
100 (b) If the qualifying sale weight is six
101 hundred pounds or greater, the qualifying sale
102 weight minus the baseline weight multiplied by
103 twenty-five cents, as long as the qualifying
104 sale weight is equal to or greater than one
105 hundred pounds above the baseline weight.
106 (3) The tax credit amount for each
107 subsequent qualifying sale shall be ten cents
108 per pound for qualifying sale weights under six
109 hundred pounds and twenty-five cents per pound
110 for qualifying sale weights of six hundred
111 pounds or greater, shall be based on the
112 backgrounded weight of all qualifying beef
113 animals at the time of the subsequent qualifying
114 sale, and shall be calculated as follows:
115 (a) If the qualifying sale weight is under
116 six hundred pounds, the qualifying sale weight
117 minus the baseline weight multiplied by ten
118 cents, as long as the qualifying sale weight is
119 equal to or greater than one hundred pounds
120 above the baseline weight; or
121 (b) If the qualifying sale weight is six
122 hundred pounds or greater, the qualifying sale
123 weight minus the baseline weight multiplied by
124 twenty-five cents, as long as the qualifying
125 sale weight is equal to or greater than one
126 hundred pounds above the baseline weight.
127 The authority may waive no more than twenty-
128 five percent of the one-hundred-pound weight
129 gain requirement, but any such waiver shall be
130 based on a disaster declaration issued by the
131 U.S. Department of Agriculture.
132 4. The amount of the tax credit claimed
133 shall not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's
134 state tax liability for the tax year for which
135 the credit is claimed. No tax credit claimed
136 under this section shall be refundable. The tax
137 credit shall be claimed in the tax year in which
138 the qualifying sale of the qualifying beef
139 occurred, but any amount of credit that the
140 taxpayer is prohibited by this section from
141 claiming in a tax year may be carried forward to

SB 1188 213
142 any of the taxpayer's four subsequent tax
143 years. The total amount of tax credits that any
144 taxpayer may claim shall not exceed fifteen
145 thousand dollars per year. No taxpayer shall be
146 allowed to claim tax credits under this section
147 for more than three years. The amount of tax
148 credits that may be issued to all eligible
149 applicants claiming tax credits authorized in
150 this section and section 135.686 in a calendar
151 year shall not exceed two million dollars. Tax
152 credits shall be issued on an as-received
153 application basis until the calendar year limit
154 is reached. Any credits not issued in any
155 calendar year shall expire and shall not be
156 issued in any subsequent years.
157 5. To claim the tax credit allowed under
158 this section, the taxpayer shall submit to the
159 authority an application for the tax credit on a
160 form provided by the authority and any
161 application fee imposed by the authority. The
162 application shall be filed with the authority at
163 the end of each calendar year in which a
164 qualified sale was made and for which a tax
165 credit is claimed under this section. The
166 application shall include any certified
167 documentation and information required by the
168 authority. All required information obtained by
169 the authority shall be confidential and not
170 disclosed except by court order, subpoena, or as
171 otherwise provided by law. If the taxpayer and
172 the qualified sale meet all criteria required by
173 this section and approval is granted by the
174 authority, the authority shall issue a tax
175 credit certificate in the appropriate amount.
176 Tax credit certificates issued under this
177 section may be assigned, transferred, sold, or
178 otherwise conveyed, and the new owner of the tax
179 credit certificate shall have the same rights in
180 the tax credit as the original taxpayer.
181 Whenever a tax credit certificate is assigned,
182 transferred, sold or otherwise conveyed, a
183 notarized endorsement shall be filed with the
184 authority specifying the name and address of the

SB 1188 214
185 new owner of the tax credit certificate or the
186 value of the tax credit.
187 6. Any information provided under this
188 section shall be confidential information, to be
189 shared with no one except state and federal
190 animal health officials, except as provided in
191 subsection 5 of this section.
192 7. The authority shall, at least annually,
193 submit a report to the Missouri general assembly
194 reviewing the costs and benefits of the program
195 established under this section.
196 8. The authority may promulgate rules to
197 implement the provisions of this section. Any
198 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
199 defined in section 536.010, that is created
200 under the authority delegated in this section
201 shall become effective only if it complies with
202 and is subject to all of the provisions of
203 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
204 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
205 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
206 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
207 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
208 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
209 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
210 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
211 adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid
212 and void.
213 9. This section shall not be subject to
214 the Missouri sunset act, sections 23.250 to
215 23.298.]
[135.680. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adjusted purchase price", the product
of:
(a) The amount paid to the issuer of a
qualified equity investment for such qualified
equity investment; and
(b) The following fraction:
a. The numerator shall be the dollar
amount of qualified low-income community
investments held by the issuer in this state as

SB 1188 215
of the credit allowance date during the
applicable tax year; and
b. The denominator shall be the total
dollar amount of qualified low-income community
investments held by the issuer in all states as
of the credit allowance date during the
applicable tax year;
c. For purposes of calculating the amount
of qualified low-income community investments
held by an issuer, an investment shall be
considered held by an issuer even if the
investment has been sold or repaid; provided
that the issuer reinvests an amount equal to the
capital returned to or recovered by the issuer
from the original investment, exclusive of any
profits realized, in another qualified low-
income community investment within twelve months
of the receipt of such capital. An issuer shall
not be required to reinvest capital returned
from qualified low-income community investments
after the sixth anniversary of the issuance of
the qualified equity investment, the proceeds of
which were used to make the qualified low-income
community investment, and the qualified low-
income community investment shall be considered
held by the issuer through the seventh
anniversary of the qualified equity investment's
issuance;
(2) "Applicable percentage", zero percent
for each of the first two credit allowance
dates, seven percent for the third credit
allowance date, and eight percent for the next
four credit allowance dates;
(3) "Credit allowance date", with respect
to any qualified equity investment:
(a) The date on which such investment is
initially made; and
(b) Each of the six anniversary dates of
such date thereafter;
(4) "Long-term debt security", any debt
instrument issued by a qualified community
development entity, at par value or a premium,
with an original maturity date of at least seven
years from the date of its issuance, with no

SB 1188 216
acceleration of repayment, amortization, or
prepayment features prior to its original
maturity date, and with no distribution,
payment, or interest features related to the
profitability of the qualified community
development entity or the performance of the
qualified community development entity's
investment portfolio. The foregoing shall in no
way limit the holder's ability to accelerate
payments on the debt instrument in situations
where the issuer has defaulted on covenants
designed to ensure compliance with this section
or Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended;
(5) "Qualified active low-income community
business", the meaning given such term in
Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended; provided that any business
that derives or projects to derive fifteen
percent or more of its annual revenue from the
rental or sale of real estate shall not be
considered to be a qualified active low-income
community business;
(6) "Qualified community development
entity", the meaning given such term in Section
45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended; provided that such entity has entered
into an allocation agreement with the Community
Development Financial Institutions Fund of the
U.S. Treasury Department with respect to credits
authorized by Section 45D of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes
the state of Missouri within the service area
set forth in such allocation agreement;
(7) "Qualified equity investment", any
equity investment in, or long-term debt security
issued by, a qualified community development
entity that:
(a) Is acquired after September 4, 2007,
at its original issuance solely in exchange for
cash;
(b) Has at least eighty-five percent of
its cash purchase price used by the issuer to

SB 1188 217
make qualified low-income community investments;
100 and
101 (c) Is designated by the issuer as a
102 qualified equity investment under this
103 subdivision and is certified by the department
104 of economic development as not exceeding the
105 limitation contained in subsection 2 of this
106 section. This term shall include any qualified
107 equity investment that does not meet the
108 provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision
109 if such investment was a qualified equity
110 investment in the hands of a prior holder;
111 (8) "Qualified low-income community
112 investment", any capital or equity investment
113 in, or loan to, any qualified active low-income
114 community business. With respect to any one
115 qualified active low-income community business,
116 the maximum amount of qualified low-income
117 community investments made in such business, on
118 a collective basis with all of its affiliates,
119 that may be used from the calculation of any
120 numerator described in subparagraph a. of
121 paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this
122 subsection shall be ten million dollars whether
123 issued to one or several qualified community
124 development entities;
125 (9) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax
126 otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
127 withholding tax imposed in sections 143.191 to
128 143.265, or otherwise due under section 375.916
129 or chapter 147, 148, or 153;
130 (10) "Taxpayer", any individual or entity
131 subject to the tax imposed in chapter 143,
132 excluding withholding tax imposed in sections
133 143.191 to 143.265, or the tax imposed in
134 section 375.916 or chapter 147, 148, or 153.
135 2. A taxpayer that makes a qualified
136 equity investment earns a vested right to tax
137 credits under this section. On each credit
138 allowance date of such qualified equity
139 investment the taxpayer, or subsequent holder of
140 the qualified equity investment, shall be
141 entitled to a tax credit during the taxable year
142 including such credit allowance date. The tax

SB 1188 218
143 credit amount shall be equal to the applicable
144 percentage of the adjusted purchase price paid
145 to the issuer of such qualified equity
146 investment. The amount of the tax credit
147 claimed shall not exceed the amount of the
148 taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year
149 for which the tax credit is claimed. No tax
150 credit claimed under this section shall be
151 refundable or transferable. Tax credits earned
152 by a partnership, limited liability company, S-
153 corporation, or other pass-through entity may be
154 allocated to the partners, members, or
155 shareholders of such entity for their direct use
156 in accordance with the provisions of any
157 agreement among such partners, members, or
158 shareholders. Any amount of tax credit that the
159 taxpayer is prohibited by this section from
160 claiming in a taxable year may be carried
161 forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent
162 taxable years. The department of economic
163 development shall limit the monetary amount of
164 qualified equity investments permitted under
165 this section to a level necessary to limit tax
166 credit utilization at no more than twenty-five
167 million dollars of tax credits in any fiscal
168 year. Such limitation on qualified equity
169 investments shall be based on the anticipated
170 utilization of credits without regard to the
171 potential for taxpayers to carry forward tax
172 credits to later tax years.
173 3. The issuer of the qualified equity
174 investment shall certify to the department of
175 economic development the anticipated dollar
176 amount of such investments to be made in this
177 state during the first twelve-month period
178 following the initial credit allowance date. If
179 on the second credit allowance date, the actual
180 dollar amount of such investments is different
181 than the amount estimated, the department of
182 economic development shall adjust the credits
183 arising on the second allowance date to account
184 for such difference.
185 4. The department of economic development
186 shall recapture the tax credit allowed under

SB 1188 219
187 this section with respect to such qualified
188 equity investment under this section if:
189 (1) Any amount of the federal tax credit
190 available with respect to a qualified equity
191 investment that is eligible for a tax credit
192 under this section is recaptured under Section
193 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
194 amended; or
195 (2) The issuer redeems or makes principal
196 repayment with respect to a qualified equity
197 investment prior to the seventh anniversary of
198 the issuance of such qualified equity
199 investment. Any tax credit that is subject to
200 recapture shall be recaptured from the taxpayer
201 that claimed the tax credit on a return.
202 5. The department of economic development
203 shall promulgate rules to implement the
204 provisions of this section, including recapture
205 provisions on a scaled proportional basis, and
206 to administer the allocation of tax credits
207 issued for qualified equity investments, which
208 shall be conducted on a first-come, first-serve
209 basis. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
210 term is defined in section 536.010, that is
211 created under the authority delegated in this
212 section shall become effective only if it
213 complies with and is subject to all of the
214 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
215 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
216 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
217 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
218 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
219 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
220 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
221 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
222 adopted after September 4, 2007, shall be
223 invalid and void.
224 6. For fiscal years following fiscal year
225 2010, qualified equity investments shall not be
226 made under this section unless reauthorization
227 is made pursuant to this subsection. For all
228 fiscal years following fiscal year 2010, unless
229 the general assembly adopts a concurrent
230 resolution granting authority to the department

SB 1188 220
231 of economic development to approve qualified
232 equity investments for the Missouri new markets
233 development program and clearly describing the
234 amount of tax credits available for the next
235 fiscal year, or otherwise complies with the
236 provisions of this subsection, no qualified
237 equity investments may be permitted to be made
238 under this section. The amount of available tax
239 credits contained in such a resolution shall not
240 exceed the limitation provided under subsection
241 2 of this section. In any year in which the
242 provisions of this section shall sunset pursuant
243 to subsection 7 of this section, reauthorization
244 shall be made by general law and not by
245 concurrent resolution. Nothing in this
246 subsection shall preclude a taxpayer who makes a
247 qualified equity investment prior to the
248 expiration of authority to make qualified equity
249 investments from claiming tax credits relating
250 to such qualified equity investment for each
251 applicable credit allowance date.
252 7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
253 sunset act:
254 (1) The provisions of the new program
255 authorized under this section shall
256 automatically sunset six years after September
257 4, 2007, unless reauthorized by an act of the
258 general assembly; and
259 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
260 program authorized under this section shall
261 automatically sunset twelve years after the
262 effective date of the reauthorization of this
263 section; and
264 (3) This section shall terminate on
265 September first of the calendar year immediately
266 following the calendar year in which the program
267 authorized under this section is sunset.
268 However, nothing in this subsection shall
269 preclude a taxpayer who makes a qualified equity
270 investment prior to sunset of this section under
271 the provisions of section 23.253 from claiming
272 tax credits relating to such qualified equity
273 investment for each credit allowance date.]

SB 1188 221
[135.682. 1. The director of the
department of economic development or the
director's designee shall issue letter rulings
regarding the tax credit program authorized
under section 135.680, subject to the terms and
conditions set forth in this section. The
director of the department of economic
development may impose additional terms and
conditions consistent with this section to
requests for letter rulings by regulation
promulgated under chapter 536. For the purposes
of this section, the term "letter ruling" means
a written interpretation of law to a specific
set of facts provided by the applicant
requesting a letter ruling.
2. The director or director's designee
shall respond to a request for a letter ruling
within sixty days of receipt of such request.
The applicant may provide a draft letter ruling
for the department's consideration. The
applicant may withdraw the request for a letter
ruling, in writing, prior to the issuance of the
letter ruling. The director or the director's
designee may refuse to issue a letter ruling for
good cause, but must list the specific reasons
for refusing to issue the letter ruling. Good
cause includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The applicant requests the director to
determine whether a statute is constitutional or
a regulation is lawful;
(2) The request involves a hypothetical
situation or alternative plans;
(3) The facts or issues presented in the
request are unclear, overbroad, insufficient, or
otherwise inappropriate as a basis upon which to
issue a letter ruling; and
(4) The issue is currently being
considered in a rulemaking procedure, contested
case, or other agency or judicial proceeding
that may definitely resolve the issue.
3. Letter rulings shall bind the director
and the director's agents and their successors
until such time as the taxpayer or its
shareholders, members, or partners, as

SB 1188 222
applicable, claim all of such tax credits on a
Missouri tax return, subject to the terms and
conditions set forth in properly published
regulations. The letter ruling shall apply only
to the applicant.
4. Letter rulings issued under the
authority of this section shall not be a rule as
defined in section 536.010 in that it is an
interpretation issued by the department with
respect to a specific set of facts and intended
to apply only to that specific set of facts, and
therefore shall not be subject to the rulemaking
requirements of chapter 536.
5. Information in letter ruling requests
as described in section 620.014 shall be closed
to the public. Copies of letter rulings shall
be available to the public provided that the
applicant identifying information and otherwise
protected information is redacted from the
letter ruling as provided in subsection 1 of
section 610.024.]
[135.700. For all tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 1999, a grape grower or wine
producer shall be allowed a tax credit against
the state tax liability incurred pursuant to
chapter 143, exclusive of the provisions
relating to the withholding of tax as provided
in sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount
equal to twenty-five percent of the purchase
price of all new equipment and materials used
directly in the growing of grapes or the
production of wine in the state. Each grower or
producer shall apply to the department of
economic development and specify the total
amount of such new equipment and materials
purchased during the calendar year. The
department of economic development shall certify
to the department of revenue the amount of such
tax credit to which a grape grower or wine
producer is entitled pursuant to this section.
The provisions of this section notwithstanding,
a grower or producer may only apply for and

SB 1188 223
receive the credit authorized by this section
for five tax periods.]
[135.710. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Alternative fuel vehicle refueling
property", property in this state owned by an
eligible applicant and used for storing
alternative fuels and for dispensing such
alternative fuels into fuel tanks of motor
vehicles owned by such eligible applicant or
private citizens;
(2) "Alternative fuels", any motor fuel at
least seventy percent of the volume of which
consists of one or more of the following:
(a) Ethanol;
(b) Natural gas;
(c) Compressed natural gas, or CNG;
(d) Liquified natural gas, or LNG;
(e) Liquified petroleum gas, or LP gas,
propane, or autogas;
(f) Any mixture of biodiesel and diesel
fuel, without regard to any use of kerosene;
(g) Hydrogen;
(3) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(4) "Electric vehicle recharging
property", property in this state owned by an
eligible applicant and used for recharging
electric motor vehicles owned by such eligible
applicant or private citizens;
(5) "Eligible applicant", a business
entity or private citizen that is the owner of
an electric vehicle recharging property or an
alternative fuel vehicle refueling property;
(6) "Qualified Missouri contractor", a
contractor whose principal place of business is
located in Missouri and has been located in
Missouri for a period of not less than five
years;
(7) "Qualified property", an electric
vehicle recharging property or an alternative
fuel vehicle refueling property which, if
constructed after August 28, 2014, was

SB 1188 224
constructed with at least fifty-one percent of
the costs being paid to qualified Missouri
contractors for the:
(a) Fabrication of premanufactured
equipment or process piping used in the
construction of such facility;
(b) Construction of such facility; and
(c) General maintenance of such facility
during the time period in which such facility
receives any tax credit under this section.
If no qualified Missouri contractor is
located within seventy-five miles of the
property, the requirement that fifty-one percent
of the costs shall be paid to qualified Missouri
contractors shall not apply.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2015, but before January 1, 2018, any
eligible applicant who installs and operates a
qualified property shall be allowed a credit
against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265, or due under chapter 147 or
chapter 148 for any tax year in which the
applicant is constructing the qualified
property. The credit allowed in this section
per eligible applicant who is a private citizen
shall not exceed fifteen hundred dollars or per
eligible applicant that is a business entity
shall not exceed the lesser of twenty thousand
dollars or twenty percent of the total costs
directly associated with the purchase and
installation of any alternative fuel storage and
dispensing equipment or any recharging equipment
on any qualified property, which shall not
include the following:
(1) Costs associated with the purchase of
land upon which to place a qualified property;
(2) Costs associated with the purchase of
an existing qualified property; or
(3) Costs for the construction or purchase
of any structure.
3. Tax credits allowed by this section
shall be claimed by the eligible applicant at
the time such applicant files a return for the

SB 1188 225
tax year in which the storage and dispensing or
recharging facilities were placed in service at
a qualified property, and shall be applied
against the income tax liability imposed by
chapter 143, chapter 147, or chapter 148 after
all other credits provided by law have been
applied. The cumulative amount of tax credits
which may be claimed by eligible applicants
claiming all credits authorized in this section
shall not exceed one million dollars in any
calendar year, subject to appropriations.
4. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds
the eligible applicant's tax liability, the
difference shall not be refundable. Any amount
100 of credit that an eligible applicant is
101 prohibited by this section from claiming in a
102 taxable year may be carried forward to any of
103 such applicant's two subsequent taxable years.
104 Tax credits allowed under this section may be
105 assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
106 conveyed.
107 5. Any qualified property, for which an
108 eligible applicant receives tax credits under
109 this section, which ceases to sell alternative
110 fuel or recharge electric vehicles shall cause
111 the forfeiture of such eligible applicant's tax
112 credits provided under this section for the
113 taxable year in which the qualified property
114 ceased to sell alternative fuel or recharge
115 electric vehicles and for future taxable years
116 with no recapture of tax credits obtained by an
117 eligible applicant with respect to such
118 applicant's tax years which ended before the
119 sale of alternative fuel or recharging of
120 electric vehicles ceased.
121 6. The director of revenue shall establish
122 the procedure by which the tax credits in this
123 section may be claimed, and shall establish a
124 procedure by which the cumulative amount of tax
125 credits is apportioned equally among all
126 eligible applicants claiming the credit. To the
127 maximum extent possible, the director of revenue
128 shall establish the procedure described in this
129 subsection in such a manner as to ensure that

SB 1188 226
130 eligible applicants can claim all the tax
131 credits possible up to the cumulative amount of
132 tax credits available for the taxable year. No
133 eligible applicant claiming a tax credit under
134 this section shall be liable for any interest or
135 penalty for filing a tax return after the date
136 fixed for filing such return as a result of the
137 apportionment procedure under this subsection.
138 7. Any eligible applicant desiring to
139 claim a tax credit under this section shall
140 submit the appropriate application for such
141 credit with the department. The application for
142 a tax credit under this section shall include
143 any information required by the department. The
144 department shall review the applications and
145 certify to the department of revenue each
146 eligible applicant that qualifies for the tax
147 credit.
148 8. The department and the department of
149 revenue may promulgate rules to implement the
150 provisions of this section. Any rule or portion
151 of a rule, as that term is defined in section
152 536.010, that is created under the authority
153 delegated in this section shall become effective
154 only if it complies with and is subject to all
155 of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
156 applicable, section 536.028. This section and
157 chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
158 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant
159 to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
160 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
161 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
162 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
163 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2008, shall
164 be invalid and void.
165 9. The provisions of section 23.253 of the
166 Missouri sunset act notwithstanding:
167 (1) The provisions of the new program
168 authorized under this section shall
169 automatically sunset three years after December
170 31, 2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the
171 general assembly; and
172 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
173 program authorized under this section shall

SB 1188 227
174 automatically sunset six years after the
175 effective date of the reauthorization of this
176 section; and
177 (3) This section shall terminate on
178 December thirty-first of the calendar year
179 immediately following the calendar year in which
180 the program authorized under this section is
181 sunset; and
182 (4) The provisions of this subsection
183 shall not be construed to limit or in any way
184 impair the department's ability to redeem tax
185 credits authorized on or before the date the
186 program authorized under this section expires or
187 a taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.]
[135.766. An eligible small business, as
defined in Section 44 of the Internal Revenue
Code, shall be allowed a credit against the tax
otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143, not
including sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an
amount equal to any amount paid by the eligible
small business to the United States Small
Business Administration as a guaranty fee
pursuant to obtaining Small Business
Administration guaranteed financing and to
programs administered by the United States
Department of Agriculture for rural development
or farm service agencies. No tax credits
provided under this section shall be authorized
on or after the thirtieth day following the
effective date of this act. The provisions of
this subsection shall not be construed to limit
or in any way impair the department's ability to
issue tax credits authorized prior to the
thirtieth day following the effective date of
this act, or a taxpayer's ability to redeem such
tax credits.]
[135.950. The following terms, whenever
used in sections 135.950 to 135.970 mean:
(1) "Average wage", the new payroll
divided by the number of new jobs;
(2) "Blighted area", the same meaning as
defined pursuant to section 99.805;

SB 1188 228
(3) "Board", an enhanced enterprise zone
board established pursuant to section 135.957;
(4) "Commencement of commercial
operations" shall be deemed to occur during the
first taxable year for which the new business
facility is first put into use by the taxpayer
in the enhanced business enterprise in which the
taxpayer intends to use the new business
facility;
(5) "County average wage", the average
wages in each county as determined by the
department for the most recently completed full
calendar year. However, if the computed county
average wage is above the statewide average
wage, the statewide average wage shall be deemed
the county average wage for such county for the
purpose of determining eligibility. The
department shall publish the county average wage
for each county at least annually.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subdivision to the contrary, for any taxpayer
that in conjunction with their project is
relocating employees from a Missouri county with
a higher county average wage, such taxpayer
shall obtain the endorsement of the governing
body of the community from which jobs are being
relocated or the county average wage for their
project shall be the county average wage for the
county from which the employees are being
relocated;
(6) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(7) "Director", the director of the
department of economic development;
(8) "Employee", a person employed by the
enhanced business enterprise that is scheduled
to work an average of at least one thousand
hours per year, and such person at all times has
health insurance offered to him or her, which is
partially paid for by the employer;
(9) "Enhanced business enterprise", an
industry or one of a cluster of industries that
is either:

SB 1188 229
(a) Identified by the department as
critical to the state's economic security and
growth; or
(b) Will have an impact on industry
cluster development, as identified by the
governing authority in its application for
designation of an enhanced enterprise zone and
approved by the department; but excluding
gambling establishments (NAICS industry group
7132), retail trade (NAICS sectors 44 and 45),
educational services (NAICS sector 61),
religious organizations (NAICS industry group
8131), public administration (NAICS sector 92),
and food and drinking places (NAICS subsector
722), however, notwithstanding provisions of
this section to the contrary, headquarters or
administrative offices of an otherwise excluded
business may qualify for benefits if the offices
serve a multistate territory. In the event a
national, state, or regional headquarters
operation is not the predominant activity of a
project facility, the new jobs and investment of
such headquarters operation is considered
eligible for benefits under this section if the
other requirements are satisfied. Service
industries may be eligible only if a majority of
its annual revenues will be derived from out of
the state;
(10) "Existing business facility", any
facility in this state which was employed by the
taxpayer claiming the credit in the operation of
an enhanced business enterprise immediately
prior to an expansion, acquisition, addition, or
replacement;
(11) "Facility", any building used as an
enhanced business enterprise located within an
enhanced enterprise zone, including the land on
which the facility is located and all machinery,
equipment, and other real and depreciable
tangible personal property acquired for use at
and located at or within such facility and used
in connection with the operation of such
facility;

SB 1188 230
(12) "Facility base employment", the
greater of the number of employees located at
the facility on the date of the notice of
intent, or for the twelve-month period prior to
the date of the notice of intent, the average
number of employees located at the facility, or
in the event the project facility has not been
100 in operation for a full twelve-month period, the
101 average number of employees for the number of
102 months the facility has been in operation prior
103 to the date of the notice of intent;
104 (13) "Facility base payroll", the total
105 amount of taxable wages paid by the enhanced
106 business enterprise to employees of the enhanced
107 business enterprise located at the facility in
108 the twelve months prior to the notice of intent,
109 not including the payroll of owners of the
110 enhanced business enterprise unless the enhanced
111 business enterprise is participating in an
112 employee stock ownership plan. For the purposes
113 of calculating the benefits under this program,
114 the amount of base payroll shall increase each
115 year based on the consumer price index or other
116 comparable measure, as determined by the
117 department;
118 (14) "Governing authority", the body
119 holding primary legislative authority over a
120 county or incorporated municipality;
121 (15) "Megaproject", any manufacturing or
122 assembling facility, approved by the department
123 for construction and operation within an
124 enhanced enterprise zone, which satisfies the
125 following:
126 (a) The new capital investment is
127 projected to exceed three hundred million
128 dollars over a period of eight years from the
129 date of approval by the department;
130 (b) The number of new jobs is projected to
131 exceed one thousand over a period of eight years
132 beginning on the date of approval by the
133 department;
134 (c) The average wage of new jobs to be
135 created shall exceed the county average wage;

SB 1188 231
136 (d) The taxpayer shall offer health
137 insurance to all new jobs and pay at least
138 eighty percent of such insurance premiums; and
139 (e) An acceptable plan of repayment, to
140 the state, of the tax credits provided for the
141 megaproject has been provided by the taxpayer;
142 (16) "NAICS", the 1997 edition of the
143 North American Industry Classification System as
144 prepared by the Executive Office of the
145 President, Office of Management and Budget. Any
146 NAICS sector, subsector, industry group or
147 industry identified in this section shall
148 include its corresponding classification in
149 subsequent federal industry classification
150 systems;
151 (17) "New business facility", a facility
152 that does not produce or generate electrical
153 energy from a renewable energy resource and
154 satisfies the following requirements:
155 (a) Such facility is employed by the
156 taxpayer in the operation of an enhanced
157 business enterprise. Such facility shall not be
158 considered a new business facility in the hands
159 of the taxpayer if the taxpayer's only activity
160 with respect to such facility is to lease it to
161 another person or persons. If the taxpayer
162 employs only a portion of such facility in the
163 operation of an enhanced business enterprise,
164 and leases another portion of such facility to
165 another person or persons or does not otherwise
166 use such other portions in the operation of an
167 enhanced business enterprise, the portion
168 employed by the taxpayer in the operation of an
169 enhanced business enterprise shall be considered
170 a new business facility, if the requirements of
171 paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of this subdivision
172 are satisfied;
173 (b) Such facility is acquired by, or
174 leased to, the taxpayer after December 31, 2004.
175 A facility shall be deemed to have been acquired
176 by, or leased to, the taxpayer after December
177 31, 2004, if the transfer of title to the
178 taxpayer, the transfer of possession pursuant to
179 a binding contract to transfer title to the

SB 1188 232
180 taxpayer, or the commencement of the term of the
181 lease to the taxpayer occurs after December 31,
182 2004;
183 (c) If such facility was acquired by the
184 taxpayer from another taxpayer and such facility
185 was employed immediately prior to the
186 acquisition by another taxpayer in the operation
187 of an enhanced business enterprise, the
188 operation of the same or a substantially similar
189 enhanced business enterprise is not continued by
190 the taxpayer at such facility; and
191 (d) Such facility is not a replacement
192 business facility, as defined in subdivision
193 (27) of this section;
194 (18) "New business facility employee", an
195 employee of the taxpayer in the operation of a
196 new business facility during the taxable year
197 for which the credit allowed by section 135.967
198 is claimed, except that truck drivers and rail
199 and barge vehicle operators and other operators
200 of rolling stock for hire shall not constitute
201 new business facility employees;
202 (19) "New business facility investment",
203 the value of real and depreciable tangible
204 personal property, acquired by the taxpayer as
205 part of the new business facility, which is used
206 by the taxpayer in the operation of the new
207 business facility, during the taxable year for
208 which the credit allowed by 135.967 is claimed,
209 except that trucks, truck-trailers, truck
210 semitrailers, rail vehicles, barge vehicles,
211 aircraft and other rolling stock for hire,
212 track, switches, barges, bridges, tunnels, and
213 rail yards and spurs shall not constitute new
214 business facility investments. The total value
215 of such property during such taxable year shall
216 be:
217 (a) Its original cost if owned by the
218 taxpayer; or
219 (b) Eight times the net annual rental
220 rate, if leased by the taxpayer. The net annual
221 rental rate shall be the annual rental rate paid
222 by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate
223 received by the taxpayer from subrentals. The

SB 1188 233
224 new business facility investment shall be
225 determined by dividing by twelve the sum of the
226 total value of such property on the last
227 business day of each calendar month of the
228 taxable year. If the new business facility is
229 in operation for less than an entire taxable
230 year, the new business facility investment shall
231 be determined by dividing the sum of the total
232 value of such property on the last business day
233 of each full calendar month during the portion
234 of such taxable year during which the new
235 business facility was in operation by the number
236 of full calendar months during such period;
237 (20) "New job", the number of employees
238 located at the facility that exceeds the
239 facility base employment less any decrease in
240 the number of the employees at related
241 facilities below the related facility base
242 employment. No job that was created prior to
243 the date of the notice of intent shall be deemed
244 a new job;
245 (21) "Notice of intent", a form developed
246 by the department which is completed by the
247 enhanced business enterprise and submitted to
248 the department which states the enhanced
249 business enterprise's intent to hire new jobs
250 and request benefits under such program;
251 (22) "Related facility", a facility
252 operated by the enhanced business enterprise or
253 a related company in this state that is directly
254 related to the operation of the project facility;
255 (23) "Related facility base employment",
256 the greater of:
257 (a) The number of employees located at all
258 related facilities on the date of the notice of
259 intent; or
260 (b) For the twelve-month period prior to
261 the date of the notice of intent, the average
262 number of employees located at all related
263 facilities of the enhanced business enterprise
264 or a related company located in this state;
265 (24) "Related taxpayer":
266 (a) A corporation, partnership, trust, or
267 association controlled by the taxpayer;

SB 1188 234
268 (b) An individual, corporation,
269 partnership, trust, or association in control of
270 the taxpayer; or
271 (c) A corporation, partnership, trust or
272 association controlled by an individual,
273 corporation, partnership, trust or association
274 in control of the taxpayer. "Control of a
275 corporation" shall mean ownership, directly or
276 indirectly, of stock possessing at least fifty
277 percent of the total combined voting power of
278 all classes of stock entitled to vote, "control
279 of a partnership or association" shall mean
280 ownership of at least fifty percent of the
281 capital or profits interest in such partnership
282 or association, and "control of a trust" shall
283 mean ownership, directly or indirectly, of at
284 least fifty percent of the beneficial interest
285 in the principal or income of such trust;
286 ownership shall be determined as provided in
287 Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code of
288 1986, as amended;
289 (25) "Renewable energy generation zone",
290 an area which has been found, by a resolution or
291 ordinance adopted by the governing authority
292 having jurisdiction of such area, to be a
293 blighted area and which contains land,
294 improvements, or a lock and dam site which is
295 unutilized or underutilized for the production,
296 generation, conversion, and conveyance of
297 electrical energy from a renewable energy
298 resource;
299 (26) "Renewable energy resource", shall
300 include:
301 (a) Wind;
302 (b) Solar thermal sources or photovoltaic
303 cells and panels;
304 (c) Dedicated crops grown for energy
305 production;
306 (d) Cellulosic agricultural residues;
307 (e) Plant residues;
308 (f) Methane from landfills, agricultural
309 operations, or wastewater treatment;
310 (g) Thermal depolymerization or pyrolysis
311 for converting waste material to energy;

SB 1188 235
312 (h) Clean and untreated wood such as
313 pallets;
314 (i) Hydroelectric power, which shall
315 include electrical energy produced or generated
316 by hydroelectric power generating equipment, as
317 such term is defined in section 137.010;
318 (j) Fuel cells using hydrogen produced by
319 one or more of the renewable resources provided
320 in paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subdivision; or
321 (k) Any other sources of energy, not
322 including nuclear energy, that are certified as
323 renewable by rule by the department of economic
324 development;
325 (27) "Replacement business facility", a
326 facility otherwise described in subdivision (17)
327 of this section, hereafter referred to in this
328 subdivision as "new facility", which replaces
329 another facility, hereafter referred to in this
330 subdivision as "old facility", located within
331 the state, which the taxpayer or a related
332 taxpayer previously operated but discontinued
333 operating on or before the close of the first
334 taxable year for which the credit allowed by
335 this section is claimed. A new facility shall
336 be deemed to replace an old facility if the
337 following conditions are met:
338 (a) The old facility was operated by the
339 taxpayer or a related taxpayer during the
340 taxpayer's or related taxpayer's taxable period
341 immediately preceding the taxable year in which
342 commencement of commercial operations occurs at
343 the new facility; and
344 (b) The old facility was employed by the
345 taxpayer or a related taxpayer in the operation
346 of an enhanced business enterprise and the
347 taxpayer continues the operation of the same or
348 substantially similar enhanced business
349 enterprise at the new facility. Notwithstanding
350 the preceding provisions of this subdivision, a
351 facility shall not be considered a replacement
352 business facility if the taxpayer's new business
353 facility investment, as computed in subdivision
354 (19) of this section, in the new facility during
355 the tax period for which the credits allowed in

SB 1188 236
356 section 135.967 are claimed exceed one million
357 dollars and if the total number of employees at
358 the new facility exceeds the total number of
359 employees at the old facility by at least two;
360 (28) "Same or substantially similar
361 enhanced business enterprise", an enhanced
362 business enterprise in which the nature of the
363 products produced or sold, or activities
364 conducted, are similar in character and use or
365 are produced, sold, performed, or conducted in
366 the same or similar manner as in another
367 enhanced business enterprise.]
[135.953. 1. For purposes of sections
135.950 to 135.970, an area shall meet the
following criteria in order to qualify as an
enhanced enterprise zone:
(1) The area shall be a blighted area,
have pervasive poverty, unemployment and general
distress; and
(2) At least sixty percent of the
residents living in the area have incomes below
ninety percent of the median income of all
residents:
(a) Within the state of Missouri,
according to the last decennial census or other
appropriate source as approved by the director;
or
(b) Within the county or city not within a
county in which the area is located, according
to the last decennial census or other
appropriate source as approved by the director;
and
(3) The resident population of the area
shall be at least five hundred but not more than
one hundred thousand at the time of designation
as an enhanced enterprise zone if the area lies
within a metropolitan statistical area, as
established by the United States Census Bureau,
or if the area does not lie within a
metropolitan statistical area, the resident
population of the area at the time of
designation shall be at least five hundred but
not more than forty thousand inhabitants. If

SB 1188 237
the population of the jurisdiction of the
governing authority does not meet the minimum
population requirements set forth in this
subdivision, the population of the area must be
at least fifty percent of the population of the
jurisdiction. However, no enhanced enterprise
zone shall be created which consists of the
total area within the political boundaries of a
county;
(4) The level of unemployment of persons,
according to the most recent data available from
the United States Bureau of Census and approved
by the director, within the area is equal to or
exceeds the average rate of unemployment for:
(a) The state of Missouri over the
previous twelve months; or
(b) The county or city not within a county
over the previous twelve months; and
(5) No finding of blight under this
chapter shall be used to meet the conditions for
blight under any other statute of this state.
2. Notwithstanding the requirements of
subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, an
enhanced enterprise zone may be established in
an area located within a county for which public
and individual assistance has been requested by
the governor pursuant to Section 401 of the
Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency
Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 5121, et seq., for an
emergency proclaimed by the governor pursuant to
section 44.100 due to a natural disaster of
major proportions, if the area to be designated
is blighted and sustained severe damage as a
result of such natural disaster, as determined
by the state emergency management agency. An
application for designation as an enhanced
enterprise zone pursuant to this subsection
shall be made before the expiration of one year
from the date the governor requested federal
relief for the area sought to be designated.
3. Notwithstanding the requirements of
subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, an
enhanced enterprise zone may be designated in a
county of declining population if it meets the

SB 1188 238
requirements of subdivisions (1), (3) and either
(2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section. For
the purposes of this subsection, a "county of
declining population" is one that has lost one
percent or more of its population as
demonstrated by comparing the most recent
decennial census population to the next most
recent decennial census population for the
county.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements
of subsection 1, 2, or 3 of this section, an
area, to qualify as an enhanced enterprise zone,
shall be demonstrated by the governing authority
to have either:
(1) The potential to create sustainable
jobs in a targeted industry; or
(2) A demonstrated impact on local
industry cluster development.
5. Notwithstanding the requirements of
subsections 1 and 4 of this section to the
contrary, a renewable energy generation zone may
be designated as an enhanced enterprise zone if
the renewable energy generation zone meets the
criteria set forth in subdivision (25) of
100 section 135.950.]
[135.957. 1. A governing authority
planning to seek designation of an enhanced
enterprise zone shall establish an enhanced
enterprise zone board. The number of members on
the board shall be seven. One member of the
board shall be appointed by the school district
or districts located within the area proposed
for designation as an enhanced enterprise zone.
One member of the board shall be appointed by
other affected taxing districts. The remaining
five members shall be chosen by the chief
elected official of the county or municipality.
2. The school district member and the
affected taxing district member shall each have
initial terms of five years. Of the five
members appointed by the chief elected official,
two shall have initial terms of four years, two
shall have initial terms of three years, and one

SB 1188 239
shall have an initial term of two years.
Thereafter, members shall serve terms of five
years. Each commissioner shall hold office
until a successor has been appointed. All
vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment. For inefficiency or
neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a
member of the board may be removed by the
applicable appointing authority.
3. A majority of the members shall
constitute a quorum of such board for the
purpose of conducting business and exercising
the powers of the board and for all other
purposes. Action may be taken by the board upon
a vote of a majority of the members present.
4. The members of the board annually shall
elect a chair from among the members.
5. The role of the board shall be to
conduct the activities necessary to advise the
governing authority on the designation of an
enhanced enterprise zone and any other advisory
duties as determined by the governing
authority. The role of the board after the
designation of an enhanced enterprise zone shall
be review and assessment of zone activities as
it relates to the annual reports as set forth in
section 135.960.]
[135.960. 1. Any governing authority that
desires to have any portion of a city or
unincorporated area of a county under its
control designated as an enhanced enterprise
zone shall hold a public hearing for the purpose
of obtaining the opinion and suggestions of
those persons who will be affected by such
designation.
2. After a public hearing is held as
required in subsection 1 of this section, the
governing authority may, by a majority vote of
the members of the governing authority, adopt an
ordinance or resolution designating a specific
area as an enhanced enterprise zone. Such
ordinance shall include, in addition to a

SB 1188 240
description of the physical, social, and
economic characteristics of the area:
(1) A plan to provide adequate police
protection within the area;
(2) A specific and practical process for
individual businesses to obtain waivers from
burdensome local regulations, ordinances, and
orders which serve to discourage economic
development within the area to be designated an
enhanced enterprise zone, except that such
waivers shall not substantially endanger the
health or safety of the employees of any such
business or the residents of the area;
(3) A description of what other specific
actions will be taken to support and encourage
private investment within the area;
(4) A plan to ensure that resources are
available to assist area residents to
participate in increased development through
self-help efforts and in ameliorating any
negative effects of designation of the area as
an enhanced enterprise zone;
(5) A statement describing the projected
positive and negative effects of designation of
the area as an enhanced enterprise zone;
(6) A specific plan to provide assistance
to any person or business dislocated as a result
of activities within the enhanced enterprise
zone. Such plan shall determine the need of
dislocated persons for relocation assistance;
provide, prior to displacement, information
about the type, location, and price of
comparable housing or commercial property;
provide information concerning state and federal
programs for relocation assistance and provide
other advisory services to displaced persons.
Public agencies may choose to provide assistance
under the Uniform Relocation and Real Property
Acquisition Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 4601, et
seq., to meet the requirements of this
subdivision; and
(7) A description or plan that
demonstrates the requirements of subsection 4 of
section 135.953.

SB 1188 241
3. An enhanced enterprise zone designation
shall expire in twenty-five years.
4. Each designated enhanced enterprise
zone board shall report to the director on an
annual basis regarding the status of the zone
and business activity within the zone.]
[135.963. 1. Improvements made to real
property as such term is defined in section
137.010 which are made in an enhanced enterprise
zone subsequent to the date such zone or
expansion thereto was designated may, upon
approval of an authorizing resolution or
ordinance by the governing authority having
jurisdiction of the area in which the
improvements are made, be exempt, in whole or in
part, from assessment and payment of ad valorem
taxes of one or more affected political
subdivisions. Improvements made to real
property, as such term is defined in section
137.010, which are locally assessed and in a
renewable energy generation zone designated as
an enhanced enterprise zone, subsequent to the
date such enhanced enterprise zone or expansion
thereto was designated, may, upon approval of an
authorizing resolution or ordinance by the
governing authority having jurisdiction of the
area in which the improvements are made, be
exempt, in whole or in part, from assessment and
payment of ad valorem taxes of one or more
affected political subdivisions. In addition to
enhanced business enterprises, a speculative
industrial or warehouse building constructed by
a public entity or a private entity if the land
is leased by a public entity may be subject to
such exemption.
2. Such authorizing resolution shall
specify the percent of the exemption to be
granted, the duration of the exemption to be
granted, and the political subdivisions to which
such exemption is to apply and any other terms,
conditions, or stipulations otherwise required.
A copy of the resolution shall be provided to
the director within thirty calendar days

SB 1188 242
following adoption of the resolution by the
governing authority.
3. No exemption shall be granted until the
governing authority holds a public hearing for
the purpose of obtaining the opinions and
suggestions of residents of political
subdivisions to be affected by the exemption
from property taxes. The governing authority
shall send, by certified mail, a notice of such
hearing to each political subdivision in the
area to be affected and shall publish notice of
such hearing in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area to be affected by the
exemption at least twenty days prior to the
hearing but not more than thirty days prior to
the hearing. Such notice shall state the time,
location, date, and purpose of the hearing.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this
section, at least one-half of the ad valorem
taxes otherwise imposed on subsequent
improvements to real property located in an
enhanced enterprise zone of enhanced business
enterprises or speculative industrial or
warehouse buildings as indicated in subsection 1
of this section shall become and remain exempt
from assessment and payment of ad valorem taxes
of any political subdivision of this state or
municipality thereof, if said political
subdivision or municipality levies ad valorem
taxes, for a period of not less than ten years
following the date such improvements were
assessed, provided the improved properties are
used for enhanced business enterprises. The
exemption for speculative buildings is subject
to the approval of the governing authority for a
period not to exceed two years if the building
is owned by a private entity and five years if
the building is owned or ground leased by a
public entity. This shall not preclude the
building receiving an exemption for the
remaining time period established by the
governing authority if it was occupied by an
enhanced business enterprise. The two- and five-
year time periods indicated for speculative

SB 1188 243
buildings shall not be an addition to the local
abatement time period for such facility.
5. No exemption shall be granted for a
period more than twenty-five years, provided,
however, that during the ten years prior to the
expiration of an enhanced enterprise zone no
exemption shall be granted for a period of more
than ten years.
6. The provisions of subsection 1 of this
section shall not apply to improvements made to
real property begun prior to August 28, 2004.
7. The abatement referred to in this
section shall not relieve the assessor or other
responsible official from ascertaining the
amount of the equalized assessed value of all
taxable property annually as required by section
99.855, 99.957, or 99.1042 and shall not have
the effect of reducing the payments in lieu of
100 taxes referred to in subdivision (2) of
101 subsection 1 of section 99.845, subdivision (2)
102 of subsection 3 of section 99.957, or
103 subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section
104 99.1042 unless such reduction is set forth in
105 the plan approved by the governing body of the
106 municipality pursuant to subdivision (1) of
107 subsection 1 of section 99.820, section 99.942,
108 or section 99.1027.]
[135.967. 1. A taxpayer who establishes a
new business facility may, upon approval by the
department, be allowed a credit, each tax year
for up to ten tax years, in an amount determined
as set forth in this section, against the tax
imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding
tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265. No
taxpayer shall receive multiple ten-year periods
for subsequent expansions at the same facility.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, any taxpayer who establishes a new
business facility in an enhanced enterprise zone
and is awarded state tax credits under this
section may not also receive tax credits under
sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections 135.200 to
135.286, or section 135.535, and may not

SB 1188 244
simultaneously receive tax credits under
sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 at the same
facility.
3. No credit shall be issued pursuant to
this section unless:
(1) The number of new business facility
employees engaged or maintained in employment at
the new business facility for the taxable year
for which the credit is claimed equals or
exceeds two; and
(2) The new business facility investment
for the taxable year for which the credit is
claimed equals or exceeds one hundred thousand
dollars.
4. The annual amount of credits allowed
for an approved enhanced business enterprise
shall be the lesser of:
(1) The annual amount authorized by the
department for the enhanced business enterprise,
which shall be limited to the projected state
economic benefit, as determined by the
department; or
(2) The sum calculated based upon the
following:
(a) A credit of four hundred dollars for
each new business facility employee employed
within an enhanced enterprise zone;
(b) An additional credit of four hundred
dollars for each new business facility employee
who is a resident of an enhanced enterprise zone;
(c) An additional credit of four hundred
dollars for each new business facility employee
who is paid by the enhanced business enterprise
a wage that exceeds the average wage paid within
the county in which the facility is located, as
determined by the department; and
(d) A credit equal to two percent of new
business facility investment within an enhanced
enterprise zone.
5. Prior to January 1, 2007, in no event
shall the department authorize more than four
million dollars annually to be issued for all
enhanced business enterprises. After December
31, 2006, in no event shall the department

SB 1188 245
authorize more than twenty-four million dollars
annually to be issued for all enhanced business
enterprises.
6. If a facility, which does not
constitute a new business facility, is expanded
by the taxpayer, the expansion shall be
considered eligible for the credit allowed by
this section if:
(1) The taxpayer's new business facility
investment in the expansion during the tax
period in which the credits allowed in this
section are claimed exceeds one hundred thousand
dollars and if the number of new business
facility employees engaged or maintained in
employment at the expansion facility for the
taxable year for which credit is claimed equals
or exceeds two, and the total number of
employees at the facility after the expansion is
at least two greater than the total number of
employees before the expansion; and
(2) The taxpayer's investment in the
expansion and in the original facility prior to
expansion shall be determined in the manner
provided in subdivision (19) of section 135.950.
7. The number of new business facility
employees during any taxable year shall be
determined by dividing by twelve the sum of the
number of individuals employed on the last
business day of each month of such taxable
year. If the new business facility is in
operation for less than the entire taxable year,
the number of new business facility employees
shall be determined by dividing the sum of the
number of individuals employed on the last
business day of each full calendar month during
the portion of such taxable year during which
the new business facility was in operation by
the number of full calendar months during such
period. For the purpose of computing the credit
100 allowed by this section in the case of a
101 facility which qualifies as a new business
102 facility under subsection 6 of this section, and
103 in the case of a new business facility which
104 satisfies the requirements of paragraph (c) of

SB 1188 246
105 subdivision (17) of section 135.950, or
106 subdivision (25) of section 135.950, the number
107 of new business facility employees at such
108 facility shall be reduced by the average number
109 of individuals employed, computed as provided in
110 this subsection, at the facility during the
111 taxable year immediately preceding the taxable
112 year in which such expansion, acquisition, or
113 replacement occurred and shall further be
114 reduced by the number of individuals employed by
115 the taxpayer or related taxpayer that was
116 subsequently transferred to the new business
117 facility from another Missouri facility and for
118 which credits authorized in this section are not
119 being earned, whether such credits are earned
120 because of an expansion, acquisition,
121 relocation, or the establishment of a new
122 facility.
123 8. In the case where a new business
124 facility employee who is a resident of an
125 enhanced enterprise zone for less than a twelve-
126 month period is employed for less than a twelve-
127 month period, the credits allowed by paragraph
128 (b) of subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this
129 section shall be determined by multiplying four
130 hundred dollars by a fraction, the numerator of
131 which is the number of calendar days during the
132 taxpayer's tax year for which such credits are
133 claimed, in which the employee was a resident of
134 an enhanced enterprise zone, and the denominator
135 of which is three hundred sixty-five.
136 9. For the purpose of computing the credit
137 allowed by this section in the case of a
138 facility which qualifies as a new business
139 facility pursuant to subsection 6 of this
140 section, and in the case of a new business
141 facility which satisfies the requirements of
142 paragraph (c) of subdivision (17) of section
143 135.950 or subdivision (25) of section 135.950,
144 the amount of the taxpayer's new business
145 facility investment in such facility shall be
146 reduced by the average amount, computed as
147 provided in subdivision (19) of section 135.950
148 for new business facility investment, of the

SB 1188 247
149 investment of the taxpayer, or related taxpayer
150 immediately preceding such expansion or
151 replacement or at the time of acquisition.
152 Furthermore, the amount of the taxpayer's new
153 business facility investment shall also be
154 reduced by the amount of investment employed by
155 the taxpayer or related taxpayer which was
156 subsequently transferred to the new business
157 facility from another Missouri facility and for
158 which credits authorized in this section are not
159 being earned, whether such credits are earned
160 because of an expansion, acquisition,
161 relocation, or the establishment of a new
162 facility.
163 10. For a taxpayer with flow-through tax
164 treatment to its members, partners, or
165 shareholders, the credit shall be allowed to
166 members, partners, or shareholders in proportion
167 to their share of ownership on the last day of
168 the taxpayer's tax period.
169 11. Credits may not be carried forward but
170 shall be claimed for the taxable year during
171 which commencement of commercial operations
172 occurs at such new business facility, and for
173 each of the nine succeeding taxable years for
174 which the credit is issued.
175 12. Certificates of tax credit authorized
176 by this section may be transferred, sold, or
177 assigned by filing a notarized endorsement
178 thereof with the department that names the
179 transferee, the amount of tax credit
180 transferred, and the value received for the
181 credit, as well as any other information
182 reasonably requested by the department. The
183 sale price cannot be less than seventy-five
184 percent of the par value of such credits.
185 13. The director of revenue shall issue a
186 refund to the taxpayer to the extent that the
187 amount of credits allowed in this section
188 exceeds the amount of the taxpayer's income tax.
189 14. Prior to the issuance of tax credits,
190 the department shall verify through the
191 department of revenue, or any other state
192 department, that the tax credit applicant does

SB 1188 248
193 not owe any delinquent income, sales, or use tax
194 or interest or penalties on such taxes, or any
195 delinquent fees or assessments levied by any
196 state department and through the department of
197 commerce and insurance that the applicant does
198 not owe any delinquent insurance taxes. Such
199 delinquency shall not affect the authorization
200 of the application for such tax credits, except
201 that the amount of credits issued shall be
202 reduced by the applicant's tax delinquency. If
203 the department of revenue or the department of
204 commerce and insurance, or any other state
205 department, concludes that a taxpayer is
206 delinquent after June fifteenth but before July
207 first of any year and the application of tax
208 credits to such delinquency causes a tax
209 deficiency on behalf of the taxpayer to arise,
210 then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty days
211 to satisfy the deficiency in which interest,
212 penalties, and additions to tax shall be
213 tolled. After applying all available credits
214 toward a tax delinquency, the administering
215 agency shall notify the appropriate department,
216 and that department shall update the amount of
217 outstanding delinquent tax owed by the
218 applicant. If any credits remain after
219 satisfying all insurance, income, sales, and use
220 tax delinquencies, the remaining credits shall
221 be issued to the applicant, subject to the
222 restrictions of other provisions of law.]
[135.968. 1. A taxpayer who establishes a
megaproject, approved by the department, within
an enhanced enterprise zone shall, in exchange
for the consideration provided by new tax
revenues and other economic stimuli that will be
generated from the new jobs created by the
megaproject, be allowed an income tax credit
equal to the percentage of actual new annual
payroll of the taxpayer attributable to
employees directly related to the manufacturing
and assembly process and administration, as
provided under subsection 4 of this section. A
taxpayer seeking approval of a megaproject shall

SB 1188 249
submit an application to the department. The
department shall not approve any megaproject
after December 31, 2008. The department shall
not approve any credits for megaprojects to be
issued prior to January 1, 2013, and in no event
shall the department authorize more than forty
million dollars to be issued annually for all
megaprojects. The total amount of credits
issued under this section shall not exceed two
hundred forty million dollars.
2. In considering applications for
approval of megaprojects, the department may
approve an application if:
(1) The taxpayer's project is financially
sound and the taxpayer has adequately
demonstrated an ability to successfully
undertake and complete the megaproject. This
determination shall be supported by a
professional third-party market feasibility
analysis conducted on behalf of the state by a
firm with direct experience with the industry of
the proposed megaproject, and by a professional
third-party financial analysis of the taxpayer's
ability to complete the project;
(2) The taxpayer's plan of repayment to
the state of the amount of tax credits provided
is reasonable and sound;
(3) The taxpayer's megaproject will create
new jobs that were not jobs previously performed
by employees of the taxpayer or a related
taxpayer in Missouri;
(4) Local taxing entities are providing a
significant level of incentives for the
megaproject relative to the projected new local
tax revenues created by the megaproject;
(5) There is at least one other state or
foreign country that the taxpayer verifies is
being considered for the project, and receiving
megaproject tax credits is a major factor in the
taxpayer's decision to go forward with the
project and not receiving the credit will result
in the taxpayer not creating new jobs in
Missouri;

SB 1188 250
(6) The megaproject will be located in an
enhanced enterprise zone which constitutes an
economic or social liability and a detriment to
the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in
its present condition and use;
(7) The completion of the megaproject will
serve an essential public municipal purpose by
creating a substantial number of new jobs for
citizens, increasing their purchasing power,
improving their living conditions, and relieving
the demand for unemployment and welfare
assistance thereby promoting the economic
development of the enhanced enterprise zone, the
municipality, and the state; and
(8) The creation of new jobs will assist
the state in providing the services needed to
protect the health, safety, and social and
economic well-being of the citizens of the state.
3. Prior to final approval of an
application, a binding contract shall be
executed between the taxpayer and the department
of economic development which shall include, but
not be limited to:
(1) A repayment plan providing for cash
payment to the state general revenue fund which
shall result in a positive internal rate of
return to the state and fully comply with the
provisions of the World Trade Organization
Agreement on Subsidies and Countervailing
Measures. The rate of return shall be
commercially reasonable and, over the life of
the project, exceed one hundred and fifty
percent of the state's borrowing costs based on
the AAA-rated twenty-year tax-exempt bond rate
average over a twenty-year borrowing period.
The rate shall be verified by a professional
third-party financial analysis;
(2) The taxpayer's obligation to construct
a facility of at least one million square feet
within five years from the date of approval;
(3) A requirement that the issuance of tax
credits authorized under this section shall
cease and the taxpayer shall immediately submit
100 payment, to the state general revenue fund, in

SB 1188 251
101 an amount equal to all credits previously issued
102 less any amounts previously repaid, increased by
103 an additional amount that shall provide the
104 state a reasonable rate of return, in the event
105 the taxpayer:
106 (a) Fails to construct a facility of at
107 least one million square feet within five years
108 of the date of approval;
109 (b) Fails to make a scheduled payment as
110 required by the repayment plan; or
111 (c) Fails to compensate new jobs at rate
112 equal to or in excess of the county average wage
113 or fails to offer health insurance to all such
114 new jobs and pay at least eighty percent of such
115 premiums; and
116 (4) A requirement that the department
117 shall suspend issuance of tax credits authorized
118 under this section if, at any point, the total
119 amount of tax credits issued less the total
120 amount of repayments received equals one hundred
121 and fifty-five million dollars.
122 4. Upon approval of an application by the
123 department, tax credits shall be issued annually
124 for a period not to exceed eight years from the
125 commencement of commercial operations of the
126 megaproject. The eight-year period for the
127 issuance of megaproject tax credits may extend
128 beyond the expiration of the enhanced enterprise
129 zone. The maximum percentage of the annual
130 payroll of the taxpayer for new jobs located at
131 the megaproject which may be approved or issued
132 by the department for tax credits shall not
133 exceed:
134 (1) Eighty percent for the first three
135 years that tax credits will be issued for the
136 megaproject;
137 (2) Sixty percent for the next two
138 subsequent years;
139 (3) Fifty percent for the next two
140 subsequent years; and
141 (4) Thirty percent for the remaining year.
142 In no event shall the department issue more
143 than forty million dollars annually in
144 megaproject tax credits to any taxpayer. In any

SB 1188 252
145 given year, the amount of tax credits issued
146 shall be the lesser of forty million dollars,
147 the applicable annual payroll percentage, or the
148 amount of tax credits remaining unissued under
149 the two hundred forty million dollar limitation
150 on megaproject tax credit issuance provided
151 under subsection 1 of this section.
152 5. Tax credits issued under this section
153 may be claimed against the tax imposed by
154 chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
155 by sections 143.191 to 143.265. For taxpayers
156 with flow-through tax treatment of its members,
157 partners, or shareholders, the credit shall be
158 allowed to members, partners, or shareholders in
159 proportion to their share of ownership on the
160 last day of the taxpayer's tax period. The
161 director of revenue shall issue a refund to a
162 taxpayer to the extent the amount of credits
163 allowed in this section exceeds the amount of
164 the taxpayer's income tax liability in the year
165 redemption is authorized. An owner of tax
166 credits issued under this section shall not be
167 required to have any Missouri income tax
168 liability in order to redeem such tax credits
169 and receive a refund. The director of revenue
170 shall prepare a form to permit the owner of such
171 tax credits to obtain a refund.
172 6. Certificates of tax credits authorized
173 under this section may be transferred, sold, or
174 assigned by filing a notarized endorsement
175 thereof with the department that names the
176 transferee, the amount of tax credit
177 transferred, and the value received for the
178 credit, as well as any other information
179 reasonably requested by the department. Upon
180 such transfer, sale, or assignment, the
181 transferee shall be the owner of such tax
182 credits entitled to claim the tax credits or any
183 refunds with respect thereto issued to the
184 taxpayer. Tax credits may not be carried
185 forward past the year of issuance. Tax credits
186 authorized by this section may not be pledged or
187 used to secure any bonds or other indebtedness
188 issued by the state or any political subdivision

SB 1188 253
189 of the state. Once such tax credits have been
190 issued, nothing shall prohibit the owner of the
191 tax credits from pledging the tax credits to any
192 lender or other third party.
193 7. Any taxpayer issued tax credits under
194 this section shall provide an annual report to
195 the department and the house and senate
196 appropriations committees of the number of new
197 jobs located at the megaproject, the new annual
198 payroll of such new jobs, and such other
199 information as may be required by the department
200 to document the basis for benefits under this
201 section. The department may withhold the
202 approval of the annual issuance of any tax
203 credits until it is satisfied that proper
204 documentation has been provided, and shall
205 reduce the tax credits to reflect any reduction
206 in new payroll. If the department determines
207 the average wage is below the county average
208 wage, or the taxpayer has not maintained
209 employee health insurance as required, the
210 taxpayer shall not receive tax credits for that
211 year.
212 8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
213 the contrary, any taxpayer who is awarded tax
214 credits under this section shall not also
215 receive tax credits under sections 135.100 to
216 135.150, sections 135.200 to 135.286, section
217 135.535, or sections 620.1875 to 620.1890.
218 9. Any action brought in any court
219 contesting the approval of a megaproject and the
220 issuance of the tax credits, or any other action
221 undertaken pursuant to this section related to
222 such megaproject, shall be filed within ninety
223 days following approval of the megaproject by
224 the department.
225 10. Records and documents relating to a
226 proposed megaproject shall be deemed closed
227 records until such time as the application has
228 been approved. Provisions of this subsection to
229 the contrary notwithstanding, records containing
230 business plan information which may endanger the
231 competitiveness of the business shall remain
232 closed.

SB 1188 254
233 11. Notwithstanding any provision of this
234 section to the contrary, no taxpayer who
235 receives megaproject tax credits authorized
236 under this section or any related taxpayer shall
237 employ, prior to January 1, 2022, directly:
238 (1) Any elected public official of this
239 state holding office as of January 1, 2008;
240 (2) Any director, deputy director,
241 division director, or employee directly involved
242 in negotiations between the department of
243 economic development and a taxpayer relative to
244 the megaproject who was employed as of January
245 1, 2008, by the department.]
[135.970. The department may adopt such
rules, statements of policy, procedures, forms,
and guidelines as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of sections 135.950 to 135.970.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2004, shall be invalid
and void.]
[135.973. After January 1, 2007, all
enterprise zones designated before January 1,
2006, shall be eligible to receive the tax
benefits under sections 135.950 to 135.970.]
[135.1125. 1. As used in this section,
the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit
certificate issued under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department
of social services;

SB 1188 255
(3) "Eligible donation", a donation of
cash, stock, bonds or other marketable
securities, or real property made to an eligible
provider;
(4) "Eligible provider", an organization
that provides funding for unmet health, hunger,
and hygiene needs of children in school;
(5) "Taxpayer", a person, firm, partner in
a firm, corporation, or a shareholder in an S
corporation doing business in the state of
Missouri and subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143, an insurance company
paying an annual tax on its gross premium
receipts in this state, any other financial
institution paying taxes to the state of
Missouri or any political subdivision of this
state under chapter 148, or any charitable
organization which is exempt from federal income
tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the
state income tax imposed under chapter 143.
2. For all taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2019, any taxpayer shall be
allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due
under chapter 143 or 148, excluding withholding
tax under sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an
amount equal to fifty percent of the amount of
an eligible donation. The amount of the tax
credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of
the taxpayer's state income tax liability in the
tax year for which the credit is claimed. Any
amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited
by this section from claiming in a tax year
shall not be refundable, but may be carried
forward to any of the taxpayer's four subsequent
taxable years.
3. To claim the credit authorized in this
section, a provider may submit to the department
an application for the tax credit authorized by
this section on behalf of taxpayers. The
department shall verify that the provider has
submitted the following items accurately and
completely:

SB 1188 256
(1) A valid application in the form and
format required by the department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible
donation received, which shall include the name
and taxpayer identification number of the
individual making the eligible donation, the
amount of the eligible donation, and the date
the eligible donation was received by the
provider; and
(3) A payment from the eligible provider
in an amount equal to fifty percent of the
eligible donation.
If the provider applying for the tax credit
meets all criteria required by this subsection,
the department shall issue a certificate in the
appropriate amount.
4. Tax credits issued under this section
may be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit
shall have the same rights in the credit as the
taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is assigned,
transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a
notarized endorsement shall be filed with the
department specifying the name and address of
the new owner of the tax credit or the value of
the credit.
5. The department shall promulgate rules
to implement the provisions of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2018, shall be invalid
and void.

SB 1188 257
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the
Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of this section shall
automatically sunset six years after August 28,
2018, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
100 program authorized under this section shall
101 automatically sunset twelve years after the
102 effective date of the reauthorization of this
103 section; and
104 (3) This section shall terminate on
105 September first of the calendar year immediately
106 following the calendar year in which the program
107 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[173.196. 1. Any business firm, as
defined in section 32.105, may make a donation
to the "Missouri Higher Education Scholarship
Donation Fund", which is hereby created in the
state treasury. A donating business firm shall
receive a tax credit as provided in this section
equal to fifty percent of the amount of the
donation, except that tax credits shall be
awarded each fiscal year in the order donations
are received and the amount of tax credits
authorized shall total no more than two hundred
and fifty thousand dollars for each fiscal year.
2. The department of revenue shall grant
tax credits approved under this section which
shall be applied in the order specified in
subsection 1 of section 32.115 until used. The
tax credits provided under this section shall be
refundable, and any tax credit not used in the
fiscal year in which approved may be carried
over the next five succeeding calendar or fiscal
years until the full credit has been claimed.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
any tax credits granted under this section may
be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
conveyed without consent or approval. Such
taxpayer, hereinafter the assignor for purposes
of this section, may sell, assign, exchange, or
otherwise transfer earned tax credits:

SB 1188 258
(1) For no less than seventy-five percent
of the par value of such credits; and
(2) In an amount not to exceed one hundred
percent of annual earned credits.
3. No tax credit authorized under this
section may be applied against any tax applied
in a tax year beginning prior to January 1, 1995.
4. All revenues credited to the fund shall
be used, subject to appropriations, to provide
scholarships authorized under sections 173.197
to 173.199, and for no other purpose.
5. For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2005, no tax credits shall be
authorized, awarded, or issued to any person or
entity claiming any tax credit under this
section.]
[320.093. 1. Any person, firm or
corporation who purchases a dry fire hydrant, as
defined in section 320.273, or provides an
acceptable means of water storage for such dry
fire hydrant including a pond, tank or other
storage facility with the primary purpose of
fire protection within the state of Missouri,
shall be eligible for a credit on income taxes
otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143, except
sections 143.191 to 143.261, as an incentive to
implement safe and efficient fire protection
controls. The tax credit, not to exceed five
thousand dollars, shall be equal to fifty
percent of the cost in actual expenditure for
any new water storage construction, equipment,
development and installation of the dry hydrant,
including pipes, valves, hydrants and labor for
each such installation of a dry hydrant or new
water storage facility. The amount of the tax
credit claimed for in-kind contributions shall
not exceed twenty-five percent of the total
amount of the contribution for which the tax
credit is claimed.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the
tax due shall not be refunded but may be carried
over to any subsequent taxable year, not to
exceed seven years. The person, firm or

SB 1188 259
corporation may elect to assign to a third party
the approved tax credit. The certificate of
assignment and other appropriate forms shall be
filed with the Missouri department of revenue
and the department of economic development.
3. The person, firm or corporation shall
make application for the credit to the
department of economic development after
receiving approval of the state fire marshal.
The fire marshal shall establish by rule
promulgated pursuant to chapter 536 the
requirements to be met based on the National
Resources Conservation Service's Dry Hydrant
Standard. The state fire marshal or designated
local representative shall review and authorize
the construction and installation of any dry
fire hydrant site. Only approved dry fire
hydrant sites shall be eligible for tax credits
as indicated in this section. Under no
circumstance shall such authority deny any
entity the ability to provide a dry fire hydrant
site when tax credits are not requested.
4. The department of public safety shall
certify to the department of revenue that the
dry hydrant system meets the requirements to
obtain a tax credit as specified in subsection 5
of this section.
5. In order to qualify for a tax credit
under this section, a dry hydrant or new water
storage facility shall meet the following
minimum requirements:
(1) Each body of water or water storage
structure shall be able to provide two hundred
fifty gallons per minute for a continuous two-
hour period during a fifty-year drought or
freeze at a vertical lift of eighteen feet;
(2) Each dry hydrant shall be located
within twenty-five feet of an all-weather
roadway and shall be accessible to fire
protection equipment;
(3) Dry hydrants shall be located a
reasonable distance from other dry or
pressurized hydrants; and

SB 1188 260
(4) The site shall provide a measurable
economic improvement potential for rural
development.
6. New credits shall not be awarded under
this section after August 28, 2010. The total
amount of all tax credits allowed pursuant to
this section is five hundred thousand dollars in
any one fiscal year as approved by the director
of the department of economic development.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid
and void.]
[348.300. As used in sections 348.300 to
348.318, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commercial activity located in
Missouri", any research, development, prototype
fabrication, and subsequent precommercialization
activity, or any activity related thereto,
conducted in Missouri for the purpose of
producing a service or a product or process for
manufacture, assembly or sale or developing a
service based on such a product or process by
any person, corporation, partnership, joint
venture, unincorporated association, trust or
other organization doing business in Missouri.
Subsequent to January 1, 1999, a commercial
activity located in Missouri shall mean only
such activity that is located within a
distressed community, as defined in section
135.530;

SB 1188 261
(2) "Follow-up capital", capital provided
to a commercial activity located in Missouri in
which a qualified fund has previously invested
seed capital or start-up capital and which does
not exceed ten times the amount of such seed and
start-up capital;
(3) "Person", any individual, corporation,
partnership, or other entity, including any
charitable corporation which is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143;
(4) "Qualified contribution", cash
contribution to a qualified fund;
(5) "Qualified economic development
organization", any corporation organized under
the provisions of chapter 355 which has as of
January 1, 1991, obtained a contract with the
department of economic development to operate an
innovation center to promote, assist and
coordinate the research and development of new
services, products or processes in the state of
Missouri; and the Missouri technology
corporation organized pursuant to the provisions
of sections 348.250 to 348.275;
(6) "Qualified fund", any corporation,
partnership, joint venture, unincorporated
association, trust or other organization which
is established under the laws of Missouri after
December 31, 1985, which meets all of the
following requirements established by this
subdivision. The fund shall have as its sole
purpose and business the making of investments,
of which at least ninety percent of the dollars
invested shall be qualified investments. The
fund shall enter into a contract with one or
more qualified economic development
organizations which shall entitle the qualified
economic development organizations to receive
not less than ten percent of all distributions
of equity and dividends or other earnings of the
fund. Such contracts shall require the
qualified fund to transfer to the Missouri

SB 1188 262
technology corporation organized pursuant to the
provisions of sections 348.250 to 348.275 this
interest and make corresponding distributions
thereto in the event the qualified economic
development organization holding such interest
is dissolved or ceases to do business for a
period of one year or more;
(7) "Qualified investment", any investment
of seed capital, start-up capital, or follow-up
capital in any commercial activity located in
Missouri;
(8) "Seed capital", capital provided to a
commercial activity located in Missouri for
research, development and precommercialization
activities to prove a concept for a new product
or process or service, and for activities
related thereto;
(9) "Start-up capital", capital provided
to a commercial activity located in Missouri for
use in preproduction product development or
service development or initial marketing
thereof, and for activities related thereto;
(10) "State tax liability", any state tax
liability incurred by a taxpayer under the
provisions of chapters 143, 147 and 148,
exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections
143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;
(11) "Uninvested capital", the amount of
any distribution, other than of earnings, by a
qualified fund made within five years of the
issuance of a certificate of tax credit as
provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318; or the
portion of all qualified contributions to a
qualified fund which are not invested as
qualified investments within five years of the
issuance of a certificate of tax credit as
100 provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318 to the
101 extent that the amount not so invested exceeds
102 ten percent of all such qualified contributions.]
[348.300. As used in sections 348.300 to
348.318, the following terms mean:

SB 1188 263
(1) "Commercial activity located in
Missouri", any research, development, prototype
fabrication, and subsequent precommercialization
activity, or any activity related thereto,
conducted in Missouri for the purpose of
producing a service or a product or process for
manufacture, assembly or sale or developing a
service based on such a product or process by
any person, corporation, partnership, joint
venture, unincorporated association, trust or
other organization doing business in Missouri.
Subsequent to January 1, 1999, a commercial
activity located in Missouri shall mean only
such activity that is located within a
distressed community, as defined in section
135.530;
(2) "Follow-up capital", capital provided
to a commercial activity located in Missouri in
which a qualified fund has previously invested
seed capital or start-up capital and which does
not exceed ten times the amount of such seed and
start-up capital;
(3) "Person", any individual, corporation,
partnership, or other entity, including any
charitable corporation which is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143;
(4) "Qualified contribution", cash
contribution to a qualified fund;
(5) "Qualified economic development
organization", any corporation organized under
the provisions of chapter 355 which has as of
January 1, 1991, obtained a contract with the
department of economic development to operate an
innovation center to promote, assist and
coordinate the research and development of new
services, products or processes in the state of
Missouri; and the Missouri technology
corporation organized pursuant to the provisions
of sections 348.253 to 348.266;
(6) "Qualified fund", any corporation,
partnership, joint venture, unincorporated

SB 1188 264
association, trust or other organization which
is established under the laws of Missouri after
December 31, 1985, which meets all of the
following requirements established by this
subdivision. The fund shall have as its sole
purpose and business the making of investments,
of which at least ninety percent of the dollars
invested shall be qualified investments. The
fund shall enter into a contract with one or
more qualified economic development
organizations which shall entitle the qualified
economic development organizations to receive
not less than ten percent of all distributions
of equity and dividends or other earnings of the
fund. Such contracts shall require the
qualified fund to transfer to the Missouri
technology corporation organized pursuant to the
provisions of sections 348.253 to 348.266 this
interest and make corresponding distributions
thereto in the event the qualified economic
development organization holding such interest
is dissolved or ceases to do business for a
period of one year or more;
(7) "Qualified investment", any investment
of seed capital, start-up capital, or follow-up
capital in any commercial activity located in
Missouri;
(8) "Seed capital", capital provided to a
commercial activity located in Missouri for
research, development and precommercialization
activities to prove a concept for a new product
or process or service, and for activities
related thereto;
(9) "Start-up capital", capital provided
to a commercial activity located in Missouri for
use in preproduction product development or
service development or initial marketing
thereof, and for activities related thereto;
(10) "State tax liability", any state tax
liability incurred by a taxpayer under the
provisions of chapters 143, 147 and 148,
exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections
143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;

SB 1188 265
(11) "Uninvested capital", the amount of
any distribution, other than of earnings, by a
qualified fund made within five years of the
issuance of a certificate of tax credit as
provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318; or the
portion of all qualified contributions to a
qualified fund which are not invested as
qualified investments within five years of the
issuance of a certificate of tax credit as
100 provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318 to the
101 extent that the amount not so invested exceeds
102 ten percent of all such qualified contributions.]
[348.302. 1. Any person who makes a
qualified contribution to a qualified fund shall
be entitled to receive a tax credit equal to
fifty percent of the amount of the qualified
contribution. The tax credit shall be evidenced
by a tax credit certificate in accordance with
the provisions of sections 348.300 to 348.318
and may be used to satisfy the state tax
liability of the owner of such certificate that
becomes due in the tax year in which the
qualified contribution is made, or in any of the
ten tax years thereafter. No person may receive
a tax credit pursuant to sections 348.300 to
348.318 unless that person presents a tax credit
certificate to the department of revenue for
payment of such state tax liability.
2. The amount of such qualified
contributions which can be made is limited so
that the aggregate of all tax credits authorized
under the provisions of sections 348.300 to
348.318 shall not exceed nine million dollars.
All tax credits authorized under the provisions
of this section may be transferred, sold or
assigned.]
[348.304. The total amount of credit
evidenced by certificates of tax credit issued
to taxpayers at the request of any one qualified
economic development organization shall not
exceed two million dollars; except that, this
two-million-dollar limitation shall not apply to
certificates of tax credit issued after January

SB 1188 266
1, 1996. Prior to January 1, 1996, any
qualified economic development organization may
enter into a contractual agreement with any
other qualified economic development
organization to allocate to the latter any
portion of the two million dollars of tax
credits which it is authorized to issue to
taxpayers under the provisions of this section.
The certificate of tax credit may be issued in
one aggregate certificate or in a reasonable
number of multiple certificates in regard to one
qualified contribution. Any issued certificate
may be surrendered in exchange for new
certificates not to exceed in value the value of
the issued certificate. The number and
denomination of multiple certificates, if
issued, shall be determined by the director of
the department of economic development.]
[348.306. No person shall receive, by
issuance, transfer or assignment, certificates
of tax credit issued under the provisions of
sections 348.300 to 348.318 in an amount in
excess of one million dollars. Subject to the
provisions of this section, certificates of tax
credit issued in accordance with sections
348.300 to 348.318 may be transferred or
assigned by notarized endorsement thereof which
names the transferee.]
[348.308. 1. The director of the
department of economic development shall be
responsible for the administration and issuance
of the certificate of tax credits authorized by
sections 348.300 to 348.318. The director of
the department of economic development shall
issue a certificate of tax credit at the request
of any qualified economic development
organization. Each request shall include a true
copy of the documents creating the qualified
fund and the interest of the qualified economic
development organization in the qualified fund,
the name of the person who is to receive a
certificate of tax credit, the type of state tax
liability, as specified in subdivision (10) of

SB 1188 267
section 348.300, against which the tax credit is
to be used, and the amount of the certificate of
tax credit to be issued to the person making the
qualified contribution. Each request shall be
acknowledged under oath by the person making the
qualified contribution and the president of the
qualified economic development organization.
2. In the event that two or more qualified
economic development organizations have an
interest in a qualified fund, either or both of
such qualified economic development
organizations may request issuance of
certificates of tax credit in accordance with
the provisions of sections 348.300 to 348.318 to
persons contributing to qualified funds.]
[348.310. The Missouri department of
revenue shall accept a certificate of tax credit
in lieu of other payment in such amount as is
equal to the lesser of the amount of the tax or
the remaining unused amount of the credit as
indicated on the certificate of tax credit; and
shall indicate on the certificate of tax credit
the amount of tax thereby paid, the date of such
payment, and the remainder of the unused credit
available to the taxpayer after such payment.
The certificate of tax credit shall be returned
to the director of the department of economic
development. The director of the department of
economic development shall issue a new
certificate to the proper owner for any unused
balance.]
[348.312. No provision of sections 348.300
to 348.318 shall be construed to require a
qualified economic development organization to
accept an interest in any fund, nor shall any
provision of sections 348.300 to 348.318 be
construed to limit or restrict the terms and
conditions on which a qualified economic
development organization may agree to accept an
interest in any fund.]
[348.316. 1. Each qualified fund, on or
before the due date of its federal income tax

SB 1188 268
return, shall make a report for a period
corresponding to the qualified fund's federal
income tax year. The report shall be made on a
form required by the department of economic
development. It shall be verified by the
affidavit of the fund's president, or another
authorized officer, to the department of
economic development. It shall state the amount
of all uninvested capital, whether distributions
of equity or funds not invested in qualified
investments, and it shall contain other such
information as may be required by the director
of the department of economic development.
2. Upon the receipt of such returns, the
director of the department of economic
development shall verify the same and certify
the amount of tax due from the various funds to
the director of revenue within sixty days from
the date of the return. The director of revenue
shall send each qualified fund a notice of tax
due within thirty days of the date of
certification by the department of economic
development. The qualified fund shall pay the
tax as provided in the notice within thirty days
of the date of such notice.]
[348.318. Except as otherwise specifically
provided in sections 348.300 to 348.318,
interest and penalty provisions and procedural
matters under the provisions of sections 348.300
to 348.318 shall be determined pursuant to and
in the manner prescribed in the following
sections of the revised statutes of Missouri,
the state income tax law, governing similar
procedures thereunder: sections 143.271 to
143.301, 143.511, 143.551 to 143.571, 143.611 to
143.751, 143.771, 143.791 to 143.861, 143.881 to
143.971, and 143.986.]
[620.635. Sections 620.635 to 620.653
shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
New Enterprise Creation Act".]
[620.638. As used in sections 620.635 to
620.653, the following terms mean:

SB 1188 269
(1) "Committed contributions", the total
amount of qualified contributions that are
committed to a qualifying fund by contractual
agreement;
(2) "Corporation", the Missouri technology
corporation as established pursuant to section
348.251;
(3) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(4) "Director", the director of the
department of economic development;
(5) "Follow-up capital", capital provided
to a qualified business in which a qualified
fund has previously invested seed capital or
start-up capital. No more than forty percent of
the qualified contributions to a qualified fund
may be used for follow-up capital, and no
qualified contributions which generate tax
credits before the second round of allocations
as authorized by section 620.650 shall be used
for follow-up capital investments;
(6) "Person", any individual, corporation,
partnership, limited liability company or other
entity, including any charitable organization
which is exempt from federal income tax and
whose Missouri unrelated business taxable
income, if any, would be subject to the state
income tax imposed under chapter 143;
(7) "Positive cash flow", total cash
receipts from sales or services, but not from
investments or loans, exceeding total cash
expenditures as calculated on a fiscal year
basis;
(8) "Qualified business", any
independently owned and operated business which
is headquartered and located in Missouri and
which is involved in or intends to be involved
in commerce for the purpose of manufacturing,
processing or assembling products, conducting
research and development, or providing services
in interstate commerce. Such a business shall
maintain its headquarters in Missouri for a
period of at least three years from the date of

SB 1188 270
receipt of a qualified investment or be subject
to penalties pursuant to section 620.017;
(9) "Qualified contribution", cash
contributions to a qualified fund pursuant to
the terms of contractual agreements made between
the qualified fund and a qualified economic
development organization authorized by the
corporation to enter into such contracts;
(10) "Qualified economic development
organization", any corporation organized
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 355 that,
as of January 1, 1991, had obtained a contract
with the department to operate an innovation
center to promote, assist and coordinate the
research and development of new services,
products or processes in this state;
(11) "Qualified fund", a fund established
by any corporation, partnership, joint venture,
unincorporated association, trust or other
organization established pursuant to the laws of
Missouri and approved by the corporation;
(12) "Qualified investment", any
investment of seed capital, start-up capital or
follow-up capital in a qualified business that
does not cause more than ten percent of all the
qualified contributions to a qualified fund to
be invested in a single qualified business;
(13) "Seed capital", capital provided to a
qualified business for research, development and
precommercialization activities to prove a
concept for a new product, process or service,
and for activities related thereto; provided
that, seed capital shall not be provided to any
business which in a past fiscal year has
experienced a positive cash flow;
(14) "Start-up capital", capital provided
to a qualified business for use in preproduction
product development, service development or
initial marketing thereof; provided that, start-
up capital shall not be provided to any business
which has experienced a positive cash flow in a
past fiscal year;
(15) "Uninvested capital", that portion of
any qualified contribution to a qualified fund,

SB 1188 271
other than management fees not to exceed three
percent per year of committed contributions,
qualified investments and other expenses or fees
authorized by the corporation, that is not
invested as a qualified investment within ten
years of its receipt.]
[620.641. The powers and duties of the
Missouri seed capital investment board shall be
transferred to the Missouri technology
corporation effective August 28, 2011, and the
Missouri seed capital investment board shall be
dissolved.]
[620.644. 1. The Missouri seed capital
and commercialization strategy shall be jointly
developed and approved by the boards of
directors of all of the qualified economic
development organizations and submitted as one
plan to the corporation for its approval. The
board shall not approve any qualified fund,
exclusive of the fund approved by the
corporation, unless such fund is described in
the Missouri seed capital and commercialization
strategy. The strategy shall include a proposal
for the establishment and operation of between
one and four qualified funds in Missouri,
including the fund approved by the corporation
pursuant to the provisions of section 620.653.
The initial strategy shall be submitted to the
board no later than July 1, 2000, and shall be
approved or rejected by the board within three
months of receipt. No tax credits authorized
pursuant to the provisions of sections 620.635
to 620.653 shall be awarded until such strategy
has been approved by the board, other than tax
credits authorized for qualified contributions
to the fund approved by the corporation.
2. The department shall authorize the use
of up to twenty million dollars in tax credits
by the approved qualified funds, in aggregate
pursuant to the provisions of section 620.650,
with not more than five million dollars of tax
credits being issued in any one year.

SB 1188 272
3. The corporation shall approve the
professional managers employed by the qualified
funds according to criteria similar to that used
by the U.S. Small Business Administration's
Small Business Investment Corporation Program.
4. The department may promulgate any rules
and regulations necessary to administer the
provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.653. No
rule or regulation or portion of a rule or
regulation promulgated pursuant to the authority
of this section shall become effective unless it
has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 536.
5. The corporation shall report the
following to the department:
(1) As soon as practicable after the
receipt of a qualified contribution the name of
each person from which the qualified
contribution was received, the amount of each
contributor's qualified contribution and the tax
credits computed pursuant to this section;
(2) On a quarterly basis, the amount of
qualified investments made to any qualified
business;
(3) On a quarterly basis, verification
that the investment of seed capital, start-up
capital, or follow-up capital in a qualified
business does not direct more than ten percent
of all the qualified contributions to a
qualified fund to be invested in a single
qualifying business.
6. Each qualified fund shall provide
annual audited financial statements, including
the opinion of an independent certified public
accountant, to the department within ninety days
of the close of the state fiscal year. The
audit shall address the methods of operation and
conduct of the business of the qualified
economic development organization to determine
compliance with the statutes and program and
program rules and that the qualified
contributions received by the qualified fund
have been invested as required by this section.]

SB 1188 273
[620.647. 1. The corporation may
authorize each qualified economic development
organization to enter into contractual
agreements with any qualified fund allowing such
qualified fund to offer tax credits authorized
pursuant to the provisions of sections 620.635
to 620.653 to those persons making qualified
contributions to the qualified fund. The
corporation shall establish policies and
procedures requiring each authorized qualified
economic development organization to secure from
each qualified fund and its investors the
maximum fund equity interest possible, as
dictated by market conditions, in exchange for
the use of the tax credits. All tax credits
authorized pursuant to sections 620.635 to
620.653 shall be administered by the department.
2. Each qualified fund shall enter into a
contract with one or more qualified economic
development organizations which shall entitle
all qualified economic development organizations
in existence at that time to receive and share
equally all distributions of equity and
dividends or other earnings of the fund that are
generated as a result of any equity interest
secured as a result of actions taken to comply
with subsection 1 of this section. Such
contracts shall require the qualified funds to
transfer to the corporation all distributions of
dividends or other earnings of the fund that are
owed to any qualified economic development
organization that has dissolved or has ceased
doing business for a period of one year or more.
3. All distributions of dividends,
earnings, equity or the like owed pursuant to
the provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.653 to
a qualified economic development organization by
any qualified fund shall be paid to the
qualified economic development organization.
The qualified economic development organization
shall use such payments solely for reinvestment
in qualified funds in order to provide ongoing
seed capital, start-up capital and follow-up
capital for Missouri businesses. No qualified

SB 1188 274
economic development organization may transfer
any dividends, earnings, equity or the like owed
it pursuant to sections 620.635 to 620.653 to
any other person or entity without the approval
of the corporation.]
[620.650. 1. The sole purpose of each
qualified fund is to make investments. One
hundred percent of investments made from
qualified contributions shall be qualified
investments.
2. Any person who makes a qualified
contribution to a qualified fund shall receive a
tax credit against the tax otherwise due
pursuant to chapter 143, chapter 147, or chapter
148, other than taxes withheld pursuant to
sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal
to one hundred percent of such person's
qualified contribution.
3. Such person shall submit to the
department an application for the tax credit on
a form provided by the department. The
department shall award tax credits in the order
the applications are received and based upon the
strategy approved by the corporation. Tax
credits issued pursuant to this section may be
claimed for the tax year in which the qualified
contribution is made or in any of the following
ten years, and may be assigned, transferred or
sold.
4. There is hereby imposed on each
qualified fund a tax equal to fifteen percent of
the qualified fund's uninvested capital at the
close of such qualified fund's tax year. For
purposes of tax computation, any distribution
made by a qualified fund during a tax year is
deemed made at the end of such tax year. Each
tax year, every qualified fund shall remit the
tax imposed by this section to the director of
the department of revenue for deposit in the
state treasury to the credit of the general
revenue fund.]
[620.653. The provisions of sections
620.635 to 620.650 to the contrary

SB 1188 275
notwithstanding, one qualified fund shall be
approved by the corporation as soon as
practicable after July 8, 1999. Such fund need
not be initially incorporated into the seed
capital and commercialization strategy until
after the appointment of the board. After the
appointment of the board, all powers exercised
by the corporation in relation to that fund
shall be transferred to the board. After the
dissolution of the board, all powers exercised
by the board shall be transferred to the
corporation. The corporation shall approve the
professional fund manager employed by the
qualified fund established by this section.]
[620.1875. Sections 620.1875 to 620.1890
shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Quality Jobs Act".]
[620.1878. For the purposes of sections
620.1875 to 620.1890, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Approval", a document submitted by
the department to the qualified company that
states the benefits that may be provided by this
program;
(2) "Average wage", the new payroll
divided by the number of new jobs;
(3) "Commencement of operations", the
starting date for the qualified company's first
new employee, which must be no later than twelve
months from the date of the approval;
(4) "County average wage", the average
wages in each county as determined by the
department for the most recently completed full
calendar year. However, if the computed county
average wage is above the statewide average
wage, the statewide average wage shall be deemed
the county average wage for such county for the
purpose of determining eligibility. The
department shall publish the county average wage
for each county at least annually.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subdivision to the contrary, for any qualified
company that in conjunction with their project

SB 1188 276
is relocating employees from a Missouri county
with a higher county average wage, the company
shall obtain the endorsement of the governing
body of the community from which jobs are being
relocated or the county average wage for their
project shall be the county average wage for the
county from which the employees are being
relocated;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department
of economic development;
(6) "Director", the director of the
department of economic development;
(7) "Employee", a person employed by a
qualified company;
(8) "Full-time employee", an employee of
the qualified company that is scheduled to work
an average of at least thirty-five hours per
week for a twelve-month period, and one for
which the qualified company offers health
insurance and pays at least fifty percent of
such insurance premiums;
(9) "High-impact project", a qualified
company that, within two years from commencement
of operations, creates one hundred or more new
jobs;
(10) "Local incentives", the present value
of the dollar amount of direct benefit received
by a qualified company for a project facility
from one or more local political subdivisions,
but shall not include loans or other funds
provided to the qualified company that must be
repaid by the qualified company to the political
subdivision;
(11) "NAICS", the 1997 edition of the
North American Industry Classification System as
prepared by the Executive Office of the
President, Office of Management and Budget. Any
NAICS sector, subsector, industry group or
industry identified in this section shall
include its corresponding classification in
subsequent federal industry classification
systems;
(12) "New direct local revenue", the
present value of the dollar amount of direct net

SB 1188 277
new tax revenues of the local political
subdivisions likely to be produced by the
project over a ten-year period as calculated by
the department, excluding local earnings tax,
and net new utility revenues, provided the local
incentives include a discount or other direct
incentives from utilities owned or operated by
the political subdivision;
(13) "New investment", the purchase or
leasing of new tangible assets to be placed in
operation at the project facility, which will be
directly related to the new jobs;
(14) "New job", the number of full-time
employees located at the project facility that
exceeds the project facility base employment
less any decrease in the number of full-time
employees at related facilities below the
related facility base employment. No job that
was created prior to the date of the notice of
intent shall be deemed a new job. An employee
that spends less than fifty percent of the
employee's work time at the facility is still
considered to be located at a facility if the
employee receives his or her directions and
control from that facility, is on the facility's
payroll, one hundred percent of the employee's
income from such employment is Missouri income,
and the employee is paid at or above the state
average wage;
100 (15) "New payroll", the amount of taxable
101 wages of full-time employees, excluding owners,
102 located at the project facility that exceeds the
103 project facility base payroll. If full-time
104 employment at related facilities is below the
105 related facility base employment, any decrease
106 in payroll for full-time employees at the
107 related facilities below that related facility
108 base payroll shall also be subtracted to
109 determine new payroll;
110 (16) "Notice of intent", a form developed
111 by the department, completed by the qualified
112 company and submitted to the department which
113 states the qualified company's intent to hire
114 new jobs and request benefits under this program;

SB 1188 278
115 (17) "Percent of local incentives", the
116 amount of local incentives divided by the amount
117 of new direct local revenue;
118 (18) "Program", the Missouri quality jobs
119 program provided in sections 620.1875 to
120 620.1890;
121 (19) "Project facility", the building used
122 by a qualified company at which the new jobs and
123 new investment will be located. A project
124 facility may include separate buildings that are
125 located within fifteen miles of each other or
126 within the same county such that their purpose
127 and operations are interrelated;
128 (20) "Project facility base employment",
129 the greater of the number of full-time employees
130 located at the project facility on the date of
131 the notice of intent or for the twelve-month
132 period prior to the date of the notice of
133 intent, the average number of full-time
134 employees located at the project facility. In
135 the event the project facility has not been in
136 operation for a full twelve-month period, the
137 average number of full-time employees for the
138 number of months the project facility has been
139 in operation prior to the date of the notice of
140 intent;
141 (21) "Project facility base payroll", the
142 total amount of taxable wages paid by the
143 qualified company to full-time employees of the
144 qualified company located at the project
145 facility in the twelve months prior to the
146 notice of intent, not including the payroll of
147 the owners of the qualified company unless the
148 qualified company is participating in an
149 employee stock ownership plan. For purposes of
150 calculating the benefits under this program, the
151 amount of base payroll shall increase each year
152 based on an appropriate measure, as determined
153 by the department;
154 (22) "Project period", the time period
155 that the benefits are provided to a qualified
156 company;
157 (23) "Qualified company", a firm,
158 partnership, joint venture, association, private

SB 1188 279
159 or public corporation whether organized for
160 profit or not, or headquarters of such entity
161 registered to do business in Missouri that is
162 the owner or operator of a project facility,
163 offers health insurance to all full-time
164 employees of all facilities located in this
165 state, and pays at least fifty percent of such
166 insurance premiums. For the purposes of
167 sections 620.1875 to 620.1890, the term
168 "qualified company" shall not include:
169 (a) Gambling establishments (NAICS
170 industry group 7132);
171 (b) Retail trade establishments (NAICS
172 sectors 44 and 45);
173 (c) Food and drinking places (NAICS
174 subsector 722);
175 (d) Public utilities (NAICS 221 including
176 water and sewer services);
177 (e) Any company that is delinquent in the
178 payment of any nonprotested taxes or any other
179 amounts due the state or federal government or
180 any other political subdivision of this state;
181 (f) Any company that has filed for or has
182 publicly announced its intention to file for
183 bankruptcy protection. However, a company that
184 has filed for or has publicly announced its
185 intention to file for bankruptcy between January
186 1, 2009, and December 31, 2009, may be a
187 qualified company provided that such company:
188 a. Certifies to the department that it
189 plans to reorganize and not to liquidate; and
190 b. After its bankruptcy petition has been
191 filed, it produces proof, in a form and at times
192 satisfactory to the department, that it is not
193 delinquent in filing any tax returns or making
194 any payment due to the state of Missouri,
195 including but not limited to all tax payments
196 due after the filing of the bankruptcy petition
197 and under the terms of the plan of
198 reorganization.
199 Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under
200 this subsection and who files for bankruptcy
201 under Chapter 7 of the United States Bankruptcy
202 Code, Title 11 U.S.C., shall immediately notify

SB 1188 280
203 the department and shall forfeit such benefits
204 and shall repay the state an amount equal to any
205 state tax credits already redeemed and any
206 withholding taxes already retained;
207 (g) Educational services (NAICS sector 61);
208 (h) Religious organizations (NAICS
209 industry group 8131);
210 (i) Public administration (NAICS sector
211 92);
212 (j) Ethanol distillation or production; or
213 (k) Biodiesel production.
214 Notwithstanding any provision of this
215 section to the contrary, the headquarters or
216 administrative offices of an otherwise excluded
217 business may qualify for benefits if the offices
218 serve a multistate territory. In the event a
219 national, state, or regional headquarters
220 operation is not the predominant activity of a
221 project facility, the new jobs and investment of
222 such headquarters operation is considered
223 eligible for benefits under this section if the
224 other requirements are satisfied;
225 (24) "Qualified renewable energy sources"
226 shall not be construed to include ethanol
227 distillation or production or biodiesel
228 production; however, it shall include:
229 (a) Open-looped biomass;
230 (b) Close-looped biomass;
231 (c) Solar;
232 (d) Wind;
233 (e) Geothermal; and
234 (f) Hydropower;
235 (25) "Related company" means:
236 (a) A corporation, partnership, trust, or
237 association controlled by the qualified company;
238 (b) An individual, corporation,
239 partnership, trust, or association in control of
240 the qualified company; or
241 (c) Corporations, partnerships, trusts or
242 associations controlled by an individual,
243 corporation, partnership, trust or association
244 in control of the qualified company. As used in
245 this subdivision, "control of a corporation"
246 shall mean ownership, directly or indirectly, of

SB 1188 281
247 stock possessing at least fifty percent of the
248 total combined voting power of all classes of
249 stock entitled to vote, "control of a
250 partnership or association" shall mean ownership
251 of at least fifty percent of the capital or
252 profits interest in such partnership or
253 association, "control of a trust" shall mean
254 ownership, directly or indirectly, of at least
255 fifty percent of the beneficial interest in the
256 principal or income of such trust, and ownership
257 shall be determined as provided in Section 318
258 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
259 (26) "Related facility", a facility
260 operated by the qualified company or a related
261 company located in this state that is directly
262 related to the operations of the project
263 facility;
264 (27) "Related facility base employment",
265 the greater of the number of full-time employees
266 located at all related facilities on the date of
267 the notice of intent or for the twelve-month
268 period prior to the date of the notice of
269 intent, the average number of full-time
270 employees located at all related facilities of
271 the qualified company or a related company
272 located in this state;
273 (28) "Related facility base payroll", the
274 total amount of taxable wages paid by the
275 qualified company to full-time employees of the
276 qualified company located at a related facility
277 in the twelve months prior to the filing of the
278 notice of intent, not including the payroll of
279 the owners of the qualified company unless the
280 qualified company is participating in an
281 employee stock ownership plan. For purposes of
282 calculating the benefits under this program, the
283 amount of related facility base payroll shall
284 increase each year based on an appropriate
285 measure, as determined by the department;
286 (29) "Rural area", a county in Missouri
287 with a population less than seventy-five
288 thousand or that does not contain an individual
289 city with a population greater than fifty

SB 1188 282
290 thousand according to the most recent federal
291 decennial census;
292 (30) "Small and expanding business
293 project", a qualified company that within two
294 years of the date of the approval creates a
295 minimum of twenty new jobs if the project
296 facility is located in a rural area or a minimum
297 of forty new jobs if the project facility is not
298 located in a rural area and creates fewer than
299 one hundred new jobs regardless of the location
300 of the project facility;
301 (31) "Tax credits", tax credits issued by
302 the department to offset the state income taxes
303 imposed by chapters 143 and 148, or which may be
304 sold or refunded as provided for in this program;
305 (32) "Technology business project", a
306 qualified company that within two years of the
307 date of the approval creates a minimum of ten
308 new jobs involved in the operations of a company:
309 (a) Which is a technology company, as
310 determined by a regulation promulgated by the
311 department under the provisions of section
312 620.1884 or classified by NAICS codes;
313 (b) Which owns or leases a facility which
314 produces electricity derived from qualified
315 renewable energy sources, or produces fuel for
316 the generation of electricity from qualified
317 renewable energy sources, but does not include
318 any company that has received the alcohol
319 mixture credit, alcohol credit, or small ethanol
320 producer credit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 40
321 of the tax code in the previous tax year;
322 (c) Which researches, develops, or
323 manufactures power system technology for:
324 aerospace; space; defense; hybrid vehicles; or
325 implantable or wearable medical devices; or
326 (d) Which is a clinical molecular
327 diagnostic laboratory focused on detecting and
328 monitoring infections in immunocompromised
329 patient populations;
330 (33) "Withholding tax", the state tax
331 imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265. For
332 purposes of this program, the withholding tax

SB 1188 283
333 shall be computed using a schedule as determined
334 by the department based on average wages.]
[620.1881. 1. The department of economic
development shall respond within thirty days to
a company who provides a notice of intent with
either an approval or a rejection of the notice
of intent. The department shall give preference
to qualified companies and projects targeted at
an area of the state which has recently been
classified as a disaster area by the federal
government. Failure to respond on behalf of the
department of economic development shall result
in the notice of intent being deemed an approval
for the purposes of this section. A qualified
company who is provided an approval for a
project shall be allowed a benefit as provided
in this program in the amount and duration
provided in this section. A qualified company
may receive additional periods for subsequent
new jobs at the same facility after the full
initial period if the minimum thresholds are met
as set forth in sections 620.1875 to 620.1890.
There is no limit on the number of periods a
qualified company may participate in the
program, as long as the minimum thresholds are
achieved and the qualified company provides the
department with the required reporting and is in
proper compliance for this program or other
state programs. A qualified company may elect
to file a notice of intent to start a new
project period concurrent with an existing
project period if the minimum thresholds are
achieved and the qualified company provides the
department with the required reporting and is in
proper compliance for this program and other
state programs; however, the qualified company
may not receive any further benefit under the
original approval for jobs created after the
date of the new notice of intent, and any jobs
created before the new notice of intent may not
be included as new jobs for the purpose of
benefit calculation in relation to the new
approval. When a qualified company has filed

SB 1188 284
and received approval of a notice of intent and
subsequently files another notice of intent, the
department shall apply the definition of project
facility under subdivision (19) of section
620.1878 to the new notice of intent as well as
all previously approved notices of intent and
shall determine the application of the
definitions of new job, new payroll, project
facility base employment, and project facility
base payroll accordingly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, any qualified company that is
awarded benefits under this program may not
simultaneously receive tax credits or exemptions
under sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections
135.200 to 135.286, section 135.535, or sections
135.900 to 135.906 at the same project
facility. The benefits available to the company
under any other state programs for which the
company is eligible and which utilize
withholding tax from the new jobs of the company
must first be credited to the other state
program before the withholding retention level
applicable under the Missouri quality jobs act
will begin to accrue. These other state
programs include, but are not limited to, the
Missouri works jobs training program under
sections 620.800 to 620.809, the real property
tax increment allocation redevelopment act,
sections 99.800 to 99.865, or the Missouri
downtown and rural economic stimulus act under
sections 99.915 to 99.980. If any qualified
company also participates in the Missouri works
jobs training program in sections 620.800 to
620.809, the company shall retain no withholding
tax, but the department shall issue a refundable
tax credit for the full amount of benefit
allowed under this subdivision. The calendar
year annual maximum amount of tax credits which
may be issued to a qualifying company that also
participates in the new job training program
shall be increased by an amount equivalent to
the withholding tax retained by that company
under the new jobs training program. However,

SB 1188 285
if the combined benefits of the quality jobs
program and the new jobs training program exceed
the projected state benefit of the project, as
determined by the department of economic
development through a cost-benefit analysis, the
increase in the maximum tax credits shall be
limited to the amount that would not cause the
combined benefits to exceed the projected state
benefit. Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits
under this program who knowingly hires
individuals who are not allowed to work legally
in the United States shall immediately forfeit
such benefits and shall repay the state an
amount equal to any state tax credits already
100 redeemed and any withholding taxes already
101 retained.
102 3. The types of projects and the amount of
103 benefits to be provided are:
104 (1) Small and expanding business
105 projects: in exchange for the consideration
106 provided by the new tax revenues and other
107 economic stimuli that will be generated by the
108 new jobs created by the program, a qualified
109 company may retain an amount equal to the
110 withholding tax as calculated under subdivision
111 (33) of section 620.1878 from the new jobs that
112 would otherwise be withheld and remitted by the
113 qualified company under the provisions of
114 sections 143.191 to 143.265 for a period of
115 three years from the date the required number of
116 new jobs were created if the average wage of the
117 new payroll equals or exceeds the county average
118 wage or for a period of five years from the date
119 the required number of new jobs were created if
120 the average wage of the new payroll equals or
121 exceeds one hundred twenty percent of the county
122 average wage;
123 (2) Technology business projects: in
124 exchange for the consideration provided by the
125 new tax revenues and other economic stimuli that
126 will be generated by the new jobs created by the
127 program, a qualified company may retain an
128 amount equal to a maximum of five percent of new
129 payroll for a period of five years from the date

SB 1188 286
130 the required number of jobs were created from
131 the withholding tax of the new jobs that would
132 otherwise be withheld and remitted by the
133 qualified company under the provisions of
134 sections 143.191 to 143.265 if the average wage
135 of the new payroll equals or exceeds the county
136 average wage. An additional one-half percent of
137 new payroll may be added to the five percent
138 maximum if the average wage of the new payroll
139 in any year exceeds one hundred twenty percent
140 of the county average wage in the county in
141 which the project facility is located, plus an
142 additional one-half percent of new payroll may
143 be added if the average wage of the new payroll
144 in any year exceeds one hundred forty percent of
145 the average wage in the county in which the
146 project facility is located. The department
147 shall issue a refundable tax credit for any
148 difference between the amount of benefit allowed
149 under this subdivision and the amount of
150 withholding tax retained by the company, in the
151 event the withholding tax is not sufficient to
152 provide the entire amount of benefit due to the
153 qualified company under this subdivision;
154 (3) High impact projects: in exchange for
155 the consideration provided by the new tax
156 revenues and other economic stimuli that will be
157 generated by the new jobs created by the
158 program, a qualified company may retain an
159 amount from the withholding tax of the new jobs
160 that would otherwise be withheld and remitted by
161 the qualified company under the provisions of
162 sections 143.191 to 143.265, equal to three
163 percent of new payroll for a period of five
164 years from the date the required number of jobs
165 were created if the average wage of the new
166 payroll equals or exceeds the county average
167 wage of the county in which the project facility
168 is located. For high-impact projects in a
169 facility located within two adjacent counties,
170 the new payroll shall equal or exceed the higher
171 county average wage of the adjacent counties.
172 The percentage of payroll allowed under this
173 subdivision shall be three and one-half percent

SB 1188 287
174 of new payroll if the average wage of the new
175 payroll in any year exceeds one hundred twenty
176 percent of the county average wage in the county
177 in which the project facility is located. The
178 percentage of payroll allowed under this
179 subdivision shall be four percent of new payroll
180 if the average wage of the new payroll in any
181 year exceeds one hundred forty percent of the
182 county average wage in the county in which the
183 project facility is located. An additional one
184 percent of new payroll may be added to these
185 percentages if local incentives equal between
186 ten percent and twenty-four percent of the new
187 direct local revenue; an additional two percent
188 of new payroll is added to these percentages if
189 the local incentives equal between twenty-five
190 percent and forty-nine percent of the new direct
191 local revenue; or an additional three percent of
192 payroll is added to these percentages if the
193 local incentives equal fifty percent or more of
194 the new direct local revenue. The department
195 shall issue a refundable tax credit for any
196 difference between the amount of benefit allowed
197 under this subdivision and the amount of
198 withholding tax retained by the company, in the
199 event the withholding tax is not sufficient to
200 provide the entire amount of benefit due to the
201 qualified company under this subdivision;
202 (4) Job retention projects: a qualified
203 company may receive a tax credit for the
204 retention of jobs in this state, provided the
205 qualified company and the project meets all of
206 the following conditions:
207 (a) For each of the twenty-four months
208 preceding the year in which application for the
209 program is made the qualified company must have
210 maintained at least one thousand full-time
211 employees at the employer's site in the state at
212 which the jobs are based, and the average wage
213 of such employees must meet or exceed the county
214 average wage;
215 (b) The qualified company retained at the
216 project facility the level of full-time
217 employees that existed in the taxable year

SB 1188 288
218 immediately preceding the year in which
219 application for the program is made;
220 (c) The qualified company is considered to
221 have a significant statewide effect on the
222 economy, and has been determined to represent a
223 substantial risk of relocation from the state by
224 the quality jobs advisory task force established
225 in section 620.1887; provided, however, until
226 such time as the initial at-large members of the
227 quality jobs advisory task force are appointed,
228 this determination shall be made by the director
229 of the department of economic development;
230 (d) The qualified company in the project
231 facility will cause to be invested a minimum of
232 seventy million dollars in new investment prior
233 to the end of two years or will cause to be
234 invested a minimum of thirty million dollars in
235 new investment prior to the end of two years and
236 maintain an annual payroll of at least seventy
237 million dollars during each of the years for
238 which a credit is claimed; and
239 (e) The local taxing entities shall
240 provide local incentives of at least fifty
241 percent of the new direct local revenues created
242 by the project over a ten-year period.
243 The quality jobs advisory task force may
244 recommend to the department of economic
245 development that appropriate penalties be
246 applied to the company for violating the
247 agreement. The amount of the job retention
248 credit granted may be equal to up to fifty
249 percent of the amount of withholding tax
250 generated by the full-time jobs at the project
251 facility for a period of five years. The
252 calendar year annual maximum amount of tax
253 credit that may be issued to any qualified
254 company for a job retention project or
255 combination of job retention projects shall be
256 seven hundred fifty thousand dollars per year,
257 but the maximum amount may be increased up to
258 one million dollars if such action is proposed
259 by the department and approved by the quality
260 jobs advisory task force established in section
261 620.1887; provided, however, until such time as

SB 1188 289
262 the initial at-large members of the quality jobs
263 advisory task force are appointed, this
264 determination shall be made by the director of
265 the department of economic development. In
266 considering such a request, the task force shall
267 rely on economic modeling and other information
268 supplied by the department when requesting the
269 increased limit on behalf of the job retention
270 project. In no event shall the total amount of
271 all tax credits issued for the entire job
272 retention program under this subdivision exceed
273 three million dollars annually. Notwithstanding
274 the above, no tax credits shall be issued for
275 job retention projects approved by the
276 department after August 30, 2013;
277 (5) Small business job retention and flood
278 survivor relief: a qualified company may
279 receive a tax credit under sections 620.1875 to
280 620.1890 for the retention of jobs and flood
281 survivor relief in this state for each job
282 retained over a three-year period, provided that:
283 (a) The qualified company did not receive
284 any state or federal benefits, incentives, or
285 tax relief or abatement in locating its facility
286 in a flood plain;
287 (b) The qualified company and related
288 companies have fewer than one hundred employees
289 at the time application for the program is made;
290 (c) The average wage of the qualified
291 company's and related companies' employees must
292 meet or exceed the county average wage;
293 (d) All of the qualified company's and
294 related companies' facilities are located in
295 this state;
296 (e) The facilities at the primary business
297 site in this state have been directly damaged by
298 floodwater rising above the level of a five
299 hundred year flood at least two years, but fewer
300 than eight years, prior to the time application
301 is made;
302 (f) The qualified company made significant
303 efforts to protect the facilities prior to any
304 impending danger from rising floodwaters;

SB 1188 290
305 (g) For each year it receives tax credits
306 under sections 620.1875 to 620.1890, the
307 qualified company and related companies
308 retained, at the company's facilities in this
309 state, at least the level of full-time, year-
310 round employees that existed in the taxable year
311 immediately preceding the year in which
312 application for the program is made; and
313 (h) In the years it receives tax credits
314 under sections 620.1875 to 620.1890, the company
315 cumulatively invests at least two million
316 dollars in capital improvements in facilities
317 and equipment located at such facilities that
318 are not located within a five hundred year flood
319 plain as designated by the Federal Emergency
320 Management Agency, and amended from time to
321 time. The amount of the small business job
322 retention and flood survivor relief credit
323 granted may be equal to up to one hundred
324 percent of the amount of withholding tax
325 generated by the full-time jobs at the project
326 facility for a period of three years. The
327 calendar year annual maximum amount of tax
328 credit that may be issued to any qualified
329 company for a small business job retention and
330 survivor relief project shall be two hundred
331 fifty thousand dollars per year, but the maximum
332 amount may be increased up to five hundred
333 thousand dollars if such action is proposed by
334 the department and approved by the quality jobs
335 advisory task force established in section
336 620.1887. In considering such a request, the
337 task force shall rely on economic modeling and
338 other information supplied by the department
339 when requesting an increase in the limit on
340 behalf of the small business job retention and
341 flood survivor relief project. In no event
342 shall the total amount of all tax credits issued
343 for the entire small business job retention and
344 flood survivor relief program under this
345 subdivision exceed five hundred thousand dollars
346 annually. Notwithstanding the provisions of
347 this subdivision to the contrary, no tax credits
348 shall be issued for small business job retention

SB 1188 291
349 and flood survivor relief projects approved by
350 the department after August 30, 2010.
351 4. The qualified company shall provide an
352 annual report of the number of jobs and such
353 other information as may be required by the
354 department to document the basis for the
355 benefits of this program. The department may
356 withhold the approval of any benefits until it
357 is satisfied that proper documentation has been
358 provided, and shall reduce the benefits to
359 reflect any reduction in full-time employees or
360 new payroll. Upon approval by the department,
361 the qualified company may begin the retention of
362 the withholding taxes when it reaches the
363 minimum number of new jobs and the average wage
364 exceeds the county average wage. Tax credits,
365 if any, may be issued upon satisfaction by the
366 department that the qualified company has
367 exceeded the county average wage and the minimum
368 number of new jobs. In such annual report, if
369 the average wage is below the county average
370 wage, the qualified company has not maintained
371 the employee insurance as required, or if the
372 number of new jobs is below the minimum, the
373 qualified company shall not receive tax credits
374 or retain the withholding tax for the balance of
375 the benefit period. In the case of a qualified
376 company that initially filed a notice of intent
377 and received an approval from the department for
378 high-impact benefits and the minimum number of
379 new jobs in an annual report is below the
380 minimum for high-impact projects, the company
381 shall not receive tax credits for the balance of
382 the benefit period but may continue to retain
383 the withholding taxes if it otherwise meets the
384 requirements of a small and expanding business
385 under this program.
386 5. The maximum calendar year annual tax
387 credits issued for the entire program shall not
388 exceed eighty million dollars. Notwithstanding
389 any provision of law to the contrary, the
390 maximum annual tax credits authorized under
391 section 135.535 are hereby reduced from ten
392 million dollars to eight million dollars, with

SB 1188 292
393 the balance of two million dollars transferred
394 to this program. There shall be no limit on the
395 amount of withholding taxes that may be retained
396 by approved companies under this program.
397 6. The department shall allocate the
398 annual tax credits based on the date of the
399 approval, reserving such tax credits based on
400 the department's best estimate of new jobs and
401 new payroll of the project, and the other
402 factors in the determination of benefits of this
403 program. However, the annual issuance of tax
404 credits is subject to the annual verification of
405 the actual new payroll. The allocation of tax
406 credits for the period assigned to a project
407 shall expire if, within two years from the date
408 of commencement of operations, or approval if
409 applicable, the minimum thresholds have not been
410 achieved. The qualified company may retain
411 authorized amounts from the withholding tax
412 under this section once the minimum new jobs
413 thresholds are met for the duration of the
414 project period. No benefits shall be provided
415 under this program until the qualified company
416 meets the minimum new jobs thresholds. In the
417 event the qualified company does not meet the
418 minimum new job threshold, the qualified company
419 may submit a new notice of intent or the
420 department may provide a new approval for a new
421 project of the qualified company at the project
422 facility or other facilities.
423 7. For a qualified company with flow-
424 through tax treatment to its members, partners,
425 or shareholders, the tax credit shall be allowed
426 to members, partners, or shareholders in
427 proportion to their share of ownership on the
428 last day of the qualified company's tax period.
429 8. Tax credits may be claimed against
430 taxes otherwise imposed by chapters 143 and 148,
431 and may not be carried forward but shall be
432 claimed within one year of the close of the
433 taxable year for which they were issued, except
434 as provided under subdivision (4) of subsection
435 3 of this section.

SB 1188 293
436 9. Tax credits authorized by this section
437 may be transferred, sold, or assigned by filing
438 a notarized endorsement thereof with the
439 department that names the transferee, the amount
440 of tax credit transferred, and the value
441 received for the credit, as well as any other
442 information reasonably requested by the
443 department.
444 10. Prior to the issuance of tax credits,
445 the department shall verify through the
446 department of revenue, or any other state
447 department, that the tax credit applicant does
448 not owe any delinquent income, sales, or use tax
449 or interest or penalties on such taxes, or any
450 delinquent fees or assessments levied by any
451 state department and through the department of
452 commerce and insurance that the applicant does
453 not owe any delinquent insurance taxes. Such
454 delinquency shall not affect the authorization
455 of the application for such tax credits, except
456 that at issuance credits shall be first applied
457 to the delinquency and any amount issued shall
458 be reduced by the applicant's tax delinquency.
459 If the department of revenue or the department
460 of commerce and insurance, or any other state
461 department, concludes that a taxpayer is
462 delinquent after June fifteenth but before July
463 first of any year and the application of tax
464 credits to such delinquency causes a tax
465 deficiency on behalf of the taxpayer to arise,
466 then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty days
467 to satisfy the deficiency in which interest,
468 penalties, and additions to tax shall be
469 tolled. After applying all available credits
470 toward a tax delinquency, the administering
471 agency shall notify the appropriate department
472 and that department shall update the amount of
473 outstanding delinquent tax owed by the
474 applicant. If any credits remain after
475 satisfying all insurance, income, sales, and use
476 tax delinquencies, the remaining credits shall
477 be issued to the applicant, subject to the
478 restrictions of other provisions of law.

SB 1188 294
479 11. Except as provided under subdivision
480 (4) of subsection 3 of this section, the
481 director of revenue shall issue a refund to the
482 qualified company to the extent that the amount
483 of credits allowed in this section exceeds the
484 amount of the qualified company's income tax.
485 12. An employee of a qualified company
486 will receive full credit for the amount of tax
487 withheld as provided in section 143.211.
488 13. If any provision of sections 620.1875
489 to 620.1890 or application thereof to any person
490 or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
491 shall not affect other provisions or application
492 of these sections which can be given effect
493 without the invalid provisions or application,
494 and to this end, the provisions of sections
495 620.1875 to 620.1890 are hereby declared
496 severable.]
[620.1884. The department may adopt such
rules, statements of policy, procedures, forms,
and guidelines as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of sections 620.1875 to
620.1890. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2005, shall be invalid
and void.]
[620.1887. There is hereby created a
volunteer task force, to be known as the
"Quality Jobs Advisory Task Force", which shall
consist of the chairperson of the economic
development committee of the Missouri senate or
his or her designee, a member of the economic

SB 1188 295
development committee of the Missouri senate
appointed by the minority leader of the Missouri
senate, the chairperson of the economic
development committee of the Missouri house of
representatives or his or her designee, a member
of the economic development committee of the
Missouri house of representatives appointed by
the minority leader of the Missouri house of
representatives, the director of the department
of economic development or his or her designee,
and two members to be appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate.]
[620.1890. Prior to March first each year,
the department will provide a report on the
program to the general assembly including the
names of participating companies, location of
such companies, the annual amount of benefits
provided, the estimated net state fiscal impact
(direct and indirect new state taxes derived
from the project), the number of new jobs
created or jobs retained, the average wages of
each project, and the types of qualified
companies using the program.]
[620.2600. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Innovation Campus Tax
Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit
certificate issued under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department
of economic development;
(3) "Eligible donation", donations
received from a taxpayer by innovation campuses
that are to be used solely for projects that
advance learning in the areas of science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics.
Eligible donations may include cash, publicly
traded stocks and bonds, and real estate that
shall and will be valued and documented
according to the rules promulgated by the
department of economic development;

SB 1188 296
(4) "Innovation education campus" or
"innovation campus", as defined in section
178.1100, an educational partnership consisting
of at least one of each of the following
entities:
(a) A local Missouri high school or K-12
school district;
(b) A Missouri four-year public or private
higher education institution;
(c) A Missouri-based business or
businesses; and
(d) A Missouri two-year public higher
education institution or state technical college
of Missouri;
(5) "Taxpayer", any of the following
individuals or entities who make an eligible
donation to any innovation campus:
(a) A person, firm, partner in a firm,
corporation, or a shareholder in an S
corporation doing business in the state of
Missouri and subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143;
(b) A corporation subject to the annual
corporation franchise tax imposed in chapter 147;
(c) An insurance company paying an annual
tax on its gross premium receipts in this state;
(d) Any other financial institution paying
taxes to the state of Missouri or any political
subdivisions of this state under chapter 148;
(e) An individual subject to the state
income tax imposed in chapter 143;
(f) Any charitable organization which is
exempt from federal income tax and whose
Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if
any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2015, any taxpayer shall be
allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due
under chapters 147, 148, or 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of
the amount of an eligible donation, subject to
the restrictions in this section. The amount of

SB 1188 297
the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the
amount of the taxpayer's state income tax
liability in the tax year for which the credit
is claimed. Any amount of credit that the
taxpayer is prohibited by this section from
claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable,
but may be carried forward to any of the
taxpayer's four subsequent taxable years.
4. To claim the credit authorized in this
section, an innovation campus may submit to the
department an application for the tax credit
authorized by this section on behalf of
taxpayers. The department shall verify that the
innovation campus has submitted the following
items:
(1) A valid application in the form and
format required by the department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible
donation received, which shall include the name
and taxpayer identification number of the
individual or taxpayer making the eligible
donation, the amount of the eligible donation,
and the date the eligible donation was received
by the innovation campus; and
(3) Payment from the innovation campus
equal to the value of the tax credit for which
application is made.
If the innovation campus applying for the
tax credit meets all criteria required by this
subsection, the department shall issue a
certificate in the appropriate amount.
5. Tax credits issued under this section
may be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit
shall have the same rights in the credit as the
taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is assigned,
100 transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a
101 notarized endorsement shall be filed with the
102 department specifying the name and address of
103 the new owner of the tax credit and the value of
104 the credit.
105 6. The department may promulgate rules to
106 implement the provisions of this section. Any
107 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is

SB 1188 298
108 defined in section 536.010, that is created
109 under the authority delegated in this section
110 shall become effective only if it complies with
111 and is subject to all of the provisions of
112 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
113 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
114 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
115 with the general assembly under and pursuant to
116 chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
117 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
118 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
119 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
120 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2014, shall
121 be invalid and void.
122 7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
123 sunset act:
124 (1) The program authorized under this
125 section shall expire six years after August 28,
126 2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the
127 general assembly; and
128 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
129 program authorized under this section shall
130 automatically sunset twelve years after August
131 28, 2014; and
132 (3) This section shall terminate on
133 September first of the calendar year immediately
134 following the calendar year in which the program
135 authorized under this section is sunset.]
✓